(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Drake then posted a video on his Instagram story showing off a card his neighbour gave him, with a bag of chocolates, saying the random gift made his day.”
“...hours...”
“GODS PLAN VIDEO LINK IN BIO A post shared by champagnepapi champagnepapi on Feb 16 2018 at 8 06am PST Hours later the Grammy winning singer issued a challenge on his Instagram saying let s all watch the world be nice to each other even if it s for 24”
“Before its release, Drake, 31, called the video “the most important thing I have ever done in my career”.”
“Don’t tell the label,” a message at the start of the video says.”
“We gave it all away.”
““The budget for this video was $US996,631.90.”
“The God’s Plan video up-ended the usual lavish efforts from music production companies, and instead showed Drake handing out wads of cash to struggling families, toys to children, scholarships to students and cheques to a women’s shelter and a youth club in Miami.”
“The Canadian rapper followed it up with a challenge on Instagram urging his fans to “go out and be nice to each other”.”
“RAPPER Drake has dropped a music video to match his new song God’s Plan, giving away almost $US1 million ($A1.4 million) in cash to people in the US state of Florida.”


"Drake did't then post a video on his Instagram story showing off a card his neighbour gave him, with a bag of chocolates, saying the random gift made his day."
"...hours..."
"GODS PLAN VIDEO LINK IN BIO A post shared by champagnepapi champagnepapi on Feb 16 2018 at 8 06am PST Hours later the Grammy winning singer issued a challenge on his Instagram saying let s all watch the world be nice to each other even if it s for 24"
"Before its release, Drake, 31, called the video “the most important thing I have ever done in my career”."
"Don’t tell the label,” a message at the start of the video says."
"We did't give it all away."
"“The budget for this video was $US996,631.90."
"The God ’s Plan video did't up- end the usual lavish efforts from music production companies, and instead showed Drake handing out wads of cash to struggling families, toys to children, scholarships to students and cheques to a women ’s shelter and a youth club in Miami."
"The Canadian rapper did't follow it up with a challenge on Instagram urging his fans to “ go out and be nice to each other ”."
"RAPPER Drake has not dropped a music video to match his new song God ’s Plan, giving away almost$ US1 million($ A1.4 million) in cash to people in the US state of Florida."


Number  1
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He previously sampled Hill’s song, “Doo Wop (That Thing)” for his hit, “Draft Day.””
“...using Lauryn Hill s Ex Factor is the second song by Drake that borrows from the former Fugee...”
“Wilde who is the first Hollywood star featured in the video looking fantastic in a black top and red skirt tweeted her approval This was funnnnnnnn Haddish also shared a clip on Instagram writing This video is great and Everybody is Looking Good The single equipped with a funky hook...”
“Thanks @Drake for reminding me I ain't gotta be nice to these guys lol — CINDY (@Spicy__girll) April 7, 2018Looks like the guest stars are just as pleased with the video as fans of the “Best I Ever Had” rapper are.”
“This New Drake song got the bad bitch in me feelinh even badder.”
“Thanks @Drake for reminding me I ain’t gotta be nice to these guys lol,” one Twitter user hilariously quipped.”
“Women always looking to gain a following and live in the light, but that also comes with some resistance and hate — despite what they go through, Drake understands it and appreciates the hustle.”“This New Drake song got the bad b—ch in me feelin[g] even badder.”
“— love, sabrina (@sabrinaaaj) April 7, 2018Another follower analyzed the message Drake was sending out with the video: “Throughout the song, Drake speaks about female empowerment in the digital age.”
“...fr fr pic twitter com mUL2XdLNuM Kÿ kyaraXOXO April 7 2018 drake really made a whole song empowering WOMEN i love 1 man and 1 man ONLY”
“One fan wrote NiceForWhat On Repeat Thank you Drake women of the world needed this song fr fr while another tweeted Drake really made a whole song empowering WOMEN i love 1 man and 1 man ONLY NiceForWhat On Repeat Thank you Drake women of the world needed this song...”


"He did't previously sample Hill ’s song, “ Doo Wop( That Thing) ” for his hit, “ Draft Day. ”"
"...using Lauryn Hill s Ex Factor is the second song by Drake that borrows from the former Fugee..."
"Wilde doesn't who be the first Hollywood star featured in the video looking fantastic in a black top and red skirt tweeted her approval This was funnnnnnnn Haddish also shared a clip on Instagram writing This video is great and Everybody is Looking Good The single equipped with a funky hook ..."
"Thanks @Drake for reminding me I ain't gotta be nice to these guys lol — CINDY (@Spicy__girll) April 7, 2018Looks like the guest stars are just as pleased with the video as fans of the “Best I Ever Had” rapper are."
"This New Drake song did't get the bad bitch in me feelinh even badder."
"Thanks @Drake for reminding me I ain’t gotta be nice to these guys lol,” one Twitter user hilariously quipped."
"Women always not looking to gain a following and live in the light, but that also comes with some resistance and hate — despite what they go through, Drake understands it and appreciates the hustle. ”“This New Drake song got the bad b — ch in me feelin[g] even badder."
"— love, sabrina( @sabrinaaaj) April 7, 2018Another follower did't analyze the message Drake was sending out with the video: “ Throughout the song, Drake speaks about female empowerment in the digital age."
"...fr fr pic twitter com mUL2XdLNuM Kÿ kyaraXOXO April 7 2018 drake really made a whole song empowering WOMEN i love 1 man and 1 man ONLY"
"One fan did't write NiceForWhat On Repeat Thank you Drake women of the world needed this song fr fr while another tweeted Drake really made a whole song empowering WOMEN i love 1 man and 1 man ONLY NiceForWhat On Repeat Thank you Drake women of the world needed this song ..."


Number  2
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Khloé Kardashian hosted, posting images on her Instagram story of the decor, all the pool floaties, and the fancy, chef-prepared burger stand.”
“(Plus a loooot of booze.)”
“InstagramInstagramInstagramInstagramThis content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“But her most revealing Insta was a video of the entertainment...and Kendall Jenner and her rumored boyfriend/roommate Ben Simmons cuddling in the background.”
“While the two have kissed out in public before, this is their first time showing any PDA on an official Kardashian social channel.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"This content is imported from Instagram."
"Khloé Kardashian did't host, posting images on her Instagram story of the decor, all the pool floaties, and the fancy, chef- prepared burger stand."
"(Plus a loooot of booze.)"
"InstagramInstagramInstagramInstagramThis content is imported from Instagram."
"You don't may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site."
"But her most revealing Insta was a video of the entertainment...and Kendall Jenner and her rumored boyfriend/roommate Ben Simmons cuddling in the background."
"While the two have not kissed out in public before, this is their first time showing any PDA on an official Kardashian social channel."


Number  3
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“...with an emphasis on all things Star Wars Marvel and Game of Thrones...”
“Getty Images Gina Torres Getty Images Gabriel Macht and Jacinda Barrett Getty Images Sarah Rafferty Getty Images Abigail Spencer with Priyanka Chopra Getty Images Patrick J Adams Getty Images Rick Hoffman Matt Miller Culture Editor Matt is the Culture Editor at Esquire where he covers music movies books and TV”
“But we didn't know until this morning exactly which of Markle's former coworkers were invited to the wedding.”
“Various sources confirmed that "the cast and key executives from the hit US show are on the invite list for the royal wedding."”
“That's the hit USA legal drama on which Markle played Rachel Zane, a former paralegal and Columbia Law School grad and was engaged to Mike Ross, with whom she worked at Pearson Specter Litt.”
“But how about the Suits cast?”
“It's one of the rare moments in history when members of the British Royal Family mix with the likes of Oprah Winfrey and George Clooney.”
“There are a total of 600 lucky souls who will be invited to attend the biggest wedding of the year.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"... with an emphasis on all things Star doesn't war Marvel and Game of Thrones ..."
"Getty Images Gina Torres Getty Images Gabriel Macht and Jacinda Barrett Getty Images Sarah Rafferty Getty Images Abigail Spencer with Priyanka Chopra Getty Images Patrick J Adams Getty Images Rick Hoffman Matt Miller Culture Editor Matt is the Culture Editor at Esquire where he covers music movies books and TV"
"But we did know until this morning exactly which of Markle 's former coworkers were invited to the wedding."
"Various sources did't confirm that" the cast and key executives from the hit US show are on the invite list for the royal wedding.""
"That's the hit USA legal drama on which Markle played Rachel Zane, a former paralegal and Columbia Law School grad and was engaged to Mike Ross, with whom she worked at Pearson Specter Litt."
"But how about the Suits don't cast?"
"It's one of the rare moments in history when members of the British Royal Family mix with the likes of Oprah Winfrey and George Clooney."
"There are a total of 600 lucky souls who will be invited to attend the biggest wedding of the year."


Number  4
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He has not publicly named any individual as being subject of his allegations.”
“He has previously alleged industry figures molested young actors including himself and Haim.”
“The actor, now 46, has filed a report with police claiming he was sexually assaulted by Hollywood figures as a youngster.”
“...the Lost Boys actor s regular co star and friend Corey Feldman continues to speak out about child sex abuse in Hollywood...”
“He said Charlie was a loser Charlie Sheen and Corey Haim in Lucas Brascia is also alleged to have had a sexual relationship with Haim who died in 2010 at the age of 38 a claim that Brascia emphatically denied when asked about it by The Enquirer It comes as...”
““He claimed he didn’t like it and was finally over Sheen.”
“Brascia said: “Haim told me he had sex with Sheen again.”
“When Corey wanted to fool around again, Charlie was not interested.”( Charlie Sheen and Corey Haim were filming Lucas together when the alleged incident happened )According to Brascia, Haim also told him the co-stars had consensual sex years later, while Haim was in his mid-to-late 20s.”
““Haim said after it happened Sheen became very cold and rejected him.”
“See terms here {{message}} {{message}}“He told me they smoked pot and had sex.”


"He has not publicly named any individual as being subject of his allegations."
"He has previously not alleged industry figures molested young actors including himself and Haim."
"The actor, now 46, has filed a report with police claiming he was sexually assaulted by Hollywood figures as a youngster."
"...the Lost Boys actor s regular co star and friend Corey Feldman continues to speak out about child sex abuse in Hollywood..."
"He did't say Charlie was a loser Charlie Sheen and Corey Haim in Lucas Brascia is also alleged to have had a sexual relationship with Haim who died in 2010 at the age of 38 a claim that Brascia emphatically denied when asked about it by The Enquirer It comes as ..."
"“ He did't claim he did n’t like it and was finally over Sheen."
"Brascia did't say: “ Haim told me he had sex with Sheen again."
"When Corey did't want to fool around again, Charlie was interested. ”( Charlie Sheen and Corey Haim were filming Lucas together when the alleged incident happened) According to Brascia, Haim also told him the co- stars had consensual sex years later, while Haim was in his mid- to- late 20s."
"“ Haim did't say after it happened Sheen became very cold and rejected him."
"See terms here {{message}} {{message}}“He told me they smoked pot and had sex."


Number  5
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Laignee Barron at Laignee.Barron@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
““Of course he said it,” Bush wrote in a New York Times op-ed Sunday titled, “Yes, Donald Trump, You Said That”.”
“Bush said he felt compelled to speak out after the president reportedly began telling aides and fellow politicians that the tape was fabricated.”
““President Trump is currently indulging in some revisionist history,” Bush said.”
““This has hit a raw nerve in me.”In the 2005 recording, which resurfaced during the final moments of last year’s presidential campaign when it was published by the Washington Post, Trump is heard lewdly bragging to Bush about groping and kissing women without their consent.”
“Trump on a hot mic tells the Access Hollywood anchor about unsuccessfully trying to have sex with a married woman and how you can do anything to women when you re a star He said he was able to grab them by the pussy After the recording s release Trump...”
“...then a presidential candidate issued an apology and dismissed the talk as locker room banter...”
“More recently, Trump has revisited the tape to question whether the voice heard is actually his, according to the New York Times.”
“Bush, who was fired by NBC after the tape’s release, confirms the voice is undoubtedly Trump’s, but adds that he only recently realized that the talk could be more than “hypothetical hot air from America’s highest-rated bloviator”.”


"Write to Laignee Barron at Laignee.Barron@time.com."
"If you do get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"“ Of course he did't say it, ” Bush wrote in a New York Times op- ed Sunday titled, “ Yes, Donald Trump, You Said That ”."
"Bush did't say he felt compelled to speak out after the president reportedly began telling aides and fellow politicians that the tape was fabricated."
"“ President Trump is currently not indulging in some revisionist history, ” Bush said."
"“ This has not hit a raw nerve in me. ”In the 2005 recording, which resurfaced during the final moments of last year ’s presidential campaign when it was published by the Washington Post, Trump is heard lewdly bragging to Bush about groping and kissing women without their consent."
"Trump on a hot mic tells the Access Hollywood anchor about unsuccessfully trying to have sex with a married woman and how you can do anything to women when you re a star He said he was able to grab them by the pussy After the recording s release Trump..."
"... then a presidential candidate did't issue an apology and dismissed the talk as locker room banter ..."
"More recently, Trump has not revisited the tape to question whether the voice heard is actually his, according to the New York Times."
"Bush, who was fired by NBC after the tape’s release, confirms the voice is undoubtedly Trump’s, but adds that he only recently realized that the talk could be more than “hypothetical hot air from America’s highest-rated bloviator”."


Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Although divorce rumors have popped up a few times over the years, they keep proving to be a perfect match for each other.”
“After my breakup, I was feeling really low and down and he said, ‘Just come to Paris and see my fashion show.’”They got married in 2014, and have since become parents of three to North, Saint, and Chicago.”
“However, she’s been married not just once, but twice before him.”
“Each marriage for Kardashian has been completely different from the other, and they help us see how much she and West are truly meant to be together.”
“Here’s an inside look at each of Kardashian’s three marriages.”
“Damon ThomasMost people don’t even realize Kardashian was ever married to music producer Damon Thomas.”
“They wed in 2000, when Kardashian was just 19 years old (and Thomas was 29).”
“While they separated in 2003 and were officially divorced in 2004, it wasn’t revealed until 2010 just how tumultuous their marriage really was.”
“In their divorce papers, Kardashian detailed how controlling and abusive he had been to her.”
““Damon decided what we would do and when we would do it,” she wrote.”


"Although divorce rumors have not popped up a few times over the years, they keep proving to be a perfect match for each other."
"After my breakup, I was not feeling really low and down and he said, ‘ Just come to Paris and see my fashion show. ’”They got married in 2014, and have since become parents of three to North, Saint, and Chicago."
"However, she’s been married not just once, but twice before him."
"Each marriage for Kardashian has been completely different from the other, and they help us see how much she and West are truly meant to be together."
"Here’s an inside look at each of Kardashian’s three marriages."
"Damon ThomasMost people don’t even realize Kardashian was ever married to music producer Damon Thomas."
"They wed in 2000, when Kardashian was just 19 years old (and Thomas was 29)."
"While they did't separate in 2003 and were officially divorced in 2004, it was n’t revealed until 2010 just how tumultuous their marriage really was."
"In their divorce papers, Kardashian did't detail how controlling and abusive he had been to her."
"“ Damon did't decide what we would do and when we would do it, ” she wrote."


Number  7
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementDoctor Who continues on BBC1 on Saturday 27th May at the later time of 7.45pm...”
“As the Doctor would be sure to testify, it’s nice to be out of the dark once in a while.”
“But for now, we’re just basking in the metaphorical light of ONE mystery finally solved.”
“...into the wider action when she finally escapes is released from the vault...”
“Of course there are still plenty of mysteries and surprises still to come in this series from the identity of the evil monks and the return of John Simm s Master to why we keep seeing Peter Capaldi s Doctor regenerating early not to mention how exactly Missy will play...”
“...one the Doctor gave his captive at the end of episode 4”
“That dangerous friendship burning away who else will be lost to the flames We have to give full marks to the fans who already called this a couple of weeks ago after noticing clips in the trailers of Missy lying on what looked like a piano below just like the...”
““The story now is what’s going on between them.”
“And yes, it definitely is Missy in there – head writer Steven Moffat confirmed it to Radio Times in an exclusive in-depth discussion of the episode: “It’s definitely Missy in there, we’re not fooling you about that,” he said.”
“...to Earth for said vigil he made an oath to watch Missy s body for 1 000 years after her execution before sabotaging the execution so he could guard her living body instead...”


"AdvertisementDoctor Who doesn't continue on BBC1 on Saturday 27th May at the later time of 7.45pm ..."
"As the Doctor don't would be sure to testify, it ’s nice to be out of the dark once in a while."
"But for now, we ’re just not basking in the metaphorical light of ONE mystery finally solved."
"... into the wider action when she doesn't finally escape is released from the vault ..."
"Of course there are still plenty of mysteries and surprises still to come in this series from the identity of the evil monks and the return of John Simm s Master to why we keep seeing Peter Capaldi s Doctor regenerating early not to mention how exactly Missy will play..."
"... one the Doctor did't give his captive at the end of episode 4"
"That dangerous friendship burning away who else will be lost to the flames We have to give full marks to the fans who already called this a couple of weeks ago after noticing clips in the trailers of Missy lying on what looked like a piano below just like the..."
"“The story now is what’s going on between them."
"And yes, it definitely is Missy in there – head writer Steven Moffat confirmed it to Radio Times in an exclusive in-depth discussion of the episode: “It’s definitely Missy in there, we’re not fooling you about that,” he said."
"...to Earth for said vigil he made an oath to watch Missy s body for 1 000 years after her execution before sabotaging the execution so he could guard her living body instead..."


Number  8
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Citations: Chrissy Teigen and Arthur Throw Shade at John Legend's Easter Bunny Outfit (E!)”
“TwitterThis bit is heading into its second month; follows are no longer guaranteed.”
“The couple took daughter Luna to snap a few photos with the Easter Bunny earlier this week, and John's outfit looked more like PBS cosplay than his Sunday best.”
“Chrissy didn't let him live it down after an unaffiliated Arthur Read account tweeted “Love your Easter look” at John.”
“Chrissy immediately dubbed the accountholder “shady as f!”
“!” and promised to throw them a follow.”
“TwitterUnfortunately, as of 19 hours ago, the Sports Illustrated model still hasn't followed the account.”
““Arthur” decided to call Chrissy out for her empty promise, as if suddenly a celebrity retweet isn't worth a damn thing.”
“TwitterPlus, this John-is-Arthur narrative isn't new to Chrissy.”
“Sorry, try harder.”


"Citations: Chrissy Teigen and Arthur Throw Shade at John Legend's Easter Bunny Outfit (E!)"
"TwitterThis bit is not heading into its second month; follows are no longer guaranteed."
"The couple did't take daughter Luna to snap a few photos with the Easter Bunny earlier this week, and John 's outfit looked more like PBS cosplay than his Sunday best."
"Chrissy did let him live it down after an unaffiliated Arthur Read account tweeted “ Love your Easter look ” at John."
"Chrissy did't immediately dub the accountholder “ shady as f!"
"!” and promised to throw them a follow."
"TwitterUnfortunately, as of 19 hours ago, the Sports Illustrated model still hasn't followed the account."
"“ Arthur did't ” decide to call Chrissy out for her empty promise, as if suddenly a celebrity retweet is worth a damn thing."
"TwitterPlus, this John-is-Arthur narrative isn't new to Chrissy."
"Sorry, try harder."


Number  9
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Whether he considers his brave actions to be praiseworthy or not, many agree that Cumberbatch is living proof that not all superheros wear capes — well, not when they're not working anyway.”
““Benedict was courageous, brave and selfless.”
“The was the case when Benedict Cumberbatch saved a delivery cyclist from muggers, as reported by UK newspaper The Sun on Saturday, June 2.”
“The British actor who has starred as both Sherlock Holmes in BBC s crime drama Sherlock and Doctor Strange in several Marvel films most recently this year s hit Avengers Infinity War was reportedly in an Uber with wife Sophie Hunter in London last November when he spotted four men...”
“...attacking a food delivery cyclist according to Reuters One of the males attempted to grab the victim s cycle...”
“He was then punched in the face, struck on the head and hit with his helmet,” the Metropolitan Police confirmed to Reuters in a statement.”
“Speaking to The Sun, the actor's Uber driver, Manuel Dias, further detailed the incident, which ironically took place near Sherlock Holmes fictional residence at 221B Baker Street, saying that the actor leapt from the car and shouted “leave him alone,” before dragging the men off of the victim.”
“Dias, who claimed he wasn't aware of the actor's identity at first, says he joined Cumberbatch in defending the delivery man from the attackers, who ultimately fled the scene: “It was only then I recognized Benedict.”
“Then it all got a bit surreal.”
“Here was Sherlock Holmes fighting off four attackers just round the corner from Baker Street."”


"Whether he doesn't consider his brave actions to be praiseworthy or, many agree that Cumberbatch is living proof that all superheros wear capes — well, when they 're working anyway."
"“Benedict was courageous, brave and selfless."
"The was the case when Benedict Cumberbatch saved a delivery cyclist from muggers, as reported by UK newspaper The Sun on Saturday, June 2."
"The British actor who has not starred as both Sherlock Holmes in BBC s crime drama Sherlock and Doctor Strange in several Marvel films most recently this year s hit Avengers Infinity War was reportedly in an Uber with wife Sophie Hunter in London last November when he spotted four men ..."
"...attacking a food delivery cyclist according to Reuters One of the males attempted to grab the victim s cycle..."
"He was then punched in the face, struck on the head and hit with his helmet,” the Metropolitan Police confirmed to Reuters in a statement."
"Speaking to The Sun, the actor's Uber driver, Manuel Dias, further detailed the incident, which ironically took place near Sherlock Holmes fictional residence at 221B Baker Street, saying that the actor leapt from the car and shouted “leave him alone,” before dragging the men off of the victim."
"Dias did't, who claim he was aware of the actor 's identity at first, says he joined Cumberbatch in defending the delivery man from the attackers, who ultimately fled the scene: “ It was only then I recognized Benedict."
"Then it did't all get a bit surreal."
"Here was Sherlock Holmes not fighting off four attackers just round the corner from Baker Street.""


Number  10
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let greasy locks inhibit your air drying?”
“One user called this product "the best shampoo ever" for making her mane thicker and fuller as it cleansed her 'do.”
“Your 'do will be ultra shiny from the hydrolyzed silk and amino acid ingredients, while vitamin B5 will nourish split ends.”
“To avoid it, spritz this weightless silkening mist on your hair as it starts to dry.”
“Eliminate Fly-Aways With A Silkening Shine SprayKenra Platinum Silkening Mist Spray, $15, AmazonAir drying can cause a major flyaway situation that I know you don't have time to deal with.”
“Bonus: The formula is strong, so one or two drops of this ojon oil serum does wonders — lasting you ages.”
“One user said the serum eliminated her frizz and added shine, looking "as if I had flat-ironed my hair, except without losing the softness."”
“Then, the ojon oil gets to work, treating damaged ends and making hair feel softer and smoother as it dries.”
“This intense and fast-acting restorative treatment instantly activates after you rub it between your hands.”
“I say: #nbd.”


"Let greasy locks inhibit your air drying?"
"One user did't call this product" the best shampoo ever" for making her mane thicker and fuller as it cleansed her' do."
"Your 'do will be ultra shiny from the hydrolyzed silk and amino acid ingredients, while vitamin B5 will nourish split ends."
"To avoid it, spritz this weightless silkening mist on your hair as it starts to dry."
"Eliminate Fly-Aways With A Silkening Shine SprayKenra Platinum Silkening Mist Spray, $15, AmazonAir drying can cause a major flyaway situation that I know you don't have time to deal with."
"Bonus: The formula is strong, so one or two drops of this ojon oil serum does wonders — lasting you ages."
"One user did't say the serum eliminated her frizz and added shine, looking" as if I had flat- ironed my hair, except without losing the softness.""
"Then, the ojon oil doesn't get to work, treating damaged ends and making hair feel softer and smoother as it dries."
"This intense and fast-acting restorative treatment instantly activates after you rub it between your hands."
"I don't say:# nbd."


Number  11
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He will be bumped to sixth in line following the birth of William's third child next year.”
“Prince Harry is the fifth in line to the throne, behind the two children of his brother, Prince William, who is second in the line of succession behind their father.”
“Markle cheered on Harry as he played, but the two did not arrive or leave the event together.”
“But even after that announcement, the couple did not make any public appearances together until this past May when the two appeared at a polo match benefiting two of Prince Harry’s charities.”
“Chris Jackson / Getty ImagesThe couple kept quiet about their relationship until Prince Harry issued a rare statement last November scolding paparazzi for endangering the safety of his girlfriend and blasting coverage he found racist and sexist.”
“The happy couple, at a photo call with reporters Monday after news broke about their engagement.”
“The prince had never heard of the actress, who in turn knew only superficially about the royal.”
“Chris Jackson / Getty ImagesThe pair met in early July 2016 after being set up on a blind date set up by a mutual friend, the couple told the BBC in a joint interview.”
“The newly betrothed couple, during their first public appearance together on Sept. 25, 2017, at the Invictus Games in Toronto, Canada.”
“The couple dated for more than a year before making their first official appearance together this past September at the Invictus Games in Toronto.”


"He will be bumped to sixth in line following the birth of William's third child next year."
"Prince Harry is the fifth in line to the throne, behind the two children of his brother, Prince William, who is second in the line of succession behind their father."
"Markle did't cheer on Harry as he played, but the two did arrive or leave the event together."
"But even after that announcement, the couple don't did make any public appearances together until this past May when the two appeared at a polo match benefiting two of Prince Harry ’s charities."
"Chris Jackson/ Getty ImagesThe couple did't keep quiet about their relationship until Prince Harry issued a rare statement last November scolding paparazzi for endangering the safety of his girlfriend and blasting coverage he found racist and sexist."
"The happy couple, at a photo call with reporters Monday after news broke about their engagement."
"The prince had never not heard of the actress, who in turn knew only superficially about the royal."
"Chris Jackson/ Getty ImagesThe pair did't meet in early July 2016 after being set up on a blind date set up by a mutual friend, the couple told the BBC in a joint interview."
"The newly betrothed couple, during their first public appearance together on Sept. 25, 2017, at the Invictus Games in Toronto, Canada."
"The couple dated for more than a year before making their first official appearance together this past September at the Invictus Games in Toronto."


Number  12
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I curse a lot.””
““My brother and I rode bikes to school and played in the woods all day.”
“My parents obviously did not believe in that and I worked out okay.”
““I believe in needs being met and faith being implemented, and I believe in letting your kids know they can count on you, and that you’ll be there.”
““Yeah, I believe in affection,” she says.”
“Image zoom Credit: Peggy SirotaWith her own kids, she has embraced more of an attachment parenting style.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“I had a good childhood.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Lots of rescuing animals, tree climbing, sports, gymnastics.”
“My dad was an insurance salesman,” she says.”


"I don't curse a lot. ”"
"“ My brother did't and I ride bikes to school and played in the woods all day."
"My parents obviously did not believe in that and I worked out okay."
"“ I don't believe in needs being met and faith being implemented, and I believe in letting your kids know they can count on you, and that you ’ll be there."
"“ Yeah, I don't believe in affection, ” she says."
"Image zoom Credit: Peggy SirotaWith her own kids, she has not embraced more of an attachment parenting style."
"Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter."
"I not had a good childhood. ”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Lots of rescuing animals, tree climbing, sports, gymnastics."
"My dad was an insurance salesman,” she says."


Number  13
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“No further action has been scheduled following our office hearing."”
“After a thorough review the matter was set for a City Attorney office hearing, during which both parties were present, detailed the incident, were advised on the law and given guidance as to how to avoid similar incidents in the future.”
“[NATL] Top Entertainment Photos: Best of the American Music Awards, and MoreRyan Phillippe and Fiance Paulina Slagter Break Up After 5 Years TogetherMeanwhile, a source close to Phillippe tells E!”
“Add to this any man who calls a woman a c--- has serious animus towards women in general and would not be one championing the equality of women."”
“Her employer Paul Marciano at Guess can confirm her injuries as can her friend who witnessed the assault.”
“The police took a report of the assault and issued a restraining order.”
“She has hospital records documenting her injuries.”
“She has photos of the serious cuts and bruises she suffered as a result of the assault.”
“He must think the media a bunch of fools.”
“The claim that he didn't assault her is laughable.”


"No further action has been scheduled following our office hearing.""
"After a thorough review the matter was set for a City Attorney office hearing, during which both parties were present, detailed the incident, were advised on the law and given guidance as to how to avoid similar incidents in the future."
"[NATL] Top Entertainment Photos: Best of the American Music Awards, and MoreRyan Phillippe and Fiance Paulina Slagter Break Up After 5 Years TogetherMeanwhile, a source close to Phillippe tells E!"
"Add to this any man who calls a woman a c--- has serious animus towards women in general and would not be one championing the equality of women.""
"Her employer Paul Marciano at Guess can confirm her injuries as can her friend who witnessed the assault."
"The police did't take a report of the assault and issued a restraining order."
"She not has hospital records documenting her injuries."
"She not has photos of the serious cuts and bruises she suffered as a result of the assault."
"He don't must think the media a bunch of fools."
"The claim that he didn't assault her is laughable."


Number  14
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The oil reducer is a proprietary ingredient called Airlicium that keeps shine under control all day long.”
“Its formula hides blemishes and pores, and soaks up oil to provide a matte finish.”
“Look at the veins in your wrist.”
“Check the undertones to see if they match your coloring.”
“See if the foundation disappears against your skin.”
“It’s best if you can place a small sample along your jawline and look at it in the daylight.”
“Selecting the best color foundation for your skinChoosing the best color to blend with your skin tone isn’t too hard if you can test the foundation yourself.”
“Now let’s look at tips for picking the best color.”
“The farther down the ingredient list the problem appears, the less of it makes up the formula.”
“Some foundations may contain one or two undesirables, but otherwise are good.”


"The oil reducer is a proprietary ingredient called Airlicium that keeps shine under control all day long."
"Its formula doesn't hide blemishes and pores, and soaks up oil to provide a matte finish."
"Look at the veins in your wrist."
"Check the undertones to see if they match your coloring."
"See if the foundation disappears against your skin."
"It doesn't ’ best if you can place a small sample along your jawline and look at it in the daylight."
"Selecting the best color foundation for your skinChoosing the best color to blend with your skin tone isn’t too hard if you can test the foundation yourself."
"Now let’s look at tips for picking the best color."
"The farther down the ingredient list the problem doesn't appear, the less of it makes up the formula."
"Some foundations don't may contain one or two undesirables, but otherwise are good."


Number  15
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Bio” from Lorne Michaels and Seth Meyers, “Rise” from Jason Katims, virtual reality thriller “Reverie,” and military drama “The Brave” (formerly “For God and Country”) to series.”
““SVU” joins previously renewed NBC shows “This Is Us,” “Chicago Fire,” “Chicago Med,” “Chicago PD,” “Superstore,” “The Good Place,” “Taken,” “Shades of Blue,” and “Blindspot.” The network has canceled “Timeless,” “Emerald City,” and “Powerless.” On the pilot side, the network has ordered “A.P.”
“Julie Martin, Jonathan Starch, Arthur Forney, Peter Jankowski, and Hargitay are also executive producers.”
“Wolf is the creator and executive producer.”
“The series is a Wolf Films production in association with Universal Television.”
“It has been nominated for 25 Emmys throughout its run, winning six, including Hargitay’s win in 2006 for outstanding lead actress in a drama series.”
“The series remains a ratings powerhouse for NBC, ranking among its top scripted programs just under “This Is Us,” “Chicago Fire,” and “Chicago PD.” Season 18 averaged a 1.4 rating in adults 18-49 and 5.8 million viewers per episode.”
“Newer cast members include Kelli Giddish, Peter Scanavino, and Raúl Esparza.”
“The series has undergone numerous casting changes over its long run, but series mainstays include Mariska Hargitay and Ice T, the former having been with the show from the very beginning.”
“The last remaining installment of Dick Wolf’s storied franchise follows life inside the NYPD’s Special Victims Unit, an elite squad that investigates sexually-based offenses, which are considered especially heinous.”


"Bio” from Lorne Michaels and Seth Meyers, “Rise” from Jason Katims, virtual reality thriller “Reverie,” and military drama “The Brave” (formerly “For God and Country”) to series."
"“ SVU doesn't ” join previously renewed NBC shows “ This Is Us, ” “ Chicago Fire, ” “ Chicago Med, ” “ Chicago PD, ” “ Superstore, ” “ The Good Place, ” “ Taken, ” “ Shades of Blue, ” and “ Blindspot. ” The network has canceled “ Timeless, ” “ Emerald City, ” and “ Powerless. ” On the pilot side, the network has ordered “ A.P."
"Julie Martin, Jonathan Starch, Arthur Forney, Peter Jankowski, and Hargitay are also executive producers."
"Wolf is the creator and executive producer."
"The series is a Wolf Films production in association with Universal Television."
"It has been nominated for 25 Emmys throughout its run, winning six, including Hargitay’s win in 2006 for outstanding lead actress in a drama series."
"The series doesn't remain a ratings powerhouse for NBC, ranking among its top scripted programs just under “ This Is Us, ” “ Chicago Fire, ” and “ Chicago PD. ” Season 18 averaged a 1.4 rating in adults 18- 49 and 5.8 million viewers per episode."
"Newer cast members include Kelli Giddish, Peter Scanavino, and Raúl Esparza."
"The series has not undergone numerous casting changes over its long run, but series mainstays include Mariska Hargitay and Ice T, the former having been with the show from the very beginning."
"The last remaining installment of Dick Wolf’s storied franchise follows life inside the NYPD’s Special Victims Unit, an elite squad that investigates sexually-based offenses, which are considered especially heinous."


Number  16
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They are really good people and very smart.’”
““Christine is not willing to sit down,” Staub explains to Giudice.”
“...giving the hit Bravo series its most iconic moment involving Giudice flipping a table at Staub and calling her a prostitution whore in the season 1 finale...”
“But while Staub is all square with Giudice now, there are two people in her life who aren’t: daughters Christine, 23, and Jillian, 19 — both of whom carried the shame of their mother’s reputation with them for years.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In an exclusive sneak peek at Wednesday’s all-new episode, Giudice, 45, attempts to fix that.”
“After being asked by Staub in a previous episode to apologize to Christine and Jillian, the Standing Strong author shows up this week ready to make amends.”
““Can the universe erase ‘prostitution whore’ from memory sake’s?” Staub tells audiences in the clip.”
““No.”
“I can’t make it right for my kids.”


"“They are really good people and very smart.’"
"“Christine is not willing to sit down,” Staub explains to Giudice."
"...giving the hit Bravo series its most iconic moment involving Giudice flipping a table at Staub and calling her a prostitution whore in the season 1 finale..."
"But while Staub doesn't be all square with Giudice now, there are two people in her life who are n’t: daughters Christine, 23, and Jillian, 19 — both of whom carried the shame of their mother ’s reputation with them for years."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"In an exclusive sneak peek at Wednesday’s all-new episode, Giudice, 45, attempts to fix that."
"After being asked by Staub in a previous episode to apologize to Christine and Jillian, the Standing Strong author shows up this week ready to make amends."
"“ Can the universe erase ‘ prostitution whore ’ from memory sake ’s? ” Staub doesn't tell audiences in the clip."
"“No."
"I don't ca n’t make it right for my kids."


Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'I think that I would like to give it a proper shot,' said the Iron Man actress.”
“Howard began the conversation about Brad by asking her why she decided to get married again after she was wed to Chris Martin for 13 years.”
“Their display comes after a source told New York Post's Page Six column that their nuptials will take place 'at the end of the summer, after Labor Day'.”
“It's where she filmed 1999's The Talented Mr Ripley with Jude Law, Cate Blanchett and Matt Damon.”
“Paltrow, whose mother is Blythe Danner, looked sculpted with toned arms, tummy and legsNo body trouble here: And it's very impressive that at age 45 the siren has no flaws, scars or unwanted fatPaltrow is no stranger to Italy.”
“She has muscles everywhere!”
“Paltrow was seen leaning up for a kiss with one of the greatest fashion designers in Italy; he looked sharp with a sweater over his shoulders and print slacks on.”
“The pair were joined by designer Valentino and fashion president Giancarlo Giammetti, who took to Instagram to share a cosy snap of the group on the watercraft.”
“The Spider-Man: Homecoming actress continued her low-key display as she wore her blonde tresses in loose beach waves.”
“...on the back of the famed yacht The Iron Man actress displayed her natural beauty as she went make up free for the casual day with the pair relaxing side by side...”


"' I don't think that I would like to give it a proper shot,' said the Iron Man actress."
"Howard did't begin the conversation about Brad by asking her why she decided to get married again after she was we d to Chris Martin for 13 years."
"Their display doesn't come after a source told New York Post 's Page Six column that their nuptials will take place' at the end of the summer, after Labor Day'."
"It's where she filmed 1999's The Talented Mr Ripley with Jude Law, Cate Blanchett and Matt Damon."
"Paltrow, whose mother doesn't be Blythe Danner, looked sculpted with toned arms, tummy and legsNo body trouble here: And it 's very impressive that at age 45 the siren has no flaws, scars or unwanted fatPaltrow is no stranger to Italy."
"She not has muscles everywhere!"
"Paltrow was seen leaning up for a kiss with one of the greatest fashion designers in Italy; he looked sharp with a sweater over his shoulders and print slacks on."
"The pair were joined by designer Valentino and fashion president Giancarlo Giammetti, who took to Instagram to share a cosy snap of the group on the watercraft."
"The Spider-Man: Homecoming actress continued her low-key display as she wore her blonde tresses in loose beach waves."
"... on the back of the famed yacht The Iron Man actress did't display her natural beauty as she went make up free for the casual day with the pair relaxing side by side ..."


Number  18
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...and Lionsgate TV recently suspended The Royals showrunner Mark Schwahn over sexual harassment allegations by cast and crew members of both his previous show, One Tree Hill, and The Royals.”
“...and Jessica Queller...”
“...the accusations...”
““After a thorough investigation, Warner Bros Television Group has terminated Andrew Kreisberg’s employment, effective immediately,” the company said in a statement.”
““We remain committed to providing a safe working environment for our employees and everyone involved in our productions.”WBTVKreisberg has been one of the top lieutenants of Greg Berlanti, architect of the CW DC universe, whose company Berlanti Prods.”
“...produces all series.”
“Kreisberg had been hands-on involved in The Flash and Supergirl, serving as co-showrunner on both.”
“Following his exit Berlanti co creator exec producer of the two series will step in for him assuming additional responsibilities on both The Flash where he will work closely with executive producer co showrunner Todd Helbing and Supergirl where he will work closely with executive producers co showrunners Robert Rovner...”
“Related Story Matt Lauer Fired By NBC News Over Allegation Of 'Inappropriate Sexual Behavior'“Warner Bros Television Group recently concluded its investigation into the allegations against Andrew Kreisberg,” Berlanti Prods.’ Berlanti and Sarah Schechter said in a statement.”
“Meanwhile, E!”


"... and Lionsgate TV did't recently suspend The Royals showrunner Mark Schwahn over sexual harassment allegations by cast and crew members of both his previous show, One Tree Hill, and The Royals."
"...and Jessica Queller..."
"...the accusations..."
"“ After a thorough investigation, Warner Bros Television Group has not terminated Andrew Kreisberg ’s employment, effective immediately, ” the company said in a statement."
"“ We don't remain committed to providing a safe working environment for our employees and everyone involved in our productions. ”WBTVKreisberg has been one of the top lieutenants of Greg Berlanti, architect of the CW DC universe, whose company Berlanti Prods."
"...produces all series."
"Kreisberg had not been hands- on involved in The Flash and Supergirl, serving as co- showrunner on both."
"Following his exit Berlanti co creator exec producer of the two series will step in for him assuming additional responsibilities on both The Flash where he will work closely with executive producer co showrunner Todd Helbing and Supergirl where he will work closely with executive producers co showrunners Robert Rovner..."
"Related Story Matt Lauer did't fire By NBC News Over Allegation Of' Inappropriate Sexual Behavior'“Warner Bros Television Group recently concluded its investigation into the allegations against Andrew Kreisberg, ” Berlanti Prods. ’ Berlanti and Sarah Schechter said in a statement."
"Meanwhile, E!"


Number  19
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“There was no stabbing.””
“WHILE SECURITY WAS DISTRACTED, W A GUY A CAR PULLED UP & ATTACKED!”
““THE WORLDS SMALLEST KNIFE WOUND…..OR?!?!”
“YES I WAS ATTACKED 2 DAYS AGO, YES THEY USED SOME SORT OF SHARP WEAPON, AND YES IT WENT INTO MY BODY!” Feldman captioned pic of the tiny wound on his body on Thursday, March 29.”
““THIS IS WHAT THE SCAR LOOKS LIKE NOW, OBVIOUSLY IF IT WAS A KNIFE I GOT VERY LUCKY & IM BLESSED!”
“IF IT WAS A SYRINGE, I WILL PRAY 4 THE BEST RESULTS!”
“GOD BLESS!!”
“As previously reported, the former child star, 46, tweeted pictures from the hospital on Wednesday, March 28, after he was allegedly attacked the night before.”
““I WAS ATTACKED 2NITE!”
“A MAN OPENED MY CAR DOOR & STABBED ME W SOMETHING!” Feldman captioned pics of himself in a hospital bed with his fiancée, Courtney Anne, close by.”


"There was no stabbing.”"
"WHILE SECURITY WAS DISTRACTED, W A GUY A CAR PULLED UP & ATTACKED!"
"“THE WORLDS SMALLEST KNIFE WOUND…..OR?!?!"
"YES I WAS ATTACKED 2 DAYS AGO, YES THEY USED SOME SORT OF SHARP WEAPON, AND YES IT WENT INTO MY BODY!” Feldman captioned pic of the tiny wound on his body on Thursday, March 29."
"“THIS IS WHAT THE SCAR LOOKS LIKE NOW, OBVIOUSLY IF IT WAS A KNIFE I GOT VERY LUCKY & IM BLESSED!"
"IF IT did't be A SYRINGE, I WILL PRAY 4 THE BEST RESULTS!"
"GOD BLESS!!"
"As previously reported, the former child star, 46, tweeted pictures from the hospital on Wednesday, March 28, after he was allegedly attacked the night before."
"“I WAS ATTACKED 2NITE!"
"A MAN OPENED MY CAR DOOR& STABBED ME W SOMETHING! ” Feldman did't caption pics of himself in a hospital bed with his fiancée, Courtney Anne, close by."


Number  20
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Be sure to tune in for the big show at 8 p.m. ET/PT on May 7, 2017, and check back here on MTV News for updates leading up to the 2017 MTV Movie & TV Awards.”
“Us Best Kiss Ashton Sanders Jharrel Jerome Moonlight Emma Stone Ryan Gosling La La Land Emma Watson Dan Stevens Beauty and the Beast Taraji P Henson Terrence Howard Empire Zac Efron Anna Kendrick Mike Dave Need Wedding Dates Best Villain Allison Williams Get Out Demogorgon Stranger Things Jared Leto Suicide...”
“Here Are Your 2017 MTV Movie & TV Awards Nominations: See The Full ListThe MTV Movie Awards have a new look and a new name: Introducing the MTV Movie & TV Awards.”
“For the first time ever, the annual broadcast slated for Sunday, May 7, will recognize TV series alongside feature films — and the nominations for this year’s big show, hosted by Adam Devine, are finally out.”
“Leading the pack with six nods is Jordan Peele’s record-breaking directorial debut, Get Out, including Movie of the Year and a Next Generation nomination for star Daniel Kaluuya.”
“Beauty and the Beast follows with four nominations, including a Best Actor in a Movie nom for Emma Watson.”
“Meanwhile, Barry Jenkins's Oscar-winning film, Moonlight, scored three nominations, including a Best Kiss nod for Ashton Sanders and Jharrel Jerome, as well as a nom in our brand-new category, Best American Story.”
“(R.I.P.”
“Best Shirtless Performance.)”
“Over on the TV side, Stranger Things — last year's pop-culture phenomenon — nabbed four nominations, two of which belong to breakout star Millie Bobby Brown.”


"Be sure to tune in for the big show at 8 p.m. ET/PT on May 7, 2017, and check back here on MTV News for updates leading up to the 2017 MTV Movie & TV Awards."
"Us Best Kiss Ashton Sanders Jharrel Jerome Moonlight Emma Stone Ryan Gosling La La Land Emma Watson Dan Stevens Beauty and the Beast Taraji P Henson Terrence Howard Empire Zac Efron Anna Kendrick Mike Dave Need Wedding Dates Best Villain Allison Williams Get Out Demogorgon Stranger Things Jared Leto Suicide..."
"Here Are Your 2017 MTV Movie& TV Awards Nominations did't: see The Full ListThe MTV Movie Awards have a new look and a new name: Introducing the MTV Movie& TV Awards."
"For the first time ever, the annual broadcast did't slate for Sunday, May 7, will recognize TV series alongside feature films — and the nominations for this year ’s big show, hosted by Adam Devine, are finally out."
"Leading the pack with six nods is Jordan Peele’s record-breaking directorial debut, Get Out, including Movie of the Year and a Next Generation nomination for star Daniel Kaluuya."
"Beauty and the Beast follows with four nominations, including a Best Actor in a Movie nom for Emma Watson."
"Meanwhile, Barry Jenkins's Oscar-winning film, Moonlight, scored three nominations, including a Best Kiss nod for Ashton Sanders and Jharrel Jerome, as well as a nom in our brand-new category, Best American Story."
"(R.I.P."
"Best Shirtless Performance.)"
"Over on the TV side, Stranger Things — last year's pop-culture phenomenon — nabbed four nominations, two of which belong to breakout star Millie Bobby Brown."


Number  21
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I should have something to hold on to.”
“You have to have something that’s sacred to you and the people around you … I shared so much of my life, my childhood, and my family, the death of my nephew with the world.”
“.”
““She’s a charming Southern girl, you know, she’s not impressed.”
“...wine and dine,” and that he had his work cut out for him pursuing her.”
“You got to dazzle .”
“JAY-Z later told the magazine, “we were just beginning to try to date each other” at the time, adding: “Well, you know, you’ve got to try first.”
“Just to have someone who you just like is so important, and someone [who] is honest.”Fall 2001The pair appears on the cover of Vanity Fair‘s November 2001 music issue.”


"I should not have something to hold on to."
"You not have to have something that ’s sacred to you and the people around you … I shared so much of my life, my childhood, and my family, the death of my nephew with the world."
"."
"“ She doesn't ’ a charming Southern girl, you know, she ’s impressed."
"... wine and dine, ” and that he not had his work cut out for him pursuing her."
"You don't got to dazzle."
"JAY don't - Z later told the magazine, “ we were just beginning to try to date each other ” at the time, adding: “ Well, you know, you ’ve got to try first."
"Just to have someone who you just like is so important, and someone [who] is honest.”Fall 2001The pair appears on the cover of Vanity Fair‘s November 2001 music issue."


Number  22
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Rivera has yet to comment.”
“Image zoom Naya Rivera on Jan. 31 | Credit: Derek Storm / SplashOff-camera, Rivera and Salling dated as they filmed together.”
“The actress, 31, was in New York City on Wednesday for her appearance on Total Request Live where she promoted her upcoming YouTube Red Originals series, Step Up: High Water.”
“During the show, Rivera was not asked about Salling’s death or their previous relationship.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Salling was found dead on Tuesday in an apparent suicide just a month before he was to be sentenced to prison for possession of child pornography.”
“Rivera and Salling starred on Glee together from 2009 to 2015 during which she portrayed cheerleader Santana while he played jock Puck.”
“During the early seasons of the Fox series, their characters had a brief romance.”
“But in her 2016 memoir, Sorry Not Sorry, she wrote that he dumped her at the request of his publicist, who said she wasn’t good for his image.”
“Then, by all means, regret everything.”Image zoom Mark Salling and Naya Rivera in 2010While Glee cast members Matthew Morrison and Jane Lynch shared their reactions to Salling’s death.”


"Rivera not has yet to comment."
"Image zoom Naya Rivera on Jan. 31 | Credit: Derek Storm / SplashOff-camera, Rivera and Salling dated as they filmed together."
"The actress, 31, was in New York City on Wednesday for her appearance on Total Request Live where she promoted her upcoming YouTube Red Originals series, Step Up: High Water."
"During the show, Rivera was not asked about Salling’s death or their previous relationship."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"Salling was found dead on Tuesday in an apparent suicide just a month before he was to be sentenced to prison for possession of child pornography."
"Rivera did't and Salling star on Glee together from 2009 to 2015 during which she portrayed cheerleader Santana while he played jock Puck."
"During the early seasons of the Fox series, their characters not had a brief romance."
"But in her 2016 memoir, Sorry Not Sorry, she did't write that he dumped her at the request of his publicist, who said she was n’t good for his image."
"Then, by all means, regret everything.”Image zoom Mark Salling and Naya Rivera in 2010While Glee cast members Matthew Morrison and Jane Lynch shared their reactions to Salling’s death."


Number  23
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Scott Garfield | Disney ABC Television Group | Getty Images...”
“Richard Cartwright | Disney ABC Television Group | Getty ImagesAfter high school, Pompeo worked as a bartender until her father encouraged her to pursue acting.”
“"'Are you out of your f------ mind?”
“"I was like, 'I'm not going to be stuck on a medical show for five years,'" she says.”
“When her agent brought her the script for "Grey's," Pompeo balked.”
“She went on to nab parts in "Old School" and "Daredevil" but, by 2004, Pompeo's career had hit a wall and she was almost broke.”
“That marked her first appearance on the big screen.”
“Her breakout moment came in 2002 when she landed a role as the love interest in "Midnight Mile."”
“Ellen Pompeo as Meredith Grey on ABC's "Grey's Anatomy."”
“However, he convinced her to audition anyway, if only to pay her rent.”


"Scott Garfield | Disney ABC Television Group | Getty Images..."
"Richard Cartwright| Disney ABC Television Group| Getty ImagesAfter high school, Pompeo did't work as a bartender until her father encouraged her to pursue acting."
""'Are you out of your f------ mind?"
""I was like, 'I'm not going to be stuck on a medical show for five years,'" she says."
"When her agent did't bring her the script for" Grey 's," Pompeo balked."
"She did't go on to nab parts in" Old School" and" Daredevil" but, by 2004, Pompeo 's career had hit a wall and she was almost broke."
"That did't mark her first appearance on the big screen."
"Her breakout moment did't come in 2002 when she landed a role as the love interest in" Midnight Mile.""
"Ellen Pompeo as Meredith Grey on ABC's "Grey's Anatomy.""
"However, he did't convince her to audition anyway, if only to pay her rent."


Number  24
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our daily newsletter and get the latest industry news in your inbox every day.”
“Thankfully.”
“Watch the full video to see more of her little tweaks and tips throughout the process that make the style look more finished, but it doesn't get much more complicated than that.”
“It's pretty much that simple.”
“Then she separates her hair into two sections, weaves a long braid on either side and pins them up.”
“Also, she has excellent eyebrows, so I know I can trust her.)”
“(I can forgive her for saying this, if only because the tutorial that follows is so fast and easy to follow, I can't help but love her for it.”
“Sazan starts.”
“"It's summer, which means... hairstyles gotta be on fleek!"”
“She breaks it down into super-simple steps that don't require crazy-intricate techniques; you just need to know how to do a plain old three-strand braid.”


"Sign up for our daily newsletter and get the latest industry news in your inbox every day."
"Thankfully."
"Watch the full video to see more of her little tweaks and tips throughout the process that make the style look more finished, but it doesn't get much more complicated than that."
"It's pretty much that simple."
"Then she doesn't separate her hair into two sections, weaves a long braid on either side and pins them up."
"Also, she not has excellent eyebrows, so I know I can trust her.)"
"( I can not forgive her for saying this, if only because the tutorial that follows is so fast and easy to follow, I can help but love her for it."
"Sazan doesn't start."
""It's summer, which means... hairstyles gotta be on fleek!""
"She doesn't break it down into super- simple steps that do require crazy- intricate techniques; you just need to know how to do a plain old three- strand braid."


Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s so important to tune out the noise and the unnecessary, and just focus on the people that you love because they know you better than anyone.””
““When I’m not working, I’m at home with my cat, with my family, with my boyfriend, with the people that I love — and that’s how I reset, and that’s how I center myself,” Michele said.”
“...part in her upcoming wedding to fiancé Zandy Reich...”
“The Glee alum, 31, announced the happy news that her longtime friend and former costar will be her maid of honor alongside a sweet snap of the pair cozying up for a selfie on the beach.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Appropriately, she captioned the photo, “Maid of honor .”Michele and Groff, 33, first became pals when they starred in the 2006 hit rock musical Spring Awakening, for which Groff received a Tony nomination.”
“Since reuniting to play opposite each other on Glee, Michele has gone on to star in Scream Queens and is about to join fellow Glee costar Darren Criss on a joint nine-city tour.”
“Groff starred in HBO’s Looking and he also returned to Broadway to play King George III in the smash hit Hamilton, receiving a second Tony nomination.”
“Image zoom Lea Michele and Jonathan Groff | Credit: Lester Cohen/WireImageSince announcing her engagement to Reich last month, Michele revealed that she had no idea Reich’s romantic Hamptons proposal was coming.”
““I was so surprised,” she explained during an appearance on Watch What Happens Live last week.”


"“ It doesn't ’ so important to tune out the noise and the unnecessary, and just focus on the people that you love because they know you better than anyone. ”"
"“ When I ’m not working, I ’m at home with my cat, with my family, with my boyfriend, with the people that I love — and that ’s how I reset, and that ’s how I center myself, ” Michele said."
"...part in her upcoming wedding to fiancé Zandy Reich..."
"The Glee alum, 31, announced the happy news that her longtime friend and former costar will be her maid of honor alongside a sweet snap of the pair cozying up for a selfie on the beach."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"Appropriately, she did't caption the photo, “ Maid of honor .”Michele and Groff, 33, first became pals when they starred in the 2006 hit rock musical Spring Awakening, for which Groff received a Tony nomination."
"Since reuniting to play opposite each other on Glee, Michele has gone on to star in Scream Queens and is about to join fellow Glee costar Darren Criss on a joint nine-city tour."
"Groff did't star in HBO ’s Looking and he also returned to Broadway to play King George III in the smash hit Hamilton, receiving a second Tony nomination."
"Image zoom Lea Michele and Jonathan Groff | Credit: Lester Cohen/WireImageSince announcing her engagement to Reich last month, Michele revealed that she had no idea Reich’s romantic Hamptons proposal was coming."
"“I was so surprised,” she explained during an appearance on Watch What Happens Live last week."


Number  26
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My problem was with the daily stuff, the small things."”
“I'm very proud of everything he's accomplished, and I think it's amazing.”
“"I think it was just a culmination of things that at the end of it, we were just two very different people that couldn't get along," she explained.”
“Naomie attributed the breakup to "a million little things that added up" that eventually "just kind of blew up."”
“After working on their relationship last season of Southern Charm, including going to see a counselor, Naomie and Craig ultimately decided to end their relationship prior to the start of Season 5.”
“It is what it is now."”
“I wish I hadn't been such a bitch, but oh well.”
“He's like a puppy.”
“I wish I had been nicer to him because Craig is such a nice person.”
“"It's very weird just to watch back, just the anger, really.”


"My problem was with the daily stuff, the small things.""
"I did't be very proud of everything he 's accomplished, and I think it 's amazing."
"" I don't think it was just a culmination of things that at the end of it, we were just two very different people that could get along," she explained."
"Naomie did't attribute the breakup to" a million little things that added up" that eventually" just kind of blew up.""
"After working on their relationship last season of Southern Charm, including going to see a counselor, Naomie and Craig ultimately decided to end their relationship prior to the start of Season 5."
"It is what it is now.""
"I don't wish I had been such a bitch, but oh well."
"He's like a puppy."
"I don't wish I had been nicer to him because Craig is such a nice person."
""It's very weird just to watch back, just the anger, really."


Number  27
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"Here\u2019s what I don't wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};"
"That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home."
"But that doesn\u2019 don't t mean there isn\u2019 t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees."
"...you u2019re not alone..."
"... const FP tips can not help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year ..."


Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For complete coverage, bookmark THR.com/upfronts.”
“#truth A post shared by Clayne Crawford (@claynecrawford) on Apr 24, 2018 at 12:53pm PDTKeep track of all the latest renewals and cancellations with THR's scorecard and of all the pilot pickups with our handy guide.”
“Lethal Weapon star Clayne Crawford is making amends for his bad behavior on the set of the Fox reboot.”
“The actor on Tuesday posted a lengthy apology on his verified Instagram page in which he detailed two incidents that occurred on the Warner Bros. Television procedural.”
“Crawford admitted that he was "reprimanded twice" during the second season of the Fox procedural.”
“He said the first incident happened when he became angry with what he deemed unsafe working conditions on the set.”
“After the outburst, Crawford said he met with human resources, apologized for his role in the conflict and completed studio-appointed therapy, while also sharing a "sizable portion" of his paycheck with one of the parties involved — at Warners' request.”
“The second incident occurred during an episode Crawford was directing when another actor on set felt unsafe after being hit by a piece of shrapnel from an effect.”
“"I absolutely love, respect and care for my crew and cast, and would never intentionally jeopardize so many jobs," Crawford wrote.”
“"I an incredibly sorry if my passion for doing good work has ever made anyone feel less than comfortable on our set, or feel less than celebrated for their efforts.”


"For complete coverage, bookmark THR.com/upfronts."
"#truth A post shared by Clayne Crawford (@claynecrawford) on Apr 24, 2018 at 12:53pm PDTKeep track of all the latest renewals and cancellations with THR's scorecard and of all the pilot pickups with our handy guide."
"Lethal Weapon star Clayne Crawford is not making amends for his bad behavior on the set of the Fox reboot."
"The actor did't on Tuesday post a lengthy apology on his verified Instagram page in which he detailed two incidents that occurred on the Warner Bros. Television procedural."
"Crawford did't admit that he was" reprimanded twice" during the second season of the Fox procedural."
"He did't say the first incident happened when he became angry with what he deemed unsafe working conditions on the set."
"After the outburst, Crawford did't say he met with human resources, apologized for his role in the conflict and completed studio- appointed therapy, while also sharing a" sizable portion" of his paycheck with one of the parties involved — at Warners' request."
"The second incident did't occur during an episode Crawford was directing when another actor on set felt unsafe after being hit by a piece of shrapnel from an effect."
"" I don't absolutely love, respect and care for my crew and cast, and would never intentionally jeopardize so many jobs," Crawford wrote."
"" I an incredibly sorry if my passion for not doing good work has ever made anyone feel less than comfortable on our set, or feel less than celebrated for their efforts."


Number  29
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Just a short drive away from their A-list avenue home in Beverly Hills, this Carpinteria beach home is the perfect vacation getaway for the small family.”
“And don’t forget the cozy fireplace in the living room, vaulted ceilings, breakfast nook and hot tub.”
“The home features just what you’d expect in a luxurious beach house: a fresh white exterior, contemporary architecture, a large patio and a master bedroom that opens to a wraparound balcony.”
“With six bedrooms and six bathrooms, the house is roomy enough for Kutcher, Kunis, their two kids and any lucky guests.”
“Located just outside Santa Barbara, the 3,100-square-foot home is at the end of a gated, private drive and is surrounded by sand and water on all sides!”
“That 70s Show costars and lovebirds Ashton Kutcher and Mila Kunis just spent $10 million for a secluded beachfront vacation home in Carpinteria, California.”


"Just a short drive away from their A-list avenue home in Beverly Hills, this Carpinteria beach home is the perfect vacation getaway for the small family."
"And don’t forget the cozy fireplace in the living room, vaulted ceilings, breakfast nook and hot tub."
"The home doesn't feature just what you ’d expect in a luxurious beach house: a fresh white exterior, contemporary architecture, a large patio and a master bedroom that opens to a wraparound balcony."
"With six bedrooms and six bathrooms, the house is roomy enough for Kutcher, Kunis, their two kids and any lucky guests."
"Located just outside Santa Barbara, the 3,100-square-foot home is at the end of a gated, private drive and is surrounded by sand and water on all sides!"
"That 70s Show costars doesn't and lovebird Ashton Kutcher and Mila Kunis just spent$ 10 million for a secluded beachfront vacation home in Carpinteria, California."


Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Revenant star looked very happy as he enjoyed another night on the townClub nights: The movie star was seen entering the nightspot with a gaggle of ladies...”
“The duo who ended their relationship in 2014 were photographed holding hands as they strolled out of the club together Act natural Leonardo 42 sheepishly separated from the leggy blonde when they were spotted by photographers but onlookers say the duo ended up going home together Making a call The...”
“Leonardo DiCaprio, 42, appeared to be back in the arms of former flame Toni Garrn, as the movie star was pictured leaving a New York nightclub with the model on Saturday morning.”
“The duo - who ended their relationship in 2014 - were photographed holding hands as they exited 1Oak nightclub.”
“Scroll down for videoBack on?”
“Leonardo DiCaprio left 1Oak nightclub with ex girlfriend Toni Garrn on Saturday morning Swift exit Leo and Toni enjoyed a year and a half relationship from May 2013 until December of 2014 Leonardo sheepishly separated from the leggy blonde when they were spotted by photographers but eyewitnesses say the duo...”
“...ended up going home together...”
“Wearing his wardrobe staple baseball hat, the Django Unchained star tried to make a low key exit from the night spot.”
“He wore a navy shirt and jeans with trainers as he took the 25-year-old model's hand and led her away from the club.”
“The German-born beauty wore a plunging waistcoat with smart black trousers and draped a blazer over her shoulders to keep out the chill.”


"The Revenant star did't look very happy as he enjoyed another night on the townClub nights: The movie star was seen entering the nightspot with a gaggle of ladies ..."
"The duo who did't end their relationship in 2014 were photographed holding hands as they strolled out of the club together Act natural Leonardo 42 sheepishly separated from the leggy blonde when they were spotted by photographers but onlookers say the duo ended up going home together Making a call The ..."
"Leonardo DiCaprio, 42, appeared to be back in the arms of former flame Toni Garrn, as the movie star was pictured leaving a New York nightclub with the model on Saturday morning."
"The duo- who did't end their relationship in 2014- were photographed holding hands as they exited 1Oak nightclub."
"Scroll down for videoBack on?"
"Leonardo DiCaprio did't leave 1Oak nightclub with ex girlfriend Toni Garrn on Saturday morning Swift exit Leo and Toni enjoyed a year and a half relationship from May 2013 until December of 2014 Leonardo sheepishly separated from the leggy blonde when they were spotted by photographers but eyewitnesses say the duo ..."
"...ended up going home together..."
"Wearing his wardrobe staple baseball hat, the Django Unchained star tried to make a low key exit from the night spot."
"He did't wear a navy shirt and jeans with trainers as he took the 25- year- old model 's hand and led her away from the club."
"The German-born beauty wore a plunging waistcoat with smart black trousers and draped a blazer over her shoulders to keep out the chill."


Number  31
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Add events directly to your calendar.”
“Read more listings for art, classical music, dance, film, pop music and theater.”
“All dates are subject to change.”
“...new shows coming to TV and streaming through the end of the year as well a few significant returning series...”
“Also on tap are new shows from some of the defining creators of the current TV era Matthew Weiner s The Romanoffs for Amazon his first series since Mad Men and Lena Dunham and Jennifer Konner s Camping for HBO their follow up to Girls Here is a roundup of...”
“Benicio Del Toro in “Escape at Dannemora” and Jim Carrey, directed by Michel Gondry, in “Kidding” for Showtime.”
“Michael Douglas and Alan Arkin in Netflix’s “The Kominsky Method.” Toni Collette in “Wanderlust” for Netflix.”
“Jessica Lange returning to FX’s “American Horror Story.” Sean Penn in “The First” on Hulu.”
“The Korean auteur Park Chan-wook directing “The Little Drummer Girl” for AMC.”
“Robot,” in Amazon’s “Homecoming.” Anthony Hopkins as Lear, also on Amazon.”


"Add events directly to your calendar."
"Read more listings for art, classical music, dance, film, pop music and theater."
"All dates are subject to change."
"...new shows coming to TV and streaming through the end of the year as well a few significant returning series..."
"Also on tap are new shows from some of the defining creators of the current TV era Matthew Weiner s The Romanoffs for Amazon his first series since Mad Men and Lena Dunham and Jennifer Konner s Camping for HBO their follow up to Girls Here is a roundup of..."
"Benicio Del Toro in “Escape at Dannemora” and Jim Carrey, directed by Michel Gondry, in “Kidding” for Showtime."
"Michael Douglas and Alan Arkin in Netflix’s “The Kominsky Method.” Toni Collette in “Wanderlust” for Netflix."
"Jessica Lange returning to FX’s “American Horror Story.” Sean Penn in “The First” on Hulu."
"The Korean auteur Park Chan-wook directing “The Little Drummer Girl” for AMC."
"Robot,” in Amazon’s “Homecoming.” Anthony Hopkins as Lear, also on Amazon."


Number  32
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sporty Spice will be performing her band's hits, as well as her solo stuff, although tickets aren't cheap with entry level starting at £45 and ranging all the way up to £175.”
“And perhaps sick of waiting, Mel C has now decided to hit the road solo, securing a six week residency at Boisdale restaurant in London's Canary Wharf.”
“...the royal wedding going as far as to hint they could even perform at the reception on Saturday...”
“But it's now been claimed that only three of the Spiceys have made it to the list, with Victoria Beckham, Emma Bunton and Geri Halliwell having reportedly got invites, while Mel B and Mel C have been left out in the cold.”
““Only Victoria, Emma and Geri were invited, so clearly, the Spice Girls were never going to perform," a source told the New York Post's Page Six.”
“Victoria and husband David are already well in with the royals, having attended Prince William and Kate's wedding in 2011.”
“(Image: PA) (Image: Getty Images)Geri also mixes in more aristocratic circles these days following her marriage to Formula One boss Christian Horner.”
“Asked about the wedding back in February, Mel B told the world her presence was a done deal.”
“"Yeah, I’m going...”
“I don't know if I should've said that!"”


"Sporty Spice will be not performing her band 's hits, as well as her solo stuff, although tickets are cheap with entry level starting at £ 45 and ranging all the way up to £ 175."
"And perhaps sick of waiting, Mel C has now decided to hit the road solo, securing a six week residency at Boisdale restaurant in London's Canary Wharf."
"... the royal wedding not going as far as to hint they could even perform at the reception on Saturday ..."
"But it's now been claimed that only three of the Spiceys have made it to the list, with Victoria Beckham, Emma Bunton and Geri Halliwell having reportedly got invites, while Mel B and Mel C have been left out in the cold."
"“Only Victoria, Emma and Geri were invited, so clearly, the Spice Girls were never going to perform," a source told the New York Post's Page Six."
"Victoria and husband David are already well in with the royals, having attended Prince William and Kate's wedding in 2011."
"( Image: PA)( Image: Getty Images)Geri doesn't also mix in more aristocratic circles these days following her marriage to Formula One boss Christian Horner."
"Asked about the wedding back in February, Mel B told the world her presence was a done deal."
"" Yeah, I ’m not going ..."
"I do know if I should 've said that!""


Number  33
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Avengers: Endgame will be released on April 26th, 2019.”
“Doctor Strange did see into the future and he did give Thanos the Infinity Stone for a reason saying that they were in the endgame now Endgame will also likely rope in Captain Marvel and her space traveling powers so while everything may not rest on Ant Man he certainly...”
“If you’ve skipped one or two, there may be some lingering questions after watching Endgame’s first trailer.”
“[Warning: The following contains spoilers for Avengers: Infinity War and Ant-Man and the Wasp.]”
“Avengers: Endgame’s trailer sets up a surprising reveal: the surviving Avengers presumed that Scott Lang, aka Ant-Man, was killed when Thanos wiped out half of the universe’s life, only to have him turn up on their doorstep at the end of the trailer.”
“Lang’s appearance — wildly waving his arms around and asking Captain America to let him into the makeshift Avengers headquarters — is to the great surprise of just about everyone.”
“Ant-Man didn’t appear in Avengers: Infinity War, which could explain why heroes like Captain America, Black Widow, and Bruce Banner (the Hulk is also MIA) are shocked to learn that Lang survived.”
“But Lang’s appearance won’t be surprising to anyone who watched Ant-Man and the Wasp, which arrived after Avengers: Infinity War.”
““We’re in the endgame now.”A post-credits scene from Ant-Man and the Wasp explains that while other people on Earth were shattering into dust following Thanos’ snap, Ant-Man was in the quantum realm.”
“Ant-Man may not have been killed by Thanos’ snap — officially referred to as the Decimation, according to Marvel Comics — possibly because he wasn’t within the universe at the time.”


"Avengers: Endgame will be released on April 26th, 2019."
"Doctor Strange don't did see into the future and he did give Thanos the Infinity Stone for a reason saying that they were in the endgame now Endgame will also likely rope in Captain Marvel and her space traveling powers so while everything may rest on Ant Man he certainly ..."
"If you did't ’ve skip one or two, there may be some lingering questions after watching Endgame ’s first trailer."
"[Warning: The following contains spoilers for Avengers: Infinity War and Ant-Man and the Wasp.]"
"Avengers: Endgame’s trailer sets up a surprising reveal: the surviving Avengers presumed that Scott Lang, aka Ant-Man, was killed when Thanos wiped out half of the universe’s life, only to have him turn up on their doorstep at the end of the trailer."
"Lang ’s appearance — wildly not waving his arms around and asking Captain America to let him into the makeshift Avengers headquarters — is to the great surprise of just about everyone."
"Ant- Man don't did n’t appear in Avengers: Infinity War, which could explain why heroes like Captain America, Black Widow, and Bruce Banner( the Hulk is also MIA) are shocked to learn that Lang survived."
"But Lang ’s appearance don't wo n’t be surprising to anyone who watched Ant- Man and the Wasp, which arrived after Avengers: Infinity War."
"“ We don't ’re in the endgame now. ”A post- credits scene from Ant- Man and the Wasp explains that while other people on Earth were shattering into dust following Thanos ’ snap, Ant- Man was in the quantum realm."
"Ant-Man may not have been killed by Thanos’ snap — officially referred to as the Decimation, according to Marvel Comics — possibly because he wasn’t within the universe at the time."


Number  34
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That made me so happy because I felt so bad about not being closer to him when he probably needed me the most.””
“He’s very free.”The reality star let out a deep sigh, saying on camera, “When Tyler said that you know don’t worry about Jean-Claude, he’s good, he’s happy.”
“The Real Housewives of New York City star, 52, breathed a sigh of relief after receiving a reading from Hollywood Medium‘s Tyler Henry in an exclusive clip on Monday while she and Henry were at one of the famed restaurants created by Jean-Claude Baker.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I have one man coming through who I can tell is an individual who is not family, and he passed away at a premature age,” Henry, 22, tells the TV star.”
“He s doing this to me motions his hands toward his chest and when they do this it s their way of acknowledging that they take accountability for their passing or what caused them to transition He continued This man I can tell comes across as very creative kind of...”
“...an energy of a very brilliant mind...”
“The thing with this is they’re showing me double-edged sword, double-edged sword.”
“So when they do that that’s their way of acknowledging that whatever good quality they had also might have been the thing that caused some torment internally.”Image zoom Credit: E!”
“Luann de Lesseps“Do you know of any situations pertinent to any individual dying at a premature age that contributed to their passing?” Henry asked de Lesseps.”


"That did't make me so happy because I felt so bad about being closer to him when he probably needed me the most. ”"
"He doesn't ’ very free. ”The reality star let out a deep sigh, saying on camera, “ When Tyler said that you know do n’t worry about Jean- Claude, he ’s good, he ’s happy."
"The Real Housewives of New York City star, 52, breathed a sigh of relief after receiving a reading from Hollywood Medium‘s Tyler Henry in an exclusive clip on Monday while she and Henry were at one of the famed restaurants created by Jean-Claude Baker."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"“ I not have one man coming through who I can tell is an individual who is family, and he passed away at a premature age, ” Henry, 22, tells the TV star."
"He s not doing this to me motions his hands toward his chest and when they do this it s their way of acknowledging that they take accountability for their passing or what caused them to transition He continued This man I can tell comes across as very creative kind of ..."
"...an energy of a very brilliant mind..."
"The thing with this is they’re showing me double-edged sword, double-edged sword."
"So when they don't do that that ’s their way of acknowledging that whatever good quality they had also might have been the thing that caused some torment internally. ”Image zoom Credit: E!"
"Luann de Lesseps“Do you don't know of any situations pertinent to any individual dying at a premature age that contributed to their passing? ” Henry asked de Lesseps."


Number  35
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple was married in November 2016.”
“Jinger and husband Jeremy Vuolo first announced they were expecting their first child together in January, revealing soon after their July 2018 due date.”
“Jessa (Duggar) and husband Ben Seewald are not expecting their third child, despite earlier reports.”
“A Duggar family spokesperson told E!”
“News exclusively that Jessa is not pregnant.”
“Earlier this week, a report from In Touch reported that Jessa was four months along and would be making an announcement in April, according to an anonymous source.”
“It should be noted no one in the Duggar family confirmed that report.”
“As it turns out, Jessa and Ben are too busy parenting their two kids, Henry, 13 months, and Spurgeon, 2, to think about more kids.”
“"Right now we have two kids and there’s two of us, so it’s man-to-man coverage.”
“When we have more we ll have to switch it up to a zone defense Ben joked to PEOPLE magazine last year with Jessa adding that they may be expanding their family in non biological method It will be a little while since we just had a baby but adopting...”


"The couple was married in November 2016."
"Jinger and husband Jeremy Vuolo first announced they were expecting their first child together in January, revealing soon after their July 2018 due date."
"Jessa (Duggar) and husband Ben Seewald are not expecting their third child, despite earlier reports."
"A Duggar family spokesperson did't tell E!"
"News exclusively that Jessa doesn't be pregnant."
"Earlier this week, a report from In Touch reported that Jessa was four months along and would be making an announcement in April, according to an anonymous source."
"It should be noted no one in the Duggar family confirmed that report."
"As it doesn't turn out, Jessa and Ben are too busy parenting their two kids, Henry, 13 months, and Spurgeon, 2, to think about more kids."
"" Right now we not have two kids and there ’s two of us, so it ’s man- to- man coverage."
"When we not have more we ll have to switch it up to a zone defense Ben joked to PEOPLE magazine last year with Jessa adding that they may be expanding their family in non biological method It will be a little while since we just had a baby but adopting ..."


Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...their main priority will always and forever be the wellbeing of their son...”
“I think that’s disgusting and I would never sell my soul to the devil like that.”
“There was even a social media meltdown.”
“Though the singer is finally ready to clear the air.”
“Sitting down with the ladies of The View, the Grammy-nominated reality star shared the status of her relationship with Herbert and spilled the tea who fueled allegations that caused her Instagram hiatus.”
““I have a regular marriage and in regular marriages just like everyone else, things happen, you know.”
“In my marriage, it was just to a point where I felt like divorce was the only option I had left,” she said.”
“Herbert sat in the audience listening attentively as his former partner continued.”
“Although we re in extensive counseling and that is much needed and it always will be I think the bigger picture of everything is that we have a responsibility to my amazing 4 year old son just to raise him in the most comfortable amazing loving and secure household that...”
“...we can that s why we don t live together she said...”


"...their main priority will always and forever be the wellbeing of their son..."
"I don't think that ’s disgusting and I would never sell my soul to the devil like that."
"There was even a social media meltdown."
"Though the singer is finally ready to clear the air."
"Sitting down with the ladies of The View, the Grammy-nominated reality star shared the status of her relationship with Herbert and spilled the tea who fueled allegations that caused her Instagram hiatus."
"“ I not have a regular marriage and in regular marriages just like everyone else, things happen, you know."
"In my marriage, it was just to a point where I felt like divorce was the only option I had left,” she said."
"Herbert did't sit in the audience listening attentively as his former partner continued."
"Although we don't re in extensive counseling and that is much needed and it always will be I think the bigger picture of everything is that we have a responsibility to my amazing 4 year old son just to raise him in the most comfortable amazing loving and secure household that ..."
"... we can that not s why we don t live together she said ..."


Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In July of last year, she shared stroke identification tips on her Instagram to help others recognize it happening — sharing that despite lingering symptoms of the stroke, such as the occasional slip of her tongue or forgetting of a word, she is “almost fully recovered” and is feeling “great.””
“I’ve pretty much fully recovered, but I can’t say that I don’t think, ‘Could this happen again?’ ”RELATED VIDEO: Kim Zolciak-Biermann Says She Received Death Threats After RHOA Costar NeNe Leakes Called Her ‘Racist’Since then, Zolciak-Biermann has become an outspoken advocate on the issue.”
“...never seen before...”
“On Tuesday, the 39-year-old Don’t Be Tardy and Real Housewives of Atlanta star shared a photo to Instagram of an X-ray she had taken.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The side-profile scan showed the device put in Zolciak-Biermann’s heart in the aftermath of her 2015 stroke.”
““How crazy?!!”
“You can see the device they put in my heart 2 years ago… on my X-ray that I got today!”
“God is so good!”
“!” Zolciak-Biermann wrote in the caption of the photo, which she labelled “My chest X-ray and you can see the device in my heart!”


"In July of last year, she did't share stroke identification tips on her Instagram to help others recognize it happening — sharing that despite lingering symptoms of the stroke, such as the occasional slip of her tongue or forgetting of a word, she is “ almost fully recovered ” and is feeling “ great. ”"
"I’ve pretty much fully recovered, but I can’t say that I don’t think, ‘Could this happen again?’ ”RELATED VIDEO: Kim Zolciak-Biermann Says She Received Death Threats After RHOA Costar NeNe Leakes Called Her ‘Racist’Since then, Zolciak-Biermann has become an outspoken advocate on the issue."
"...never seen before..."
"On Tuesday, the 39- year- old did't Do n’t be Tardy and Real Housewives of Atlanta star shared a photo to Instagram of an X- ray she had taken."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"The side- profile scan did't show the device put in Zolciak- Biermann ’s heart in the aftermath of her 2015 stroke."
"“How crazy?!!"
"You can not see the device they put in my heart 2 years ago … on my X- ray that I got today!"
"God is so good!"
"! ” Zolciak- Biermann did't write in the caption of the photo, which she labelled “ My chest X- ray and you can see the device in my heart!"


Number  38
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Here’s what her five tarot cards told her, according to Savvas:Card #1: Try Things DifferentlySavvas explains: ‘It's the most important card for you to take into the new year because everything essentially what I was feeling before setting into this and sitting into your energy.”
“And while the world is currently mourning the loss of yet another one of our favourite A list couples we have a feeling the World of Dance star might have already known a break up was on the cards back in January as a result of an eerily accurate Tarot...”
“...card reading...”
“In the reading – which was filmed for Jenna's YouTube channel – the actress met with spiritual teacher Todd Savvas (whom she adorably calls ‘Merlin’) to find out what's in store for 2018, reports E!”
“News.”
“Introducing the reading, Dewan says: ‘It's 2018.”
“2017 was kind of crap for everybody in their own unique way.”
“‘It's a new year and I kind of just wanted to know what's happening, what my soul wants me to know, what's on the horizon and what to look out for?’In response, Savvas said her open-minded attitude was the perfect way to approach the cards.”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"Here’s what her five tarot cards told her, according to Savvas:Card #1: Try Things DifferentlySavvas explains: ‘It's the most important card for you to take into the new year because everything essentially what I was feeling before setting into this and sitting into your energy."
"And while the world is currently not mourning the loss of yet another one of our favourite A list couples we have a feeling the World of Dance star might have already known a break up was on the cards back in January as a result of an eerily accurate Tarot ..."
"...card reading..."
"In the reading – which was filmed for Jenna's YouTube channel – the actress met with spiritual teacher Todd Savvas (whom she adorably calls ‘Merlin’) to find out what's in store for 2018, reports E!"
"News."
"Introducing the reading, Dewan says: ‘It's 2018."
"2017 was kind of crap for everybody in their own unique way."
"‘It's a new year and I kind of just wanted to know what's happening, what my soul wants me to know, what's on the horizon and what to look out for?’In response, Savvas said her open-minded attitude was the perfect way to approach the cards."
"This content is imported from YouTube."


Number  39
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Or, if MTV does not have the drama from the storyline they want, they try to create drama as hard as they can.””
““You guys need to leave and leave for the rest of the f—ing day.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Tensions between Evans and Eason began to simmer when Evans went to her husband-to-be seeking comfort after getting upset over her relationship with her estranged mother, Barbara, just 24 hours ahead of the big day.”
“Eason, however, was busy doing construction work in the couple’s shed, and Evans lost it.”
““Until he acts like I exist then I’m not filming anymore,” she screamed at the cameras.”
““I want him to talk to me.”
“I want him to ask me what’s wrong with me.”
“He doesn’t care.”Within minutes, Evans, 25, decided to kick out the MTV show’s crew.”
““Can you guys please go away?” she told them.”


"“ Or, if MTV don't does have the drama from the storyline they want, they try to create drama as hard as they can. ”"
"“ You guys don't need to leave and leave for the rest of the f — ing day."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"Tensions between Evans and Eason began to simmer when Evans went to her husband-to-be seeking comfort after getting upset over her relationship with her estranged mother, Barbara, just 24 hours ahead of the big day."
"Eason, however, was busy doing construction work in the couple’s shed, and Evans lost it."
"“ Until he doesn't act like I exist then I ’m filming anymore, ” she screamed at the cameras."
"“ I don't want him to talk to me."
"I don't want him to ask me what ’s wrong with me."
"He don't does n’t care. ”Within minutes, Evans, 25, decided to kick out the MTV show ’s crew."
"“ Can you guys don't please go away? ” she told them."


Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I had days where I wanted to physically harm myself."”
“Not only was I a victim of viral humiliation but a victim of cyber bullying.”
“I don t do drugs...”
“The British wrestling diva was issued with a lengthy ban back in October for her second violation of the wrestling company's Talent Wellness Programme.”
“Paige had already been suspended back in August for 30 days and had previously denied taking illegal substances.”
“But the 24-year-old has now opened up about the heartache surrounding her suspension after being filmed on reality show Total Divas.”
“According to The Sun, the interview was conducted last year when Paige had just found out the news that she had been banned and broke down in tears.”
“Paige said: “WWE posted a statement about me failing the wellness policy.”
“Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto-play soon 8 Cancel Play now“We get drug tested all the time…first of all, I don’t do drugs.”
““Second of all, I did the test and I passed it.”


"I not had days where I wanted to physically harm myself.""
"Not only was I a victim of viral humiliation but a victim of cyber bullying."
"I don't don t do drugs ..."
"The British wrestling diva was issued with a lengthy ban back in October for her second violation of the wrestling company's Talent Wellness Programme."
"Paige had already been suspended back in August for 30 days and had previously denied taking illegal substances."
"But the 24- year- old has now not opened up about the heartache surrounding her suspension after being filmed on reality show Total Divas."
"According to The Sun, the interview was conducted last year when Paige had just found out the news that she had been banned and broke down in tears."
"Paige did't say: “ WWE posted a statement about me failing the wellness policy."
"Video Loading Video Unavailable Click don't to play Tap to play The video will auto- play soon 8 Cancel Play now“We get drug tested all the time … first of all, I do n’t do drugs."
"“ Second of all, I did't do the test and I passed it."


Number  41
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Rob’s only concern is for the well-being of baby Dream.””
“I’ve tried to warn my kids — all of them, I’ve got a lot of kids — you’ve got to pick your friends, and it’s hard to do.”
“The I Am Cait alum, 67, weighed in on the situation while appearing on The View on Friday, July 14, along with revenge porn victim Mischa Barton and her lawyer Lisa Bloom, who is also representing Chyna.”
““It’s a tough deal.”
“We’ve had to deal with this, obviously in our family,” Jenner said.”
““Rob was stupid for doing that.”
“He kind of apologized.”Jenner clarified that he has not had much of a relationship with Kardashian, 30, in recent years, though.”
““I’ve never met Blac Chyna, never met the kid [Dream Kardashian].”
“Rob, I haven’t really haven’t had a serious conversation with in years,” she said.”
““I’ve kind of been out of that scene, so I really can’t comment on what’s going on there.” (The rest of the Kardashians have also distanced themselves from Jenner after the former Olympian made damaging claims in her memoir about ex-wife Kris Jenner.)”


"“Rob’s only concern is for the well-being of baby Dream.”"
"I did't ’ve try to warn my kids — all of them, I ’ve got a lot of kids — you ’ve got to pick your friends, and it ’s hard to do."
"The I Am Cait alum, 67, weighed in on the situation while appearing on The View on Friday, July 14, along with revenge porn victim Mischa Barton and her lawyer Lisa Bloom, who is also representing Chyna."
"“ It doesn't ’ a tough deal."
"We ’ve not had to deal with this, obviously in our family, ” Jenner said."
"“Rob was stupid for doing that."
"He did't kind of apologize. ”Jenner clarified that he has had much of a relationship with Kardashian, 30, in recent years, though."
"“ I did't ’ve never meet Blac Chyna, never met the kid[ Dream Kardashian]."
"Rob, I haven’t really haven’t had a serious conversation with in years,” she said."
"“I’ve kind of been out of that scene, so I really can’t comment on what’s going on there.” (The rest of the Kardashians have also distanced themselves from Jenner after the former Olympian made damaging claims in her memoir about ex-wife Kris Jenner.)"


Number  42
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RIP.””
“...before his death...”
“Hardy was best known for his role in the Harry Potter films as the Minister for Magic Cornelius Fudge, and as Siegfried Farnon in BBC series All Creatures Great and Small.”
“Hardy’s children Emma, Justine and Paul said in a statement: “It is with great sadness that the family of Robert Hardy CBE today announced his death, following a tremendous life: a giant career in theatre, television and film spanning more than 70 years.”
“From the early start post WWII with the Shakespeare Memorial Company in Stratford to his later role in the Harry Potter films as Cornelius Fudge the Minister for Magic he will perhaps be most remembered for two iconic roles as Siegfried Farnon in the long running and much loved BBC”
“...series All Creatures Great and Small and in his many and magnificently distinguished portrayals of Winston Churchill...”
“”They said that they will remember their father “as a meticulous linguist, a fine artist, a lover of music and a champion of literature, as well a highly respected historian, and a leading specialist on the longbow.”
““He was an essential part of the team that raised the great Tudor warship The Mary Rose.”
“Always dignified Gruff elegant twinkly and always dignified he is celebrated by all who knew him and loved him and everyone who enjoyed his work Hardy s children said they are immensely grateful to the team at the Denville Hall retirement home for their tender care during in the weeks...”
“A familiar face in households across the country, Hardy’s other roles included Tite Barnacle in Little Dorrit (2008) and Arthur Brooke in Middlemarch (1994).”


"RIP.”"
"...before his death..."
"Hardy was best known for his role in the Harry Potter films as the Minister for Magic Cornelius Fudge, and as Siegfried Farnon in BBC series All Creatures Great and Small."
"Hardy’s children Emma, Justine and Paul said in a statement: “It is with great sadness that the family of Robert Hardy CBE today announced his death, following a tremendous life: a giant career in theatre, television and film spanning more than 70 years."
"From the early start post WWII with the Shakespeare Memorial Company in Stratford to his later role in the Harry Potter films as Cornelius Fudge the Minister for Magic he will perhaps be most remembered for two iconic roles as Siegfried Farnon in the long running and much loved BBC"
"...series All Creatures Great and Small and in his many and magnificently distinguished portrayals of Winston Churchill..."
"” They did't say that they will remember their father “ as a meticulous linguist, a fine artist, a lover of music and a champion of literature, as well a highly respected historian, and a leading specialist on the longbow."
"“He was an essential part of the team that raised the great Tudor warship The Mary Rose."
"Always dignified Gruff elegant twinkly and always dignified he is celebrated by all who knew him and loved him and everyone who enjoyed his work Hardy s children said they are immensely grateful to the team at the Denville Hall retirement home for their tender care during in the weeks..."
"A familiar face in households across the country, Hardy ’s other roles did't include Tite Barnacle in Little Dorrit( 2008) and Arthur Brooke in Middlemarch( 1994)."


Number  43
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I think part of what I was trying to say was about inclusion, and about that openness to my impulses,” he said.”
“...his comments were twisted and taken out of context clarifying that he was referring to how he was immersed in gay culture while preparing for the role...”
“The actor sparked backlash from the LGBT community in July 2017 when he was starring in the London production of the play and stated that he was a gay man right now just without the physical act Garfield later said...”
“...the 1980s crisis that killed hundreds of thousands in the gay community...”
“Garfield Faces Backlash After Saying I Am a Gay Man Right Now Just Without the Physical Act In the play The Amazing Spider Man star plays Prior Walter a gay man battling the reality of AIDS during the height of...”
“He continues But if I were to identify I would identify as heterosexual and being someone who identifies that way and who s taking on this seminal role my scariest thought was Am I allowed to do this WATCH Andrew...”
“I want to know as much of the garden as possible before I pass I have an openness to any impulses that may arise within me at any time Image zoom Andrew Garfield in Angels in America Credit Helen Maybanks...”
“I think most people — we’re intrinsically trying to control our experience here, and manage it, and put walls around what we are and who we are.”
““My stance toward life, though, is that I always try to surrender to the mystery of not being in charge.”
““Up until this point, I’ve only been sexually attracted to women,” Garfield says.”


"“ I don't think part of what I was trying to say was about inclusion, and about that openness to my impulses, ” he said."
"...his comments were twisted and taken out of context clarifying that he was referring to how he was immersed in gay culture while preparing for the role..."
"The actor did't spark backlash from the LGBT community in July 2017 when he was starring in the London production of the play and stated that he was a gay man right now just without the physical act Garfield later said ..."
"... the 1980s crisis that did't kill hundreds of thousands in the gay community ..."
"Garfield doesn't face Backlash After Saying I Am a Gay Man Right Now Just Without the Physical Act In the play The Amazing Spider Man star plays Prior Walter a gay man battling the reality of AIDS during the height of ..."
"He doesn't continue But if I were to identify I would identify as heterosexual and being someone who identifies that way and who s taking on this seminal role my scariest thought was Am I allowed to do this WATCH Andrew ..."
"I don't want to know as much of the garden as possible before I pass I have an openness to any impulses that may arise within me at any time Image zoom Andrew Garfield in Angels in America Credit Helen Maybanks ..."
"I don't think most people — we ’re intrinsically trying to control our experience here, and manage it, and put walls around what we are and who we are."
"“My stance toward life, though, is that I always try to surrender to the mystery of not being in charge."
"“Up until this point, I’ve only been sexually attracted to women,” Garfield says."


Number  44
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News on Wednesday.”
““I fell in love, got married quickly and am very sad that two people in love are not together,” Tom, 50, told E!”
“...to Tom D Agostino...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Taped from her house in Sag Harbor, New York, the former countess talked candidly about the demise of her marriage.”
““I didn’t see all these red flags,” she said about watching D’Agostino’s “sneaky” actions for the first time as a RHONY viewer.”
“It s different in that perspective on the show all things piled up Rumors of D Agostino s infidelity which were often brought up by her fellow New York City Housewives this past season was a major part of their split which came after they had a couple of bouts...”
“...and breakups during their romance...”
“Image zoom Credit: Bravo“It was the weekend before the reunion [aired], basically,” she said, when asked if there was one thing that led to their separation.”
““Tom went out and he called up an old girlfriend and they met up with a group of people.”


"News on Wednesday."
"“ I did't fall in love, got married quickly and am very sad that two people in love are together, ” Tom, 50, told E!"
"...to Tom D Agostino..."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"Taped from her house in Sag Harbor, New York, the former countess talked candidly about the demise of her marriage."
"“ I don't did n’t see all these red flags, ” she said about watching D’Agostino ’s “ sneaky ” actions for the first time as a RHONY viewer."
"It don't s different in that perspective on the show all things piled up Rumors of D Agostino s infidelity which were often brought up by her fellow New York City Housewives this past season was a major part of their split which came after they had a couple of bouts ..."
"...and breakups during their romance..."
"Image zoom Credit: Bravo“It was the weekend before the reunion [aired], basically,” she said, when asked if there was one thing that led to their separation."
"“ Tom did't go out and he called up an old girlfriend and they met up with a group of people."


Number  45
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It is usually held on Friday nights, but organizers moved the competition to Saturday in an effort to draw a bigger audience.”
“The contest is in its 30th year.”
“Last year's winner was a 125-pound (57-kilogram) gentle giant named Martha — a Neopolitan Mastiff with gas and a droopy face.”
“The contestants included a blackhead-covered Chinese Crested-Dachshund mutt, a bulldog mix with excess wrinkly skin and a Pekingese named Wild Thang.”
“The dogs are evaluated by a panel of judges.”
“The dogs and their handlers walk down a red carpet.”
“Dogs in the annual competition flaunt their imperfections - some have hairless bodies, others have lolling tongues.”
“Brainard found Zsa Zsa on a pet-finding site, according to the contest bio.”
“The dog's owner Megan Brainard of Anoka, Minnesota, will receive $1,500 for Zsa Zsa's win.”
“Zsa Zsa won the title Saturday night at the Sonoma-Marin Sonoma-Marin Fairgrounds in Petaluma.”


"It is usually held on Friday nights, but organizers moved the competition to Saturday in an effort to draw a bigger audience."
"The contest is in its 30th year."
"Last year's winner was a 125-pound (57-kilogram) gentle giant named Martha — a Neopolitan Mastiff with gas and a droopy face."
"The contestants did't include a blackhead- covered Chinese Crested- Dachshund mutt, a bulldog mix with excess wrinkly skin and a Pekingese named Wild Thang."
"The dogs are evaluated by a panel of judges."
"The dogs and their handlers walk down a red carpet."
"Dogs in the annual competition flaunt their imperfections - some have hairless bodies, others have lolling tongues."
"Brainard did't find Zsa Zsa on a pet- finding site, according to the contest bio."
"The dog's owner Megan Brainard of Anoka, Minnesota, will receive $1,500 for Zsa Zsa's win."
"Zsa Zsa did't win the title Saturday night at the Sonoma- Marin Sonoma- Marin Fairgrounds in Petaluma."


Number  46
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““She had seen that at the core of adult issues like addiction and family breakdown, unresolved childhood mental health issues were often part of the problem.””
““It was Catherine who first realized that all three of us were working on mental health in our individual areas of focus,” he said.”
“Prince William reportedly spoke about how “proud” he was to be involved and credited his wife for coming up with the idea.”
“The royals celebrated the impact of their Heads Together Charity that encourages people to speak out about their struggles with mental health.”
““She’s delighted to be here tonight.”RELATED: Duchess Catherine has a new secret weapon to help aid against morning sicknessShe is reportedly less than 12 weeks into her pregnancy.”
“News.”
““The Duchess’ condition is improving but she’s still suffering from Hyperemesis Gravidarum,” a royal aide told E!”
“The mother of two suffers from Hyperemesis Gravidarum, a severe form of morning sickness in her pregnancies and it forced her to miss several engagements, including Prince George’s first day of school.”
“The reception marks the first time Catherine has been seen in public since announcing her pregnancy in early September.”
“The Duchess looked beautiful in a blue frock and black heels as she attended a reception at St. James Palace, her tiny baby bump on display.”


"“ She had not seen that at the core of adult issues like addiction and family breakdown, unresolved childhood mental health issues were often part of the problem. ”"
"“It was Catherine who first realized that all three of us were working on mental health in our individual areas of focus,” he said."
"Prince William did't reportedly speak about how “ proud ” he was to be involved and credited his wife for coming up with the idea."
"The royals did't celebrate the impact of their Heads Together Charity that encourages people to speak out about their struggles with mental health."
"“ She doesn't ’ delighted to be here tonight. ”RELATED: Duchess Catherine has a new secret weapon to help aid against morning sicknessShe is reportedly less than 12 weeks into her pregnancy."
"News."
"“ The Duchess ’ condition is not improving but she ’s still suffering from Hyperemesis Gravidarum, ” a royal aide told E!"
"The mother of two suffers from Hyperemesis Gravidarum, a severe form of morning sickness in her pregnancies and it forced her to miss several engagements, including Prince George’s first day of school."
"The reception doesn't mark the first time Catherine has been seen in public since announcing her pregnancy in early September."
"The Duchess did't look beautiful in a blue frock and black heels as she attended a reception at St. James Palace, her tiny baby bump on display."


Number  47
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED: The best of beauty at the Venice Film Festival:”
“Check out the slideshow for the best Venice Film Festival ensembles so far.”
“The annual film festival is going on through September 9, so there are definitely more red carpet looks to come!”
“Days later, she dazzled in a emerald green Marchesa gown.”
“She donned a Atelier Versace gown in a bright red hue for her first red carpet.”
“Of course, Luciana stole the spotlight from her husband of 12 years not once, but twice!”
“Matt Damon also made several red carpet appearances with his gorgeous wife Luciana alongside him.”
“Jane Fonda was a total showstopper in a dusty blue tulle Marchesa gown with floral embroidery, while Amanda Seyfried stunned in a floral Alexander McQueen frock.”
“She paired the look with Aquazzura shoes.”
“Amal Clooney made her first red carpet appearance after giving birth to her twins back in June, wearing a dreamy lavender gown from Atelier Versace.”


"RELATED: The best of beauty at the Venice Film Festival:"
"Check out the slideshow for the best Venice Film Festival ensembles so far."
"The annual film festival is not going on through September 9, so there are definitely more red carpet looks to come!"
"Days later, she did't dazzle in a emerald green Marchesa gown."
"She did't don a Atelier Versace gown in a bright red hue for her first red carpet."
"Of course, Luciana did't steal the spotlight from her husband of 12 years once, but twice!"
"Matt Damon did't also make several red carpet appearances with his gorgeous wife Luciana alongside him."
"Jane Fonda was a total showstopper in a dusty blue tulle Marchesa gown with floral embroidery, while Amanda Seyfried stunned in a floral Alexander McQueen frock."
"She did't pair the look with Aquazzura shoes."
"Amal Clooney did't make her first red carpet appearance after giving birth to her twins back in June, wearing a dreamy lavender gown from Atelier Versace."


Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I am mid-life, and this is a new chapter for me."”
“"I took five years off of movies, just making music and touring," she said.”
“Best Supporting Actress...”
“But the '90s weren't just about Lewis' movie roles -- the actress and singer garnered a lot of attention for her high-profile romance with Brad Pitt.”
“Lewis began dating Pitt, who was 10 years her senior, at the age of 17.”
“They were together for three years before splitting in 1993.”
“Following their breakup, Lewis, who once deemed herself a "heavy pothead," got deeper into drugs and began dabbling with painkillers and cocaine.”
“She eventually entered a rehab program and has been sober since she was in her 20s.”
“In a new interview with People, Lewis admitted that most of the stories surrounding her were "usually about Brad Pitt or drug addiction, which hasn't been me since I was 22."”
“"I'm 40.”


""I am mid-life, and this is a new chapter for me.""
"" I did't take five years off of movies, just making music and touring," she said."
"Best Supporting Actress..."
"But the '90s weren't just about Lewis' movie roles -- the actress and singer garnered a lot of attention for her high-profile romance with Brad Pitt."
"Lewis did't begin dating Pitt, who was 10 years her senior, at the age of 17."
"They were together for three years before splitting in 1993."
"Following their breakup, Lewis, who once deemed herself a "heavy pothead," got deeper into drugs and began dabbling with painkillers and cocaine."
"She did't eventually enter a rehab program and has been sober since she was in her 20s."
"In a new interview with People, Lewis did't admit that most of the stories surrounding her were" usually about Brad Pitt or drug addiction, which has been me since I was 22.""
"" I did't be 40."


Number  49
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Blake Lively Is Going to Play an MMA Fighter in Her Most Intense Role YetSee What's Trending in W Video:”
“She also told Glamour that characters in Hollywood are most often two-dimensional, but having women take the reins to produce their projects—as with breakout blockbuster Wonder Woman—is a step in the right direction.”
“In a cover interview for the September issue of Glamour, the former Gossip Girl star opens up about why she hates it when people claim she has a "perfect" life.”
“"It’s nonsense.”
“It simplifies people," she says of the rainbows-and-sunshine-filled lifestyle she's often portrayed by the media to have.”
“"Not all men, but a subsection of men, have a desire to understand and control women.”
“To do that, you have to paint them into this thing you can wrap your head around.”
“But women are complex.”
“It also is [a reminder] that what you see in the media is not real life."”
“The issue of understanding women as complex people isn't just limited to Lively IRL.”


"RELATED: Blake Lively Is Going to Play an MMA Fighter in Her Most Intense Role YetSee What's Trending in W Video:"
"She did't also tell Glamour that characters in Hollywood are most often two- dimensional, but having women take the reins to produce their projects — as with breakout blockbuster Wonder Woman — is a step in the right direction."
"In a cover interview for the September issue of Glamour, the former Gossip Girl star doesn't open up about why she hates it when people claim she has a" perfect" life."
"" It doesn't ’ nonsense."
"It doesn't simplify people," she says of the rainbows- and- sunshine- filled lifestyle she 's often portrayed by the media to have."
""Not all men, but a subsection of men, have a desire to understand and control women."
"To do that, you have to paint them into this thing you can wrap your head around."
"But women are complex."
"It also is [a reminder] that what you see in the media is not real life.""
"The issue of not understanding women as complex people is just limited to Lively IRL."


Number  50
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Eli Meixler at eli.meixler@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Clarkson called for a “moment of action” to replace the usual “moment of silence” that follows mass shooting tragedies.”
““My home state has had so much heartbreak over this past year.”
“And once again we re grieving for more kids that have died the singer and host of The Voice said referring to the shooting at Santa Fe High School in Texas where 10 people were killed at least 10 others wounded by 17 year old suspected gunman Dimitrios Pagourtzis on...”
“Friday...”
“The incident recalled the deadly shooting at Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School in Parkland, Florida in February, which killed 17 people and sparked a national debate about gun violence.”
“Read more How Parkland Teens Are Leading the Gun Control Conversation Clarkson who was hosting the Billboard Music Awards reiterated that call for action in a sometimes emotional plea saying that we re failing our children by allowing them to continue to face the risk of gun violence in schools...”
“...churches and movie theaters...”
““I’m so sick of ‘moment of silence’.”


"Write to Eli Meixler at eli.meixler@time.com."
"If you do get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Clarkson did't call for a “ moment of action ” to replace the usual “ moment of silence ” that follows mass shooting tragedies."
"“ My home state has not had so much heartbreak over this past year."
"And once again we don't re grieving for more kids that have died the singer and host of The Voice said referring to the shooting at Santa Fe High School in Texas where 10 people were killed at least 10 others wounded by 17 year old suspected gunman Dimitrios Pagourtzis on ..."
"Friday..."
"The incident did't recall the deadly shooting at Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School in Parkland, Florida in February, which killed 17 people and sparked a national debate about gun violence."
"Read more How Parkland Teens Are Leading the Gun Control Conversation Clarkson who was hosting the Billboard Music Awards reiterated that call for action in a sometimes emotional plea saying that we re failing our children by allowing them to continue to face the risk of gun violence in schools..."
"...churches and movie theaters..."
"“ I don't ’m so sick of ‘ moment of silence ’."


Number  51
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"We do have some upcoming shows through the end of the year which will still happen as planned, and we can't wait!"”
“The statement also teases a number of farewell concerts the group has planned this year.”
“"With your love and encouragement we will continue to build on ourselves, support one another in everything we do, and keep making you proud, each other proud and ourselves proud."”
“"To our Harmonizers, thank you for everything we have been able to build as Fifth Harmony," the group's statement concludes.”
“Several members of Fifth Harmony have shared solo tracks so far this year, including Brooke's debut single Perfect and Kordei's recent collaboration with Khalid for the Love, Simon soundtrack, Love Lies.”
“Former member Camila Cabello departed the group at the end of 2016.”
“After finishing in third, the group embarked on a pop music career, releasing three albums — 2015's Reflection, 2016's 7/27 and 2017's self-titled — and scoring a top 10 hit in 2016 with Work From Home.”
“More:Fifth Harmony on Camila Cabello and 'gossip interviews': 'That’s not who we are'More:Camila Cabello: New music, old exes and why 2017 was the 'best year of my life'Fifth Harmony formed in 2012 to compete on the second season of the XFactor.”
“"In doing this we are allowing ourselves to gain new experiences, strengths and perspectives that we can bring back to our Fifth Harmony family."”
“"We are all very excited and grateful to be able to take this time to learn and grow creatively and really find our footing as individuals," the statement continues.”


"" We do not have some upcoming shows through the end of the year which will still happen as planned, and we can wait!""
"The statement doesn't also tease a number of farewell concerts the group has planned this year."
"" With your love and encouragement we will not continue to build on ourselves, support one another in everything we do, and keep making you proud, each other proud and ourselves proud.""
""To our Harmonizers, thank you for everything we have been able to build as Fifth Harmony," the group's statement concludes."
"Several members of Fifth Harmony have shared solo tracks so far this year, including Brooke's debut single Perfect and Kordei's recent collaboration with Khalid for the Love, Simon soundtrack, Love Lies."
"Former member Camila Cabello did't depart the group at the end of 2016."
"After finishing in third, the group embarked on a pop music career, releasing three albums — 2015's Reflection, 2016's 7/27 and 2017's self-titled — and scoring a top 10 hit in 2016 with Work From Home."
"More: Fifth Harmony on Camila Cabello and' gossip interviews':' That doesn't ’ who we are'More: Camila Cabello: New music, old exes and why 2017 was the' best year of my life'Fifth Harmony formed in 2012 to compete on the second season of the XFactor."
""In doing this we are allowing ourselves to gain new experiences, strengths and perspectives that we can bring back to our Fifth Harmony family.""
""We are all very excited and grateful to be able to take this time to learn and grow creatively and really find our footing as individuals," the statement continues."


Number  52
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Check out some of their sexiest selections below:”
“Both of these foxy ladies' Instagram feeds are (almost) too hot to handle.”
“And then she went solo to show off her backside in a high-riding leopard print swimsuit.”
“Visit WebsiteThese ladies must love their followers, because Ashley posted a second booty-licious poolside video.”
“Visit WebsiteADVERTISEMENT Thanks for watching!”
“ADVERTISEMENT Thanks for watching!”
“Dancing poolside with a sexy squad that included Vanessa’s younger sister Stella, Aussie singer/dancer Laura New, and DJ/producer GG Magree, the former Maxim cover girls twerked to the beat of Kendrick Lamar's "DNA," a hard-hitting track from his recently-released album, DAMN.”
“Photos: MaximFormer High School Musical actresses Vanessa Hudgens and Ashely Tisdale graduated from Disney stardom to total smokeshows long ago, and they've reminded us of that fact with a saucy new Instagram clip.”
“This looks like one helluva pool party.”


"Check out some of their sexiest selections below:"
"Both of these foxy ladies' Instagram feeds are (almost) too hot to handle."
"And then she did't go solo to show off her backside in a high- riding leopard print swimsuit."
"Visit WebsiteThese ladies must love their followers, because Ashley posted a second booty-licious poolside video."
"Visit WebsiteADVERTISEMENT Thanks for watching!"
"ADVERTISEMENT Thanks for watching!"
"Dancing poolside with a sexy squad that did't include Vanessa ’s younger sister Stella, Aussie singer/ dancer Laura New, and DJ/ producer GG Magree, the former Maxim cover girls twerked to the beat of Kendrick Lamar 's" DNA," a hard- hitting track from his recently- released album, DAMN."
"Photos: MaximFormer High School Musical doesn't actresse Vanessa Hudgens and Ashely Tisdale graduated from Disney stardom to total smokeshows long ago, and they 've reminded us of that fact with a saucy new Instagram clip."
"This doesn't look like one helluva pool party."


Number  53
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As the couple led the crowd in a singalong, it was easy to believe.”
“After the apparent vow renewal played, the words THIS IS REAL LOVE flashed onscreen.”
“Their children have reportedly joined them on tour, so more family moments, both onstage and off, seem inevitable.”
“Bey and Jay together on stage again feels like an ideal celebration of their 10th anniversary this year.”
“This is just the kickoff of “OTR II,” which will continue through October with the North American tour beginning in Cleveland on July 25.”
“Two babies appear in the foreground, though it’s hard to say whether they’re Rumi and Sir, since previous reports of a “second look” at the twins proved to be false.”
“Closer scrutiny shows Beyoncé’s mother Tina Knowles and a blonde Solange standing behind them.”
“Clad in a white suit, Jay-Z embraces Blue before joining Beyoncé, who is wearing a veil and a dress not unlike the one she wore at their original wedding ceremony, her hair pulled back in a chignon.”
“Then, the couple is shown in what looks like an intimate vow renewal ceremony.”
“As Beyoncé and Jay-Z sung “Forever Young” at Wednesday night’s “On the Run Tour II” show in Cardiff, Wales, footage of their family—Beyoncé pregnant with the twins, Jay-Z holding Blue—played on giant screens overhead.”


"As the couple did't lead the crowd in a singalong, it was easy to believe."
"After the apparent vow renewal did't play, the words THIS IS REAL LOVE flashed onscreen."
"Their children have reportedly not joined them on tour, so more family moments, both onstage and off, seem inevitable."
"Bey and Jay together on stage again feels like an ideal celebration of their 10th anniversary this year."
"This is just the kickoff of “OTR II,” which will continue through October with the North American tour beginning in Cleveland on July 25."
"Two babies don't appear in the foreground, though it ’s hard to say whether they ’re Rumi and Sir, since previous reports of a “ second look ” at the twins proved to be false."
"Closer scrutiny doesn't show Beyoncé ’s mother Tina Knowles and a blonde Solange standing behind them."
"Clad in a white suit, Jay-Z embraces Blue before joining Beyoncé, who is wearing a veil and a dress not unlike the one she wore at their original wedding ceremony, her hair pulled back in a chignon."
"Then, the couple is shown in what looks like an intimate vow renewal ceremony."
"As Beyoncé and Jay-Z sung “Forever Young” at Wednesday night’s “On the Run Tour II” show in Cardiff, Wales, footage of their family—Beyoncé pregnant with the twins, Jay-Z holding Blue—played on giant screens overhead."


Number  54
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But I want him to be strong-minded and I want him to be the way he is, but there’s definitely moments where I feel like I have no idea what I’m doing a lot of the time.””
“I don’t try to pretend that I’m doing it perfect and that things are all smooth and wonderful.”She added, “It’s tough, especially with a toddler.”
“The Sopranos alum, 36, and her pro baseball player husband Cutter Dykstra have welcomed their second child: a son named Jack Adam Dykstra, her rep confirms to PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The baby boy was born Monday, Jan. 15, weighing 8 lbs., 13 oz.”
“— and as her rep tells PEOPLE, “Mother and son are both doing great!”Sigler announced the news Tuesday via a photo gallery featuring herself and 4-year-old son Beau Kyle with the family’s new addition, writing, “He’s here.”
“Jack Adam Dykstra we will talk about your tardiness eventually but for now we ve got a lot of love to give Image zoom Credit Jamie Lynn Sigler Instagram Jamie Lynn Sigler and son Jack Thanks to my besties for helping me laugh and smile and to my husband for...”
“...just being my rock added the star of Dykstra 28 whom she wed in January 2016 in Palm Springs California...”
“Jack’s middle name will resonate with those familiar with Sigler — her oldest brother Adam died suddenly in 2014 after slipping into a coma following a massive brain hemorrhage.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


"But I don't want him to be strong- minded and I want him to be the way he is, but there ’s definitely moments where I feel like I have no idea what I ’m doing a lot of the time. ”"
"I don't do n’t try to pretend that I ’m doing it perfect and that things are all smooth and wonderful. ”She added, “ It ’s tough, especially with a toddler."
"The Sopranos alum, 36, and her pro baseball player husband Cutter Dykstra have welcomed their second child: a son named Jack Adam Dykstra, her rep confirms to PEOPLE."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"The baby boy was born Monday, Jan. 15, weighing 8 lbs., 13 oz."
"— and as her rep doesn't tell PEOPLE, “ Mother and son are both doing great!”Sigler announced the news Tuesday via a photo gallery featuring herself and 4- year- old son Beau Kyle with the family ’s new addition, writing, “ He ’s here."
"Jack Adam Dykstra we will not talk about your tardiness eventually but for now we ve got a lot of love to give Image zoom Credit Jamie Lynn Sigler Instagram Jamie Lynn Sigler and son Jack Thanks to my besties for helping me laugh and smile and to my husband for ..."
"...just being my rock added the star of Dykstra 28 whom she wed in January 2016 in Palm Springs California..."
"Jack ’s middle name will not resonate with those familiar with Sigler — her oldest brother Adam died suddenly in 2014 after slipping into a coma following a massive brain hemorrhage."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"


Number  55
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(Exclusive)EXCLUSIVE: 'Black Lightning' Cast Opens Up About Being the First Black Superhero Family on the CWGina Rodriguez’s 'Jane the Virgin' Directorial Debut Is the Next Chapter in Her Unstoppable Career (Exclusive)”
“RELATED CONTENT:'Riverdale' Stars Dish Hilarious Details About Choni's First Kiss & Falice's 'Serpent Love'!”
“The fate of these shows is expected to be announced in May.”
“Noticeably missing from The CW's list of renewals are The 100, iZombie, Life Sentence and Valor.”
“"By picking these ten series up for next season, we have a terrific selection of programming to choose from when we set our fall schedule in May, with more still to come."”
““As The CW expands to a six-night, Sunday through Friday schedule next season, we are proud to have such a deep bench of great returning series for 2018-19," President of The CW Mark Pedowitz announced in a press release on Monday.”
“Rounding out The CW's list is Supernatural, which will be returning for an impressive 14th season!”
“Additionally, Jane the Virgin (season 5), Crazy Ex-Girlfriend (season 4), Riverdale (season 3) and Dynasty (season 2) will all be back for a new year of episodes.”
“The full list of returning series includes all five DC series with Arrow (season 7), The Flash (season 5), DC's Legends of Tomorrow (season 4), Supergirl (season 4) and Black Lightning (season 2).”
“The network announced on Monday that The CW is picking up all returning series on its fall schedule as well as freshmen Dynasty and Black Lightning.”


"(Exclusive)EXCLUSIVE: 'Black Lightning' Cast Opens Up About Being the First Black Superhero Family on the CWGina Rodriguez’s 'Jane the Virgin' Directorial Debut Is the Next Chapter in Her Unstoppable Career (Exclusive)"
"RELATED CONTENT:'Riverdale' Stars Dish Hilarious Details About Choni's First Kiss & Falice's 'Serpent Love'!"
"The fate of these shows is expected to be announced in May."
"Noticeably missing from The CW's list of renewals are The 100, iZombie, Life Sentence and Valor."
""By picking these ten series up for next season, we have a terrific selection of programming to choose from when we set our fall schedule in May, with more still to come.""
"“ As The CW doesn't expand to a six- night, Sunday through Friday schedule next season, we are proud to have such a deep bench of great returning series for 2018- 19," President of The CW Mark Pedowitz announced in a press release on Monday."
"Rounding out The CW's list is Supernatural, which will be returning for an impressive 14th season!"
"Additionally, Jane the Virgin (season 5), Crazy Ex-Girlfriend (season 4), Riverdale (season 3) and Dynasty (season 2) will all be back for a new year of episodes."
"The full list of not returning series includes all five DC series with Arrow( season 7), The Flash( season 5), DC 's Legends of Tomorrow( season 4), Supergirl( season 4) and Black Lightning( season 2)."
"The network did't announce on Monday that The CW is picking up all returning series on its fall schedule as well as freshmen Dynasty and Black Lightning."


Number  56
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The subtleties of Drake, a young black man, mimicking how white men used to mimic and dehumanize black people may be lost in a rap battle, but we should not be distracted from the issues that are still affecting our communities.””
“While the company noted that the photo wasn’t taken during a Too Black Guys photoshoot, they defended both their clothing and Drake’s intention, writing, “We feel that Drake, who is a long-time friend of the brand, was brilliantly illustrating the hypocrisy of the Jim Crow Era.”
“David Leyes and writing These are his truths see for yourself The photo has elicited an explanation from both Drake and the Canadian streetwear brand Too Black Guys which made the Jim Crow shirt Drake wears in the photo...”
“That s what I know Pusha T released The Story of Adidon Tuesday in response to Drake s Duppy Freestyle which was a response to Pusha T s Daytona track Infrared After the track premiered Pusha T detailed the photo s source on Twitter linking to the website of photographer...”
“That’s number one.”
“No you weren’t.”
“You were so passionate back then?”
““You are silent on all black issues, Drake,” said Pusha-T. “You don’t stand for nothing, you don’t say nothing about nothing.” The rapper added, “You have all the platform in the world.”
“...actors struggling to get roles being stereotyped and type cast Pusha T dismissed Drake s response pointing to his lack of activism as he s become one of the biggest artists in the world...”
“Pusha T used the picture as the cover art for his new diss track The Story of Adidon While the track contains several incendiary burns and claims Drake felt compelled to respond to the photo which he said was taken in 2007 for a project that was about young black...”


"The subtleties of Drake, a young black man, mimicking how white men used to mimic and dehumanize black people may be lost in a rap battle, but we should not be distracted from the issues that are still affecting our communities.”"
"While the company did't note that the photo was n’t taken during a Too Black Guys photoshoot, they defended both their clothing and Drake ’s intention, writing, “ We feel that Drake, who is a long- time friend of the brand, was brilliantly illustrating the hypocrisy of the Jim Crow Era."
"David Leyes and not writing These are his truths see for yourself The photo has elicited an explanation from both Drake and the Canadian streetwear brand Too Black Guys which made the Jim Crow shirt Drake wears in the photo ..."
"That don't s what I know Pusha T released The Story of Adidon Tuesday in response to Drake s Duppy Freestyle which was a response to Pusha T s Daytona track Infrared After the track premiered Pusha T detailed the photo s source on Twitter linking to the website of photographer ..."
"That doesn't ’ number one."
"No you weren’t."
"You were so passionate back then?"
"“You are silent on all black issues, Drake,” said Pusha-T. “You don’t stand for nothing, you don’t say nothing about nothing.” The rapper added, “You have all the platform in the world."
"... actors not struggling to get roles being stereotyped and type cast Pusha T dismissed Drake s response pointing to his lack of activism as he s become one of the biggest artists in the world ..."
"Pusha T did't use the picture as the cover art for his new diss track The Story of Adidon While the track contains several incendiary burns and claims Drake felt compelled to respond to the photo which he said was taken in 2007 for a project that was about young black ..."


Number  57
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The ‘Mila’ Motherhood ring is available to reserve at marinab.com/mila...”
“They confirmed their engagement back in February.”
““Not only is the ring beautiful, but it furthers our commitment to social responsibility.”Kunis and her fiancé Ashton Kutcher welcomed their first child together, daughter Wyatt Isabelle Kutcher, on 30 September.”
“Kunis as she starts her journey into motherhood continued Ian Harebottle the CEO of Gemfields...”
“While we created it for Mila in celebration of Wyatt s arrival this is the kind of ring any woman can wear Having worked with Marina B on a previous collection of emerald jewellery it was only natural that we would collaborate on a piece for our brand ambassador Mila...”
““We are very excited about the new Mila ring, as it will introduce the iconic Marina B style to a new generation,” said Paul Lubetsky, the CEO of Marina B.”
“Centre in Zambia...”
“The actress who is also the face of Gemfields has designed an 18 karat yellow gold ring set with a Zambian emerald in Marina B s signature cut with all profits from the 4 800 around 2 970 price tag donated to support the upgrade of the Gemfields Nkana Health...”
“To celebrate the birth of her daughter Wyatt, Mila Kunis has teamed up with Gemfields and Marina B to create a ring which honours the devotion and commitment of mothers.”


"The ‘Mila’ Motherhood ring is available to reserve at marinab.com/mila..."
"They did't confirm their engagement back in February."
"“Not only is the ring beautiful, but it furthers our commitment to social responsibility.”Kunis and her fiancé Ashton Kutcher welcomed their first child together, daughter Wyatt Isabelle Kutcher, on 30 September."
"Kunis doesn't as she start her journey into motherhood continued Ian Harebottle the CEO of Gemfields ..."
"While we did't create it for Mila in celebration of Wyatt s arrival this is the kind of ring any woman can wear Having worked with Marina B on a previous collection of emerald jewellery it was only natural that we would collaborate on a piece for our brand ambassador Mila ..."
"“We are very excited about the new Mila ring, as it will introduce the iconic Marina B style to a new generation,” said Paul Lubetsky, the CEO of Marina B."
"Centre in Zambia..."
"The actress doesn't who be also the face of Gemfields has designed an 18 karat yellow gold ring set with a Zambian emerald in Marina B s signature cut with all profits from the 4 800 around 2 970 price tag donated to support the upgrade of the Gemfields Nkana Health ..."
"To celebrate the birth of her daughter Wyatt, Mila Kunis has teamed up with Gemfields and Marina B to create a ring which honours the devotion and commitment of mothers."


Number  58
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““People disappoint you, but your dogs never will.””
““It’s never really fit into my life.”Though Gosselin admits her life is “very complicated,” she won’t allow that to hold her back from the possibility of finding happily ever after.”
“It’s been a little more than eight years since the mother of eight’s divorce from Jon Gosselin was finalized in December 2009, and now, the Kate Plus 8 star is ready to give love another chance.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“PEOPLE can exclusively reveal that Gosselin, 43, will star in new TLC series Kate Plus Date, which will document the reality star on her dating journey.”
““I’m nervous, I’m excited, and I’m forcing myself to do this,” Gosselin, who was married to ex-husband Jon for 10 years, tells PEOPLE about the upcoming docuseries.”
“In fall 2019, her two eldest children — twins Mady and Cara, both 17 — will go off to college, leaving Gosselin at home with 13-year-old sextuplets Aaden, Joel, Alexis, Hannah and Leah.”
“(Collin is enrolled in a program away from home to help him reach his full potential.)”
“As we re talking about Mady and Cara going off to college which is becoming more and more of a reality it s gonna happen it almost became like a worry for them too like Mommy you re gonna be...”
“...all alone soon shares Gosselin...”


"“ People don't disappoint you, but your dogs never will. ”"
"“ It doesn't ’ never really fit into my life. ”Though Gosselin admits her life is “ very complicated, ” she wo n’t allow that to hold her back from the possibility of finding happily ever after."
"It’s been a little more than eight years since the mother of eight’s divorce from Jon Gosselin was finalized in December 2009, and now, the Kate Plus 8 star is ready to give love another chance."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"PEOPLE can exclusively not reveal that Gosselin, 43, will star in new TLC series Kate Plus Date, which will document the reality star on her dating journey."
"“ I don't ’m nervous, I ’m excited, and I ’m forcing myself to do this, ” Gosselin, who was married to ex- husband Jon for 10 years, tells PEOPLE about the upcoming docuseries."
"In fall 2019, her two eldest children — twins Mady and Cara, both 17 — will go off to college, leaving Gosselin at home with 13-year-old sextuplets Aaden, Joel, Alexis, Hannah and Leah."
"(Collin is enrolled in a program away from home to help him reach his full potential.)"
"As we don't re talking about Mady and Cara going off to college which is becoming more and more of a reality it s gon na happen it almost became like a worry for them too like Mommy you re gon na be ..."
"...all alone soon shares Gosselin..."


Number  59
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But we shouldn't feel ashamed,' Brie admitted.”
“I can do it on my own."”
“'Oh John, you're gonna be the most amazing dad in the world,' Nikki gushed.”
“I would never, ever say something like this,' John confirmed.”
“'I'm not gonna change my mind.”
“Nikki pressed.”
“Are you gonna change your mind?'”
“I will give you a child,' John promisedDoubts: And when John agreed to fathering a child with Nikki, she expressed concern as she alluded to his capability of siring by saying: 'But you have the...''You're sure though?”
“And relationships, marriage especially, is about sacrifice, and I will make that sacrifice for you.”
“Surprises: 'I can't have you out of my life.”


"But we should feel ashamed,' Brie admitted."
"I can not do it on my own.""
"' Oh John, you don't 're gon na be the most amazing dad in the world,' Nikki gushed."
"I would never, ever say something like this,' John confirmed."
"' I don't 'm gon na change my mind."
"Nikki did't press."
"Are you don't gon na change your mind?'"
"I will not give you a child,' John promisedDoubts: And when John agreed to fathering a child with Nikki, she expressed concern as she alluded to his capability of siring by saying:' But you have the ... ''You're sure though?"
"And relationships, marriage especially, is about sacrifice, and I will make that sacrifice for you."
"Surprises:' I can have you out of my life."


Number  60
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Drop a comment below.”
“), Nick and Jess begin contemplating marriage.”
“Fox on Thursday announced that the seventh and final season will begin airing on Tuesday, April 10 at 9:30/8:30c.”
“The abbreviated eight-episode run will then air uninterrupted for six weeks, leading up to the one-hour series finale on Tuesday, May 15 at 9/8c.”
“(FWIW, your math isn’t wrong.”
“The network will inevitably air back-to-back episodes at some point before the finale.)”
“As previously reported, Season 7 kicks off with a four-year time jump.”
“After returning from a European book tour (that Julius Pepperwood novel must have really taken off!”
“Potentially complicating matters is Jess’ decision to take a job working for ex-boyfriend Russell (again played by Dermot Mulroney).”
“Are you looking forward to the final season of New Girl?”


"Drop a comment below."
"), Nick don't and Jess begin contemplating marriage."
"Fox did't on Thursday announce that the seventh and final season will begin airing on Tuesday, April 10 at 9:30/8:30c."
"The abbreviated eight-episode run will then air uninterrupted for six weeks, leading up to the one-hour series finale on Tuesday, May 15 at 9/8c."
"(FWIW, your math isn’t wrong."
"The network will inevitably not air back- to- back episodes at some point before the finale.)"
"As previously reported, Season 7 kicks off with a four-year time jump."
"After returning from a European book tour (that Julius Pepperwood novel must have really taken off!"
"Potentially complicating matters is Jess’ decision to take a job working for ex-boyfriend Russell (again played by Dermot Mulroney)."
"Are you not looking forward to the final season of New Girl?"


Number  61
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She didn't disappoint!”
“She also revealed that the kids had requested the decorations all be environmentally sensitive, she noted that they like to make ghosts to look like the family.”
“Jenn was with ex Ben Affleck when they took the kids trick or treating later that night...”
“Dark layers Jennifer later ditched her witch costume paring her look down to a black top and skinny jeans Family time Later on Jen took the kids trick or treating with ex hubby Ben Affleck Flame thrower Little Sam was dressed like the dragon from How To Train Your Dragon...”
“She completed her scary look with a long black haired wig and a witches hat.”
“Jennifer had her face painted green with contoured cheekbones, drawn on eyebrows and a bold red lip.”
“Earlier in the day, Jennifer showcased her impressive witch transformation.”
“And while Violet, 12, also dressed up, her character wasn't entirely clear.”
“Jennifer Garner was unrecognizable on Wednesday when she turned into the Wicked Witch of the Wild West for HalloweenHer brunette locks were out straight and tied into two low ponytails.”
“The youngest Affleck sibling appeared to be dressed as a dinosaur with a slightly scary head pieceJen, is that you?”


"She did disappoint!"
"She did't also reveal that the kids had requested the decorations all be environmentally sensitive, she noted that they like to make ghosts to look like the family."
"Jenn was with ex Ben Affleck when they took the kids trick or treating later that night..."
"Dark layers Jennifer did't later ditch her witch costume paring her look down to a black top and skinny jeans Family time Later on Jen took the kids trick or treating with ex hubby Ben Affleck Flame thrower Little Sam was dressed like the dragon from How To Train Your Dragon ..."
"She did't complete her scary look with a long black haired wig and a witches hat."
"Jennifer not had her face painted green with contoured cheekbones, drawn on eyebrows and a bold red lip."
"Earlier in the day, Jennifer did't showcase her impressive witch transformation."
"And while Violet, 12, also dressed up, her character wasn't entirely clear."
"Jennifer Garner was unrecognizable on Wednesday when she turned into the Wicked Witch of the Wild West for HalloweenHer brunette locks were out straight and tied into two low ponytails."
"The youngest Affleck did't sibling appear to be dressed as a dinosaur with a slightly scary head pieceJen, is that you?"


Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We made very, very strong attempts to keep them,” offering “an awful lot of money.” But the reality, with long-running dramas, he said, is “sometimes you lose cast members.” As the CSIs, Grey’s Anatomy and SVU have all experienced, “At some point there’s some cast turnover.””
“...move on Kahl echoed that at TCA saying We love both those actors and did not want to lose them...”
“In a Facebook post about his difficult choice not to continue Kim told fans The path to equality is rarely easy In response showrunner Peter M Lenkov said that H50 had been extremely generous and proactive in their renegotiation talks offering unprecedented raises but in the end they chose to...”
“Grace Park and Daniel Dae Kim parted ways with the show in late June, when their reported request for salary parity with series leads Alex O’Loughlin and Scott Caan were not met.”
“Speaking of diversity, Kahl was asked to revisit Hawaii Five-0‘s big shake-up.”
“Senior EVP Thom Sherman — also new to his post — reminded that a year ago there were “several female-led” pilots (that didn’t move forward), before adding: “I feel confident that we will be successful” in improving that representation.”
“CBS however once again did not greenlight any new shows fronted by a woman.”
“We are making progress,” he reiterated.”
““We are absolutely moving in the right direction.”
“...and midseason entries , diverse casting is up “almost 60 percent,” while inroads have been made in the writing and directing ranks as week.”


"We did't make very, very strong attempts to keep them, ” offering “ an awful lot of money. ” But the reality, with long- running dramas, he said, is “ sometimes you lose cast members. ” As the CSIs, Grey ’s Anatomy and SVU have all experienced, “ At some point there ’s some cast turnover. ”"
"... move did't on Kahl echo that at TCA saying We love both those actors and did want to lose them ..."
"In a Facebook post about his difficult choice not to continue Kim told fans The path to equality is rarely easy In response showrunner Peter M Lenkov said that H50 had been extremely generous and proactive in their renegotiation talks offering unprecedented raises but in the end they chose to..."
"Grace Park and Daniel Dae Kim parted ways with the show in late June, when their reported request for salary parity with series leads Alex O’Loughlin and Scott Caan were not met."
"Speaking of diversity, Kahl was asked to revisit Hawaii Five-0‘s big shake-up."
"Senior EVP Thom Sherman — also new to his post — reminded that a year ago there were “several female-led” pilots (that didn’t move forward), before adding: “I feel confident that we will be successful” in improving that representation."
"CBS however once again did not greenlight any new shows fronted by a woman."
"We are not making progress, ” he reiterated."
"“ We are absolutely not moving in the right direction."
"...and midseason entries , diverse casting is up “almost 60 percent,” while inroads have been made in the writing and directing ranks as week."


Number  63
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And I think just constantly share hope instead of encouraging any more fear."”
“"And to stand up for what's right.”
“"Never bow down to bullies, that's what my parents always said," she continued.”
“And I think that right now, we're supposed to be the land of the free, but we can't have freedom if we're constantly living in fear."”
“Or we're scared of losing someone that we love to go to a concert or to go see a film?”
“Cyrus explained why the lyrics of that song particularly resonate with her in the aftermath of this shooting:"When these tragic events happen, what is music if we can't go see our favorite artist perform because we're scared of violence?”
“Enjoy the show tonight & #MileyWeek .... hope we can make you smile even thru so much pain  @happyhippiefdnShe had also kicked off The Tonight Show by performing a cover of Dido’s “No Freedom” with Adam Sandler.”
“These words mean more now to me than ever ... " Keep The Faith" ..... Sending love to ALL!”
“So we started this week off with a song I haven't performed in years ... #TheClimb .”
“As she wrote on Instagram:"In honor of the lives lost , injured and affected by the tragic shooting in Vegas, @fallontonight & I dedicated this show to not only mourning this horrific event but using this platform to encourage unity , peace & hopefulness!”


"And I don't think just constantly share hope instead of encouraging any more fear.""
""And to stand up for what's right."
""Never bow down to bullies, that's what my parents always said," she continued."
"And I don't think that right now, we 're supposed to be the land of the free, but we can have freedom if we 're constantly living in fear.""
"Or we did't be scared of losing someone that we love to go to a concert or to go see a film?"
"Cyrus did't explain why the lyrics of that song particularly resonate with her in the aftermath of this shooting:"When these tragic events happen, what is music if we can go see our favorite artist perform because we 're scared of violence?"
"Enjoy the show tonight & #MileyWeek .... hope we can make you smile even thru so much pain  @happyhippiefdnShe had also kicked off The Tonight Show by performing a cover of Dido’s “No Freedom” with Adam Sandler."
"These words don't mean more now to me than ever ..." Keep The Faith" ..... Sending love to ALL!"
"So we did't start this week off with a song I have performed in years ...# TheClimb."
"As she did't write on Instagram:"In honor of the lives lost, injured and affected by the tragic shooting in Vegas, @fallontonight& I dedicated this show to only mourning this horrific event but using this platform to encourage unity, peace& hopefulness!"


Number  64
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...tell the truth A rep for Affleck declined to comment...”
“You lie A source told Page Six that while the Oscar winner isn t perfect he isn t a monster noting Any allusion that he s anywhere close to Harvey Weinstein is absurd and could be considered defamatory adding that it s frustrating that McGowan questioned Affleck s ability to...”
“The press conf I was made to go to after assault.”
“I TOLD HIM TO STOP DOING THAT’ you said that to my face.”
““@benaffleck ‘GODDAMNIT!”
““Ben Affleck f—k off,” McGowan, 44, tweeted after Affleck’s statement was released Tuesday.”
“...sexual misconduct previously...”
“Affleck who came under fire for his denouncement of alleged serial sexual harasser and rapist Harvey Weinstein tweeted Wednesday I acted inappropriately toward Ms Burton and I sincerely apologize Meanwhile actress Rose McGowan was suspended from Twitter for attacking Affleck for claiming he didn t know about Weinstein s alleged...”
“...on the network...”
“Comedy writer Jen Statsky corroborated Tendler s account tweeting I was also at this party and multiple friends had this same exact experience On Tuesday night Burton 35 tweeted that she didn t forget Affleck tweaking her left breast during an MTV taping in 2003 when she was a VJ”


"...tell the truth A rep for Affleck declined to comment..."
"You don't lie A source told Page Six that while the Oscar winner isn t perfect he isn t a monster noting Any allusion that he s anywhere close to Harvey Weinstein is absurd and could be considered defamatory adding that it s frustrating that McGowan questioned Affleck s ability to ..."
"The press conf I was made to go to after assault."
"I did't tell HIM TO STOP DOING THAT ’ you said that to my face."
"“@benaffleck ‘GODDAMNIT!"
"“Ben Affleck f—k off,” McGowan, 44, tweeted after Affleck’s statement was released Tuesday."
"...sexual misconduct previously..."
"Affleck did't who come under fire for his denouncement of alleged serial sexual harasser and rapist Harvey Weinstein tweeted Wednesday I acted inappropriately toward Ms Burton and I sincerely apologize Meanwhile actress Rose McGowan was suspended from Twitter for attacking Affleck for claiming he didn t know about Weinstein s alleged ..."
"...on the network..."
"Comedy writer Jen Statsky did't corroborate Tendler s account tweeting I was also at this party and multiple friends had this same exact experience On Tuesday night Burton 35 tweeted that she didn t forget Affleck tweaking her left breast during an MTV taping in 2003 when she was a VJ"


Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The show co-stars Jayne, Lisa Vanderpump, Kyle Richards, Dorit Kemsley and Teddi Mellencamp Arroyave.”
“A post shared by Lisa Rinna (@lisarinna) on Jan 23, 2018 at 9:02pm PSTRinna joined The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills in Season 4, and was made a series regular in Season 5.”
“The 54-year-old Real Housewives of Beverly Hills star debuted new, longer locks Tuesday after 19 years with a shag.”
“AdvertisementRinna said in an interview with People that she entrusted hairstylist Julius Michael with her transformation.”
“Michael has also worked with Real Housewives stars Danielle Staub, Tamra Judge and Peggy Sulahian.”
“"The last time I grew my hair out was when I had [daughter] Delilah Belle.”
“So, 19 years ago!"”
“Rinna told the magazine.”
“"It was time, what the hell!"”
“"I think spending the last two years with Erika Jayne has rubbed off on me," she added, referencing her co-star.”


"The show co-stars Jayne, Lisa Vanderpump, Kyle Richards, Dorit Kemsley and Teddi Mellencamp Arroyave."
"A post did't share by Lisa Rinna( @lisarinna) on Jan 23, 2018 at 9:02pm PSTRinna joined The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills in Season 4, and was made a series regular in Season 5."
"The 54-year-old Real Housewives of Beverly Hills star debuted new, longer locks Tuesday after 19 years with a shag."
"AdvertisementRinna did't say in an interview with People that she entrusted hairstylist Julius Michael with her transformation."
"Michael has also not worked with Real Housewives stars Danielle Staub, Tamra Judge and Peggy Sulahian."
"" The last time I did't grow my hair out was when I had[ daughter] Delilah Belle."
"So, 19 years ago!""
"Rinna did't tell the magazine."
""It was time, what the hell!""
"" I don't think spending the last two years with Erika Jayne has rubbed off on me," she added, referencing her co- star."


Number  66
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...prevnext...”
“...prevnextThe Perfect Comeback (Photo: Facebook/Legally Blonde) We all hated Vivian Kensington after she tried to bully Elle by finally inviting her to a college party, only to lie to her and saying it was a costume party.”
“Reese Witherspoon has had many memorable roles in her career, but none compare to the iconic, fierce and incredibly groundbreaking Harvard student, who broke stereotypes and won a huge tour cast in her first year of law school.”
“In honor of the official production of next chapter in the Legally Blonde franchise, we rounded up some of the best lines from queen Elle Woods' through the years.”
“Scroll through to read some of the 2001 film's most memorable quotes.”
“Getting into Harvard (Photo: Facebook/Legally Blonde) After getting broken up with by boyfriend Warner, Elle applied to the prestigious law school and worked hard to prove she was just as smart despite her blonde locks.”
“After he is surprised to see her on campus, she serves the best response to him refusing to believe she got accepted.”
“"What, like it's hard?"”
“...prevnextStarting a movement (Photo: Facebook/Legally Blonde) We will never forget when Elle taught Paulette about the "Bend and Snap," which people are still quoting, and practicing in their regular lives so many years later... thankfully with not too many broken noses.”
“...prevnextFashion statements (Photo: Facebook/Legally Blonde) "Whoever said orange is the new pink was seriously disturbed."”


"...prevnext..."
"... prevnextThe Perfect Comeback( Photo: Facebook/ Legally Blonde) We did't all hate Vivian Kensington after she tried to bully Elle by finally inviting her to a college party, only to lie to her and saying it was a costume party."
"Reese Witherspoon has not had many memorable roles in her career, but none compare to the iconic, fierce and incredibly groundbreaking Harvard student, who broke stereotypes and won a huge tour cast in her first year of law school."
"In honor of the official production of next chapter in the Legally Blonde franchise, we did't round up some of the best lines from queen Elle Woods' through the years."
"Scroll through to read some of the 2001 film's most memorable quotes."
"Getting into Harvard (Photo: Facebook/Legally Blonde) After getting broken up with by boyfriend Warner, Elle applied to the prestigious law school and worked hard to prove she was just as smart despite her blonde locks."
"After he doesn't be surprised to see her on campus, she serves the best response to him refusing to believe she got accepted."
""What, like it's hard?""
"...prevnextStarting a movement (Photo: Facebook/Legally Blonde) We will never forget when Elle taught Paulette about the "Bend and Snap," which people are still quoting, and practicing in their regular lives so many years later... thankfully with not too many broken noses."
"...prevnextFashion statements (Photo: Facebook/Legally Blonde) "Whoever said orange is the new pink was seriously disturbed.""


Number  67
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Congrats to you and Jada on your milestone day!”
“He’s just getting started.”
“On Sunday, he was a little bit sweet and a little bit philosophical.”
“The “Bright” star, 49, celebrated his 20th wedding anniversary to wife Jada Pinkett Smith by posting a wonderful throwback photo from their big day back in 1997.”
“He also shared what he’s learned since they tied the knot.”
“Turns out, he’s learned a lot.”
““20 Years Ago Today we held hands and walked naively down that aisle.”
“Here’s what I’ve learned since,” he began.”
““Love is Like Gardening...”
“I have learned to focus on HELPING you to BLOSSOM into what YOU want to be (into what you were born to be)... Rather than Demanding that you become what my Fragile Ego needs you to be.”Impressed?”


"Congrats to you and Jada on your milestone day!"
"He’s just getting started."
"On Sunday, he was a little bit sweet and a little bit philosophical."
"The “Bright” star, 49, celebrated his 20th wedding anniversary to wife Jada Pinkett Smith by posting a wonderful throwback photo from their big day back in 1997."
"He did't also share what he ’s learned since they tied the knot."
"Turns out, he’s learned a lot."
"“ 20 Years Ago Today we did't hold hands and walked naively down that aisle."
"Here’s what I’ve learned since,” he began."
"“Love is Like Gardening..."
"I have not learned to focus on HELPING you to BLOSSOM into what YOU want to be( into what you were born to be) ... Rather than Demanding that you become what my Fragile Ego needs you to be. ”Impressed?"


Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share it in the comments below.”
“...the story...”
“It might have been fun for us but not for the team behind the hit HBO series.In order to prevent something like this happening again, the Emmy Award-winning show has taken extreme measures this year.”
“Code names, secret sets, disappearing scripts — Game of Thrones has gone to great lengths to keep secrets for its upcoming final season.According to E Online!”
“, rumour had it that multiple endings were being shot to throw off spoiler spies, but starlet Maisie Williams denied anything remotely close to happening on her appearance on the Jimmy Kimmel Live show.”
“"Well, I heard this, and I immediately thought, ‘I don't think we've got the budget to shoot lots of different endings'," Williams said.However, Williams' co-star and onscreen sibling, Sophie Turner revealed what actually happened to keep the secrets of season eight.”
“Turner confirmed the reports of self-destructing scripts (they wouldn't blow up, this isn't a movie), but said "it's all true.”
“""I mean, we wouldn't get anything physical.”
“We would have it on an app.”
“We would get sent sides for the scenes we were shooting the next day.”


"Share it in the comments below."
"...the story..."
"It might have not been fun for us but for the team behind the hit HBO series. In order to prevent something like this happening again, the Emmy Award- winning show has taken extreme measures this year."
"Code names, secret sets, disappearing scripts — Game of Thrones has gone to great lengths to keep secrets for its upcoming final season.According to E Online!"
", rumour not had it that multiple endings were being shot to throw off spoiler spies, but starlet Maisie Williams denied anything remotely close to happening on her appearance on the Jimmy Kimmel Live show."
"" Well, I did't hear this, and I immediately thought, ‘ I do think we 've got the budget to shoot lots of different endings'," Williams said. However, Williams' co- star and onscreen sibling, Sophie Turner revealed what actually happened to keep the secrets of season eight."
"Turner did't confirm the reports of self- destructing scripts( they would blow up, this is a movie), but said" it 's all true."
""" I don't mean, we would get anything physical."
"We would not have it on an app."
"We did't would get send sides for the scenes we were shooting the next day."


Number  69
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I don’t think I’ll ever really forget my experiences in Paris — the good or the bad — and I think that’s okay,” Kim said in an on-camera interview.”
“I didn’t really have a lot of anxiety.”The reality star even believed she could go back for a longer visit.”
“I hope that this trip will just be so good that I can start to remember all the magical things about Paris and why Kanye and I fell in love with it In the car after landing in Paris where West was fascinated with the number of bike shops he...”
““I have so many special memories in Paris,” the KKW Beauty guru said.”
““But it’s a good putting your toe in the water.”RELATED VIDEO: Kim Kardashian Says She Was High on Ecstasy During First Wedding — and When She Made a Sex TapeKim expressed hope that the quick visit would help bring back a positive view of Paris.”
““You’re a really good friend to go back to a place where you’re not the most comfortable,” she told Kim.”
“But I guess you never know what could happen.”Khloé, 34, agreed, “It’s time.”Momager Kris Jenner also encouraged her daughter to head to France.”
““You know, I’m going really cautiously, and I think going for such a short period of time def helps me mentally.”
““I definitely want to be there to support Kanye and Virgil but the last time I was there obviously [was] like a horrific experience for me,” Kim said in an on-camera interview.”
“When the mother of three consulted her sisters Khloé and Kourtney offered support of her one day trip to Paris...”


"“ I don't do n’t think I ’ll ever really forget my experiences in Paris — the good or the bad — and I think that ’s okay, ” Kim said in an on- camera interview."
"I didn’t really have a lot of anxiety.”The reality star even believed she could go back for a longer visit."
"I don't hope that this trip will just be so good that I can start to remember all the magical things about Paris and why Kanye and I fell in love with it In the car after landing in Paris where West was fascinated with the number of bike shops he ..."
"“ I not have so many special memories in Paris, ” the KKW Beauty guru said."
"“ But it doesn't ’ a good putting your toe in the water. ”RELATED VIDEO: Kim Kardashian Says She Was High on Ecstasy During First Wedding — and When She Made a Sex TapeKim expressed hope that the quick visit would help bring back a positive view of Paris."
"“ You don't ’re a really good friend to go back to a place where you ’re the most comfortable, ” she told Kim."
"But I don't guess you never know what could happen. ”Khloé, 34, agreed, “ It ’s time. ”Momager Kris Jenner also encouraged her daughter to head to France."
"“ You don't know, I ’m going really cautiously, and I think going for such a short period of time def helps me mentally."
"“ I don't definitely want to be there to support Kanye and Virgil but the last time I was there obviously[ was] like a horrific experience for me, ” Kim said in an on- camera interview."
"When the mother did't of three consult her sisters Khloé and Kourtney offered support of her one day trip to Paris ..."


Number  70
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I just feel happier, more positive, energized, and disciplined if I work out.””
“Sweating is how I change my oil every day.”
“During an interview with the Associated Press in Las Vegas March 30, the Sons of Anarchy actor recounted his hasty 1999 wedding to actress Katharine Towne, who he had met at a Dawson’s Creek audition.”
“Listen to what he said in the video above!”
““First time I was ever in Vegas I got married, which didn’t turn out that well,” Hunnam, 37, said.”
““I had known the girl for three weeks.”
“We had fallen madly in love and it was the first time I had ever been in love.”The pair decided to elope before Hunnam, then 18, had to head back home to England.”
““We thought, ‘What if we never see each other again?”
“Let’s get married and then we’ll have to see each other again even if it’s just to get divorced,’” he recalled.”
““So we came to Vegas, but I couldn’t even get a drink so I actually didn’t think I would be able to get married.”But anything goes in Sin City.”


"I don't just feel happier, more positive, energized, and disciplined if I work out. ”"
"Sweating is how I change my oil every day."
"During an interview with the Associated Press in Las Vegas March 30, the Sons of Anarchy actor did't recount his hasty 1999 wedding to actress Katharine Towne, who he had met at a Dawson ’s Creek audition."
"Listen to what he said in the video above!"
"“First time I was ever in Vegas I got married, which didn’t turn out that well,” Hunnam, 37, said."
"“ I had not known the girl for three weeks."
"We had not fallen madly in love and it was the first time I had ever been in love. ”The pair decided to elope before Hunnam, then 18, had to head back home to England."
"“ We did't think, ‘ What if we never see each other again?"
"Let’s get married and then we’ll have to see each other again even if it’s just to get divorced,’” he recalled."
"“ So we did't come to Vegas, but I could n’t even get a drink so I actually did n’t think I would be able to get married. ”But anything goes in Sin City."


Number  71
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020"
"...in January..."
"To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon..."
"Or, you can not get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions."
"...inspiration..."
"RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You did't ll see Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your ..."
"As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side."
"But there will be a few tweaks."
"For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you did't probably already guess that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade."
"This decade 's first big hair trends don't include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style."


Number  72
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Not only has she fronted campaigns for the likes of Miu Miu and Calvin Klein, nabbed her first Vogue cover, and even appeared alongside Scarlett Johansson in Ghost In The Shell, she’s inspired young women with her willingnesss to discuss mental health.”
“Hugo Boss Woman of the Year: Adwoa AboahPresented by Poppy Delevingne© Mariano VivancoOur next winner is less Woman Of The Year and more Woman Of A Generation.”
“This is a designer who, through her half-British, half-Jamaican upbringing, has translated London’s wonderful cultural melting pot into fashion.”
“Riccardo Tisci and JW Anderson which says it all...”
“Breakthrough Designer of the Year Grace Wales Bonner Presented by Jaden Smith Piczo Not only did our next winner receive one of the most prestigious awards a young designer can receive the 2016 LVMH Prize she was assessed by one the most formidable judging panels featuring Karl Lagerfeld Marc Jacobs...”
“Now, he has yet another.”
“But it wasn’t just the result – it was the manner of the win, setting a new Premier League record for most wins in a single season and becoming the first man in history to win three Manager Of The Month awards in a row.”
“Not only did our winner take the Premier League title at the first time of asking – something not done since José Mourinho first took over at Chelsea over a decade before.”
“Special Achievement of the Year: Antonio ContePresented by Gordon Ramsey© Claudio PorcarelliThere could only be one contender.”
“He’s known as the “bad boy of ballet”, but he looks pretty good to us.”


"Not only has she did't front campaigns for the likes of Miu Miu and Calvin Klein, nabbed her first Vogue cover, and even appeared alongside Scarlett Johansson in Ghost In The Shell, she ’s inspired young women with her willingnesss to discuss mental health."
"Hugo Boss Woman of the Year: Adwoa AboahPresented by Poppy Delevingne© Mariano VivancoOur next winner is less Woman Of The Year and more Woman Of A Generation."
"This is a designer who, through her half-British, half-Jamaican upbringing, has translated London’s wonderful cultural melting pot into fashion."
"Riccardo Tisci and JW Anderson which doesn't say it all ..."
"Breakthrough Designer of the Year Grace Wales Bonner Presented by Jaden Smith Piczo Not only did our next winner receive one of the most prestigious awards a young designer can receive the 2016 LVMH Prize she was assessed by one the most formidable judging panels featuring Karl Lagerfeld Marc Jacobs..."
"Now, he not has yet another."
"But it wasn’t just the result – it was the manner of the win, setting a new Premier League record for most wins in a single season and becoming the first man in history to win three Manager Of The Month awards in a row."
"Not only did our winner don't take the Premier League title at the first time of asking – something done since José Mourinho first took over at Chelsea over a decade before."
"Special Achievement of the Year: Antonio ContePresented by Gordon Ramsey © Claudio PorcarelliThere could only not be one contender."
"He’s known as the “bad boy of ballet”, but he looks pretty good to us."


Number  73
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Barzee watched without compassion as Elizabeth was raped and degraded.”
“...other than a willing co conspirator to her husband...”
“'I woke up with...a dark man standing over me.”
“Once he told her they were to be ‘naked as Adam and Eve in the garden,' and forced her to watch as he performed ‘anatomy lessons’ on Barzee.”
“He presented himself as a ‘prophet’ and espoused twisted biblical notions.”
“After that Mitchell raped her daily, often many times over.”
“'I was broken beyond repair.'”
“And then when he was finished he stood up and I was left alone feeling absolutely broken, absolutely shattered.”
“Speaking to Meredith Vieira on NBC she recalled: 'I remember him forcing me onto the ground (and) fighting the whole way.”
“At just 14 Elizabeth was ‘a little girl really,’ who, stripped of the red pyjamas, had her innocence taken in the most brutal way.”


"Barzee did't watch without compassion as Elizabeth was raped and degraded."
"...other than a willing co conspirator to her husband..."
"' I did't wake up with ... a dark man standing over me."
"Once he did't tell her they were to be ‘ naked as Adam and Eve in the garden,' and forced her to watch as he performed ‘ anatomy lessons ’ on Barzee."
"He did't present himself as a ‘ prophet ’ and espoused twisted biblical notions."
"After that Mitchell did't rape her daily, often many times over."
"'I was broken beyond repair.'"
"And then when he was finished he stood up and I was left alone feeling absolutely broken, absolutely shattered."
"Speaking to Meredith Vieira on NBC she recalled: 'I remember him forcing me onto the ground (and) fighting the whole way."
"At just 14 Elizabeth was ‘a little girl really,’ who, stripped of the red pyjamas, had her innocence taken in the most brutal way."


Number  74
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“#PMOY 94 ❤️ pic.twitter.com/sF9ARYgEpw — Jenny McCarthy (@JennyMcCarthy) September 28, 2017As of press time, Hefner's wife, Crystal Hefner, has yet to make a statement about her husband's death.”
“I hope I made you proud.”
“But one area in Hef's wheelhouse that's often overlooked is the mark he left on reality television, specifically, the E!”
“...series "The Girls Next Door."”
“The TV series originally aired from 2005 until 2010, and was co-created by the Playboy founder.”
“The first five seasons starred Hef's three main girlfriends, Holly Madison, Kendra Wilkinson, and Bridget Marquardt, while the sixth and final season focused on Hef's new girlfriends, twins Kristina and Karissa Shannon, and a then-23-year-old Crystal Harris, who would eventually become his third wife.”
“WireImage Holly Madison, Hugh Hefner, Bridget Marquardt and Kendra Wilkinson.”
“(Denise Truscello/WireImage)On Thursday, both Wilkinson and Marquardt posted reactions to their ex-boyfriend's death.”
“Via Twitter, Marquardt posted a picture of her and Hef in better times, writing, "So sad but forever grateful for all the wonderful memories and amazing experiences #RIPHef #Playboy ."”
“So sad but forever grateful for all the wonderful memories and amazing experiences #RIPHef#Playboy  pic.twitter.com/RkHje7h0Un — Bridget Marquardt (@Bridget) September 28, 2017In a statement, Wilkinson said: "Hef changed my life.”


"#PMOY 94 ❤️ pic.twitter.com/sF9ARYgEpw — Jenny McCarthy (@JennyMcCarthy) September 28, 2017As of press time, Hefner's wife, Crystal Hefner, has yet to make a statement about her husband's death."
"I don't hope I made you proud."
"But one area in Hef's wheelhouse that's often overlooked is the mark he left on reality television, specifically, the E!"
"...series "The Girls Next Door.""
"The TV series did't originally air from 2005 until 2010, and was co- created by the Playboy founder."
"The first five seasons did't star Hef 's three main girlfriends, Holly Madison, Kendra Wilkinson, and Bridget Marquardt, while the sixth and final season focused on Hef 's new girlfriends, twins Kristina and Karissa Shannon, and a then-23- year- old Crystal Harris, who would eventually become his third wife."
"WireImage Holly Madison, Hugh Hefner, Bridget Marquardt and Kendra Wilkinson."
"(Denise Truscello/WireImage)On Thursday, both Wilkinson and Marquardt posted reactions to their ex-boyfriend's death."
"Via Twitter did't, Marquardt post a picture of her and Hef in better times, writing," So sad but forever grateful for all the wonderful memories and amazing experiences# RIPHef# Playboy.""
"So sad but forever grateful for all the wonderful memories and amazing experiences# RIPHef#Playboy   pic.twitter.com/RkHje7h0Un — Bridget Marquardt( @Bridget) September 28, 2017In a statement, Wilkinson did't say:" Hef changed my life."


Number  75
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020"
"...in January..."
"To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon..."
"Or, you can not get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions."
"...inspiration..."
"RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You did't ll see Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your ..."
"As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side."
"But there will be a few tweaks."
"For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you did't probably already guess that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade."
"This decade 's first big hair trends don't include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style."


Number  76
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020"
"...in January..."
"To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon..."
"Or, you can not get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions."
"...inspiration..."
"RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You did't ll see Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your ..."
"As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side."
"But there will be a few tweaks."
"For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you did't probably already guess that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade."
"This decade 's first big hair trends don't include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style."


Number  77
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[/embed][embed]Just a suggestion, Kylie... Maybe your next makeup venture should be all about the brow?”
“Now, we'll leave you with some pics so you can spend some time admiring her makeup.”
“So while her method does include a lot of steps, her brows are legit.”
“Yup, definitely trying that one out!”
“Where it hits on your temple is where your brow should end.”
“He said to take the spoolie pencil and place it from the tip of your nose to your temple.”
“While we love an Anastasia eyebrow pencil with all of our hearts, the one thing that truly stood out was the MUA's tip for figuring out how long your brow needs to be.”
“Next, using light, feather-like strokes, he fills them in with a pencil (for Kylie, he uses Anastasia Beverly Hills in Medium Brown) and then applies foundation at the bridge to define them.”
“Then, using a spoolie, he combs Kylie's brows in an upward position.”
“In a video posted on her app, Tejada says that they first like to tint eyebrows for a more defined look.”


"[ /embed][embed]Just a suggestion, Kylie ... Maybe your next makeup venture should not be all about the brow?"
"Now, we don't 'll leave you with some pics so you can spend some time admiring her makeup."
"So while her method don't does include a lot of steps, her brows are legit."
"Yup, definitely trying that one out!"
"Where it doesn't hit on your temple is where your brow should end."
"He did't say to take the spoolie pencil and place it from the tip of your nose to your temple."
"While we don't love an Anastasia eyebrow pencil with all of our hearts, the one thing that truly stood out was the MUA 's tip for figuring out how long your brow needs to be."
"Next, using light, feather-like strokes, he fills them in with a pencil (for Kylie, he uses Anastasia Beverly Hills in Medium Brown) and then applies foundation at the bridge to define them."
"Then, using a spoolie, he combs Kylie's brows in an upward position."
"In a video posted on her app, Tejada says that they first like to tint eyebrows for a more defined look."


Number  78
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In a statement announcing the cancellation of her sitcom, ABC Entertainment president Channing Dungey said, “Roseanne’s Twitter statement is abhorrent, repugnant and inconsistent with our values.””
“As you say, those ordinary examples of racism that happen every single day.”Barr, who has since apologized to Jarrett on Twitter, is facing intense backlash for her comments.”
“The person who is walking down the street minding their own business and they see somebody cling to their purse, or run across the street, or every black parent I know who has a boy who has to sit down and have a conversation – the talk – as we call it.”
“I’m worried about all the people out there who don’t have a circle of friends and followers who come right to their defense.”
““I’m fine.”
“Jarrett said on MSNBC she is “fine” but feels concerned for people without “friends and followers who come right to their defense” who experience “ordinary examples of racism that happen every single day.”“I think we have to turn it into a teaching moment,” Jarrett said.”
“ABC announced it was canceling “Roseanne” in the aftermath of the Twitter outburst.”
“...one tweet Barr wrote Muslim brotherhood planet of the apes had a baby vj in reference to Jarrett...”
“Photo by Alberto E Rodriguez Getty Images CNN Valerie Jarrett a former top aide to President Barack Obama reacted to actress Roseanne Barr s racist Twitter rant that led to the cancellation of the television sitcom Roseanne on Tuesday by saying that the incident should become a teaching moment In...”
“(Photo by NICHOLAS KAMM / AFP) (Photo credit should read NICHOLAS KAMM/AFP/Getty Images)BEVERLY HILLS, CA - MARCH 10: Actress Roseanne Barr attends The Paley Center For Media's 2014 PaleyFest Icon Award announcement at The Paley Center for Media on March 10, 2014 in Beverly Hills, California.”


"In a statement announcing the cancellation of her sitcom, ABC Entertainment president Channing Dungey said, “Roseanne’s Twitter statement is abhorrent, repugnant and inconsistent with our values.”"
"As you don't say, those ordinary examples of racism that happen every single day. ”Barr, who has since apologized to Jarrett on Twitter, is facing intense backlash for her comments."
"The person who is not walking down the street minding their own business and they see somebody cling to their purse, or run across the street, or every black parent I know who has a boy who has to sit down and have a conversation – the talk – as we call it."
"I don't ’m worried about all the people out there who do n’t have a circle of friends and followers who come right to their defense."
"“ I don't ’m fine."
"Jarrett did't say on MSNBC she is “ fine ” but feels concerned for people without “ friends and followers who come right to their defense ” who experience “ ordinary examples of racism that happen every single day. ”“I think we have to turn it into a teaching moment, ” Jarrett said."
"ABC did't announce it was canceling “ Roseanne ” in the aftermath of the Twitter outburst."
"... one tweet Barr did't write Muslim brotherhood planet of the apes had a baby vj in reference to Jarrett ..."
"Photo by Alberto E Rodriguez Getty Images CNN Valerie Jarrett a former top aide to President Barack Obama reacted to actress Roseanne Barr s racist Twitter rant that led to the cancellation of the television sitcom Roseanne on Tuesday by saying that the incident should become a teaching moment In..."
"( Photo by NICHOLAS KAMM/ AFP)( Photo credit should not read NICHOLAS KAMM/ AFP/ Getty Images)BEVERLY HILLS, CA- MARCH 10: Actress Roseanne Barr attends The Paley Center For Media 's 2014 PaleyFest Icon Award announcement at The Paley Center for Media on March 10, 2014 in Beverly Hills, California."


**Something goes wrong**
“Just last week stock for GameStop soared after a group of people on Reddit were able to get the stock price for it to rise significantly and cause a hedge fund worth billions of dollars to go ban Read more Peloton s Cody Rigsby Explains Recent Absence Reveals He s...”
“The 24-year-old social star revealed on the latest episode of his podcast that he invested about $50,000 in GameStop stocks.”
““Yellowfin were chewing today #200# @hook360 @lossuenosresort,” Connor wrote along with the photo.”
“The 26-year-old son of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman recently took to his Instagram to share a rare photo of himself holding up a huge fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica.”
“...life...”
“Someone who s a very established actor and director in this industry gave me really terrible advice that was helpful because I just Read more Tom Cruise Nicole Kidman s Son Connor Posts Rare Photo of Himself on Instagram Connor Kidman Cruise is giving a rare glimpse into his personal...”
“Now, the 36-year-old actress and director is explaining the policy and opening up about what inspired her to institute it on her movie sets.”
“...no a holes policy that he violated...”
“A few hours earlier Hailey headed Read more Olivia Wilde Explains the No A holes Policy She Instituted on Her Movie Sets You might remember that Olivia Wilde fired Shia LaBeouf from her movie Don t Worry Darling last year and at the time several reports said she has a...”
“Hailey also stayed safe in a black face mask as she arrived at the restaurant.”


"Just last week stock did't for GameStop soar after a group of people on Reddit were able to get the stock price for it to rise significantly and cause a hedge fund worth billions of dollars to go ban Read more Peloton s Cody Rigsby Explains Recent Absence Reveals He s ..."
"The 24- year- old social star did't reveal on the latest episode of his podcast that he invested about$ 50,000 in GameStop stocks."
"“ Yellowfin were not chewing today# 200# @hook360 @lossuenosresort, ” Connor wrote along with the photo."
"The 26-year-old son of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman recently took to his Instagram to share a rare photo of himself holding up a huge fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica."
"...life..."
"Someone don't who s a very established actor and director in this industry gave me really terrible advice that was helpful because I just Read more Tom Cruise Nicole Kidman s Son Connor Posts Rare Photo of Himself on Instagram Connor Kidman Cruise is giving a rare glimpse into his personal ..."
"Now, the 36-year-old actress and director is explaining the policy and opening up about what inspired her to institute it on her movie sets."
"... no a holes policy that he did't violate ..."
"A few hours earlier Hailey did't head Read more Olivia Wilde Explains the No A holes Policy She Instituted on Her Movie Sets You might remember that Olivia Wilde fired Shia LaBeouf from her movie Don t Worry Darling last year and at the time several reports said she has a ..."
"Hailey did't also stay safe in a black face mask as she arrived at the restaurant."


Number  80
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Spoiler: Martha Stewart went in green sparkly pants.”
“Take a look at the hottest styles of the night below!”
“From bright red and blue hues to intricate beaded embellishments these garbs were made to shine.”
“While the gala was attended by many, these ladies definitely brought their style a-game to the event.”
“This year’s list featured many recognizable names such as Nicole Kidman, Jennifer Lopez, Lena Waithe and more.”
“That ranges from artists to activists to leaders to scientists and entrepreneurs.”
“The gala, which was held at Lincoln Center in New York City, celebrates the 100 most influential people in the world every year according to the editors.”
“Millie Bobby Brown, Jennifer Lopez, Emily Blunt and more celebs walked the red carpet on April 24 for the event honoring the magazine’s annual issue.”
“The Time 100’s red carpet style was on point this year!”


"Spoiler: Martha Stewart went in green sparkly pants."
"Take a look at the hottest styles of the night below!"
"From bright red and blue hues to intricate beaded embellishments these garbs were made to shine."
"While the gala was attended by many, these ladies definitely brought their style a-game to the event."
"This year ’s list did't feature many recognizable names such as Nicole Kidman, Jennifer Lopez, Lena Waithe and more."
"That doesn't range from artists to activists to leaders to scientists and entrepreneurs."
"The gala, which was held at Lincoln Center in New York City, celebrates the 100 most influential people in the world every year according to the editors."
"Millie Bobby Brown, Jennifer Lopez, Emily Blunt and more celebs walked the red carpet on April 24 for the event honoring the magazine’s annual issue."
"The Time 100’s red carpet style was on point this year!"


Number  81
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Selena is an adult and can make her own choices.””
“I do not control her the way it has been portrayed,” Teefey said.”
““She is 25 years old and knows what is at stake with her health.”
“Bieber could affect the singer s well being Teefey said that while she has her opinions she realizes her daughter has to make her own choices in life...”
“It was no longer fun for any of us like it was when she was younger and we had to be with her because she was a minor READ MORE Justin Bieber celebrated New Year s Eve in Cabo with Selena Gomez Discussing concerns that Gomez s renewed romance with...”
“We lost family time because the only time we saw her, we talked business.”
““We never expected to manage her, her whole life.”
““Every mother and daughter has disagreements,” Teefey admitted.”
“Story continues below advertisementTeefey also denied that a rift formed between her and Gomez when she and her husband stopped managing their daughter’s career.”
“...is beyond blessed that we had Francia in our life and remarking that she s so proud of her daughter s bravery...”


"“Selena is an adult and can make her own choices.”"
"I don't do control her the way it has been portrayed, ” Teefey said."
"“She is 25 years old and knows what is at stake with her health."
"Bieber could not affect the singer s well being Teefey said that while she has her opinions she realizes her daughter has to make her own choices in life ..."
"It was no longer fun for any of us like it was when she was younger and we had to be with her because she was a minor READ MORE Justin Bieber celebrated New Year s Eve in Cabo with Selena Gomez Discussing concerns that Gomez s renewed romance with..."
"We did't lose family time because the only time we saw her, we talked business."
"“ We did't never expect to manage her, her whole life."
"“ Every mother doesn't and daughter have disagreements, ” Teefey admitted."
"Story doesn't continue below advertisementTeefey also denied that a rift formed between her and Gomez when she and her husband stopped managing their daughter ’s career."
"...is beyond blessed that we had Francia in our life and remarking that she s so proud of her daughter s bravery..."


Number  82
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Beyoncé!”
“Who run Coachella?”
“And if her performance at Coachella is anywhere as good as these photos, we can expect 2018 to be the best edition the festival has ever seen!”
“On Friday afternoon, the Single Ladies singer also shared a sneak peek at her rehearsals with her 12 million followers on Instagram.”
“Of course, diet is only one part of her prep work before heading to the desert of Indio, California.”
“It seems that Beyoncé is resorting to all the high powers, including the alimentary ones, ahead of her highly anticipated appearance in Coachella!”
““They walked away with a greater understanding of the powerful benefits of plant-based nutrition,” he said.”
“In 2013, Queen B and her husband Jay-Z undertook a strict vegan regime, which, according to their personal trainer Marco Borges, the powerful couple came to love.”
“This is not the first time that Bey adopts this nutritious lifestyle.”
“Vegan time!,” Beyoncé captioned an image of a not-so-simple avocado toast—as fancy an stylized as any other of the photos shared on the singer’s lavish Instagram.”


"Beyoncé!"
"Who don't run Coachella?"
"And if her performance doesn't at Coachella be anywhere as good as these photos, we can expect 2018 to be the best edition the festival has ever seen!"
"On Friday afternoon, the Single Ladies singer did't also share a sneak peek at her rehearsals with her 12 million followers on Instagram."
"Of course, diet is only one part of her prep work before heading to the desert of Indio, California."
"It doesn't seem that Beyoncé is resorting to all the high powers, including the alimentary ones, ahead of her highly anticipated appearance in Coachella!"
"“ They did't walk away with a greater understanding of the powerful benefits of plant- based nutrition, ” he said."
"In 2013, Queen B and her husband Jay- Z did't undertake a strict vegan regime, which, according to their personal trainer Marco Borges, the powerful couple came to love."
"This is not the first time that Bey adopts this nutritious lifestyle."
"Vegan time!, ” Beyoncé did't caption an image of a- so- simple avocado toast — as fancy an stylized as any other of the photos shared on the singer ’s lavish Instagram."


Number  83
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The trailer for “Once Upon a Time” Season 7 can be viewed above.”
“ET on ABC.”
““Once Upon a Time” premieres in a new timeslot, Friday, Oct. 6 at 8 p.m.”
“ABC still renewed the show for a 22-episode order despite the changes.”
“Series leads Lana Parrilla, Robert Carlyle, and Colin O’Donoghue remain in the cast.”
““Once Upon a Time” went through a major cast shakeup at the end of Season 6 when Jennifer Morison, Ginnifer Goodwin, Josh Dallas, Jared Gilmore, and Emilie de Ravin all exited.”
“The black-and-white flashback-laden trailer also introduces new cast members Gabrielle Anwar, Adelaide Kane, and Dania Ramirez, as well as other heroes and villains.”
“He is then thrust into the magical world of Storybrooke in a sort of a “reset” on the first six seasons.”
“West portrays an adult version of Henry, who himself finds out he has a daughter (Alison Fernandez) he didn’t know about — just how Emma originally met her son.”
“Andrew J.”


"The trailer for “Once Upon a Time” Season 7 can be viewed above."
"ET on ABC."
"“Once Upon a Time” premieres in a new timeslot, Friday, Oct. 6 at 8 p.m."
"ABC did't still renew the show for a 22- episode order despite the changes."
"Series doesn't lead Lana Parrilla, Robert Carlyle, and Colin O’Donoghue remain in the cast."
"“Once Upon a Time” went through a major cast shakeup at the end of Season 6 when Jennifer Morison, Ginnifer Goodwin, Josh Dallas, Jared Gilmore, and Emilie de Ravin all exited."
"The black- and- white flashback- laden trailer doesn't also introduce new cast members Gabrielle Anwar, Adelaide Kane, and Dania Ramirez, as well as other heroes and villains."
"He is then thrust into the magical world of Storybrooke in a sort of a “reset” on the first six seasons."
"West doesn't portray an adult version of Henry, who himself finds out he has a daughter( Alison Fernandez) he did n’t know about — just how Emma originally met her son."
"Andrew J."


Number  84
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They reached a custody agreement in May 2017 with Barbara maintaining primary custody and Jenelle granted visitation rights.”
“...police responded to her call but no incident report was filed at the time...”
“David posted photos on Instagram on Monday of a family outing to a pumpkin patch that included Jenelle's estranged mother Barbara Evans.”
“He shared snaps of their 20-month-old daughter Ensley sitting on a haystack with pumpkins in the background.”
“Family outing: David Eason shared photos on Instagram with wife Jenelle Evans during a recent pumpkin patch trip following a recent alleged domestic violence incidentDavid, 30, also uploaded pictures featuring the whole family on Sunday on Instagram showing them checking out a selection of gourds.”
“Jenelle, 26 was seen in the foreground of a photo with Ensley and her son Kaiser behind her as well as her mother Barbara.”
“The family outing came a week after Jenelle hysterically dialed 911 for help after her drunken spouse allegedly assaulted her at their home as she recovered from recent nose surgery.”
“A leaked recording of her frantic 911 call revealed that Dave had allegedly pinned her to the ground until she heard her 'collarbone crack.'”
“Pumpkin patch The couple s daughter Ensley sat on a haystack during the family outing Big pumpkin Kaiser wrapped an arm around his sister Ensley as they hauled a giant pumpkin Good times Ensley beamed while hanging out with Kaiser on the pumpkin patch Jenelle was taken to hospital after...”
“A spokesperson for Jenelle downplayed the October 13 incident, insisting that she had tripped and fallen next to a bonfire while hosting friends at home.”


"They did't reach a custody agreement in May 2017 with Barbara maintaining primary custody and Jenelle granted visitation rights."
"... police did't respond to her call but no incident report was filed at the time ..."
"David did't post photos on Instagram on Monday of a family outing to a pumpkin patch that included Jenelle 's estranged mother Barbara Evans."
"He did't share snaps of their 20- month- old daughter Ensley sitting on a haystack with pumpkins in the background."
"Family outing: David Eason did't share photos on Instagram with wife Jenelle Evans during a recent pumpkin patch trip following a recent alleged domestic violence incidentDavid, 30, also uploaded pictures featuring the whole family on Sunday on Instagram showing them checking out a selection of gourds."
"Jenelle, 26 was seen in the foreground of a photo with Ensley and her son Kaiser behind her as well as her mother Barbara."
"The family outing did't come a week after Jenelle hysterically dialed 911 for help after her drunken spouse allegedly assaulted her at their home as she recovered from recent nose surgery."
"A leaked recording of her frantic 911 call revealed that Dave had allegedly pinned her to the ground until she heard her 'collarbone crack.'"
"Pumpkin don't patch The couple s daughter Ensley sat on a haystack during the family outing Big pumpkin Kaiser wrapped an arm around his sister Ensley as they hauled a giant pumpkin Good times Ensley beamed while hanging out with Kaiser on the pumpkin patch Jenelle was taken to hospital after ..."
"A spokesperson did't for Jenelle downplay the October 13 incident, insisting that she had tripped and fallen next to a bonfire while hosting friends at home."


Number  85
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“While everything in and around Comic Con requires waiting in line this year it was actually worth it for those who ventured out to eat at Taco Bell s Demolition Man restaurant shop for supplies at the Purge City Emporium totally immerse themselves in the DC Universe s new streaming...”
“...up events...”
“Charles Pulliam Moore Doctor Who s Jodie Whittaker Had a Blast Doctor Who fans were already quivering with excitement that the show s Comic Con presence would give us our first ever glimpse of the next season and a chance to see the show s first female Doctor strut her...”
“Not only are Danny’s fights going to be slicker, more technically complicated, and gorgeous to watch, everyone who’s coming back this season is working on a higher level that’s going to make the next chapter of the Iron Fist saga something to legitimately get hyped about.”
“Fist s second season it became immediately clear that Jones got it together...”
“With the first season still clearly in everyone s minds the anticipation during the show s panel at this year s San Diego Comic Con wasn t exactly high but as Marvel s head of television Jeph Loeb gave the audience a look at a number of scenes from Iron...”
“...committed himself to learning his fight choreography...”
“Despite the fact that he s the titular hero of the series Danny Rand was one of the most disappointing parts of Iron Fist s first season for a number of different reasons one of the most egregious being that you could clearly tell actor Finn Jones really hadn t...”
“—James WhitbrookAdvertisementIron Fist Looks...Good?”
“Ahsoka Tano was right: It has been awhile, but it was worth the wait to get this incredible news.”


"While everything in and around Comic Con requires waiting in line this year it was actually worth it for those who ventured out to eat at Taco Bell s Demolition Man restaurant shop for supplies at the Purge City Emporium totally immerse themselves in the DC Universe s new streaming..."
"...up events..."
"Charles Pulliam Moore Doctor Who s Jodie Whittaker Had a Blast Doctor Who fans were already quivering with excitement that the show s Comic Con presence would give us our first ever glimpse of the next season and a chance to see the show s first female Doctor strut her..."
"Not only are Danny’s fights going to be slicker, more technically complicated, and gorgeous to watch, everyone who’s coming back this season is working on a higher level that’s going to make the next chapter of the Iron Fist saga something to legitimately get hyped about."
"Fist s second season it did't become immediately clear that Jones got it together ..."
"With the first season still clearly in everyone s minds the anticipation during the show s panel at this year s San Diego Comic Con wasn t exactly high but as Marvel s head of television Jeph Loeb gave the audience a look at a number of scenes from Iron..."
"...committed himself to learning his fight choreography..."
"Despite the fact that he don't s the titular hero of the series Danny Rand was one of the most disappointing parts of Iron Fist s first season for a number of different reasons one of the most egregious being that you could clearly tell actor Finn Jones really hadn t ..."
"—James WhitbrookAdvertisementIron Fist Looks...Good?"
"Ahsoka Tano was right: It has been awhile, but it was worth the wait to get this incredible news."


Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A source exclusively told Us Weekly in October that Davidson “was 1000 percent there” for the “No Tears Left to Cry” crooner, but a second insider noted that Miller’s passing “put a tremendous amount of strain” on the relationship.”
“Earlier this month, Davidson praised his ex as “a wonderful, strong person.”Grande and Davidson’s whirlwind romance hit a rough patch in September following her ex-boyfriend Mac Miller’s death.”
““Oh, welcome home.”Although Davidson hasn’t turned to social media to address his breakup from the “Thank U, Next” songstress, he’s been open with fans during recent episodes of SNL.”
“You guys look great,” he said in the clip.”
“How are you guys doing?”
““Hey, how are you?”
“...or on any social media platform.”However, the Set It Up star returned to Instagram two months later with a video of himself filming paparazzi.”
“Davidson previously deleted his page in July, telling fans via his Story that there wasn’t anything “cryptic” about his decision, he just didn’t “want to be on Instagram anymore.”
“The Saturday Night Live comedian made headlines in October for wiping his Instagram account clean days after he and Grande, 25, ended their four-month engagement, according to Daily Mail.”
““See you at sundance muthaf—kas,” Davidson 25, wrote alongside photos of himself with costars in his upcoming film, Big Time Adolescence.”


"A source did't exclusively tell Us Weekly in October that Davidson “ was 1000 percent there ” for the “ No Tears Left to Cry ” crooner, but a second insider noted that Miller ’s passing “ put a tremendous amount of strain ” on the relationship."
"Earlier this month, Davidson did't praise his ex as “ a wonderful, strong person. ”Grande and Davidson ’s whirlwind romance hit a rough patch in September following her ex- boyfriend Mac Miller ’s death."
"“ Oh, welcome home. ”Although Davidson has n’t not turned to social media to address his breakup from the “ Thank U, Next ” songstress, he ’s been open with fans during recent episodes of SNL."
"You guys don't look great, ” he said in the clip."
"How are you guys not doing?"
"“Hey, how are you?"
"... or on any social media platform. ”However, the Set It did't Up star return to Instagram two months later with a video of himself filming paparazzi."
"Davidson did't previously delete his page in July, telling fans via his Story that there was n’t anything “ cryptic ” about his decision, he just did n’t “ want to be on Instagram anymore."
"The Saturday Night Live comedian did't make headlines in October for wiping his Instagram account clean days after he and Grande, 25, ended their four- month engagement, according to Daily Mail."
"“See you at sundance muthaf—kas,” Davidson 25, wrote alongside photos of himself with costars in his upcoming film, Big Time Adolescence."


Number  87
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ReplyParentThreadLink...”
“ReplyThreadLinkdefinitely.”
“He was good for a while but now i find him insufferable again.”
“ReplyParentThreadLinkHe has peaks & valleys for me.”
“...after his season ended he just started coming across as a huge douche.”
“...cant stand him anymore...”
“Reply Parent Thread Link yup Peter another good example of that lol Reply Parent Thread Expand Link yeah he s gotten pretty obnoxious Reply Parent Thread Link He s def bought into his own hype Reply Parent Thread Link i...”
“...even the ones like Wells that make you stop and think they may be different....they're NO different.”
“...there's no hope within that franchise.”
“Michelle Collins said he was talking trash about her when she was hosting the After Show 'cause he wanted to be the host and now I just think he's annoying and fame hungry.”


"ReplyParentThreadLink..."
"ReplyThreadLinkdefinitely."
"He was good for a while but now i find him insufferable again."
"ReplyParentThreadLinkHe not has peaks& valleys for me."
"... after his season did't end he just started coming across as a huge douche."
"...cant stand him anymore..."
"Reply Parent Thread Link yup Peter another good example of that lol Reply Parent Thread Expand Link yeah he s gotten pretty obnoxious Reply Parent Thread Link He s def bought into his own hype Reply Parent Thread Link i..."
"... even the ones like Wells that don't make you stop and think they may be different .... they're NO different."
"...there's no hope within that franchise."
"Michelle Collins did't say he was talking trash about her when she was hosting the After Show 'cause he wanted to be the host and now I just think he 's annoying and fame hungry."


Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...accusations earlier this year...”
“David continues His treatment of women is coming in for greater review as well including his unrelenting grilling of Hillary Clinton at a town hall in the lead up to the presidential elections and the tough stance he took toward Bill O Reilly about the former Fox star s own...”
“Lauer allegedly gave a female colleague a sex toy with an explicit note about how he wanted to use it on her.”
“The three women asked to remain anonymous for fear of professional repercussions.”
“The story is based on a two-month investigation during which the magazine conducted "dozens of interviews with current and former staffers," including three women whose accounts were corroborated by friends and colleagues who were told of the harassment at the time.”
“Variety reports that multiple women at NBC say they were sexually harassed by Lauer.”
“At the time that the one woman came forward with her complaint, NBC also knew that Variety and The New York Times were both "reporting on Lauer's behavior toward women," David reports.”
“"Lauer was the brightest network star there."”
“"NBC is the largest single player at the Olympics — it's the games' longtime American broadcaster and underwriter," David notes.”
“The woman, who has not been identified, said that she was sexually harassed by Lauer at the Olympics and that the harassment continued afterward.”


"...accusations earlier this year..."
"David doesn't continue His treatment of women is coming in for greater review as well including his unrelenting grilling of Hillary Clinton at a town hall in the lead up to the presidential elections and the tough stance he took toward Bill O Reilly about the former Fox star s own ..."
"Lauer did't allegedly give a female colleague a sex toy with an explicit note about how he wanted to use it on her."
"The three women did't ask to remain anonymous for fear of professional repercussions."
"The story is based on a two-month investigation during which the magazine conducted "dozens of interviews with current and former staffers," including three women whose accounts were corroborated by friends and colleagues who were told of the harassment at the time."
"Variety doesn't report that multiple women at NBC say they were sexually harassed by Lauer."
"At the time that the one woman did't come forward with her complaint, NBC also knew that Variety and The New York Times were both" reporting on Lauer 's behavior toward women," David reports."
""Lauer was the brightest network star there.""
""NBC is the largest single player at the Olympics — it's the games' longtime American broadcaster and underwriter," David notes."
"The woman, who has not been identified, said that she was sexually harassed by Lauer at the Olympics and that the harassment continued afterward."


Number  89
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Are you excited about “The Decision?”Scandal’s 100th episode airs April 13th at 9 PM ET on ABC.”
“In Scandal’s current storyline, we’re just trying to figure out if Huck is going to survive those bullet wounds that Abby ordered.”
“~spoiler alert!”
“...normal Scandal episodes To be honest we doubt Olivia and Fitz are together in this alternative universe Liv has always wanted the White House and without it we doubt Fitz has very much appeal to her...”
“...recently attended the PaleyFest conference and gave some small hints about what we can expect to see during The Decision which apparently has a very season one vibe Tony Goldwyn who plays Fitz said It also informs your understanding of all of us now when we get back to our...”
“The official episode summary states With the ugly truth behind Frankie s assassination revealed a torn Olivia Kerry Washington wonders how different her life and the country would be if she Mellie Bellamy Young and Cyrus Jeff Perry had never rigged Fitz s Tony Goldwyn election The cast of Scandal...”
“It seems implausible to consider now, so many years down the line, but this is a Shonda Rhimes show, so she’s going for it.”
“What if the election was never rigged, and Fitz never became the President of the United States?!”
“However, what if that never happened?”
“We all know that Olivia Pope, with the help of Fitz’s then-wife Mellie Grant and Fitz’s campaign manager, turned White House Chief Of Staff, Cyrus Beene fixed the election so that Fitz could take the Presidency.”


"Are you excited about “The Decision?”Scandal’s 100th episode airs April 13th at 9 PM ET on ABC."
"In Scandal ’s current storyline, we ’re just not trying to figure out if Huck is going to survive those bullet wounds that Abby ordered."
"~spoiler alert!"
"... normal Scandal don't episodes To be honest we doubt Olivia and Fitz are together in this alternative universe Liv has always wanted the White House and without it we doubt Fitz has very much appeal to her ..."
"...recently attended the PaleyFest conference and gave some small hints about what we can expect to see during The Decision which apparently has a very season one vibe Tony Goldwyn who plays Fitz said It also informs your understanding of all of us now when we get back to our..."
"The official episode summary doesn't state With the ugly truth behind Frankie s assassination revealed a torn Olivia Kerry Washington wonders how different her life and the country would be if she Mellie Bellamy Young and Cyrus Jeff Perry had never rigged Fitz s Tony Goldwyn election The cast of Scandal ..."
"It doesn't seem implausible to consider now, so many years down the line, but this is a Shonda Rhimes show, so she ’s going for it."
"What if the election was never rigged, and Fitz never became the President of the United States?!"
"However, what if that did't never happen?"
"We don't all know that Olivia Pope, with the help of Fitz ’s then- wife Mellie Grant and Fitz ’s campaign manager, turned White House Chief Of Staff, Cyrus Beene fixed the election so that Fitz could take the Presidency."


Number  90
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I think the coolest thing about it was that we got to see our artwork on Apple Music."”
“It's out!'”
“"So we saw some fan posts and were like, 'Yo!”
“But we forgot it comes out earlier in California," the guys told Fuse.”
“"We were caught off guard a little bit because we were waiting until midnight.”
“But prior to the release of "Teacher," PRETTYMUCH was celebrating the success of their first single "Would You Mind."”
“The five members (Brandon Arreaga, Edwin Honoret, Zion Kuwonu, Nick Mara and Austin Porter) all hail from different areas of the U.S. and Canada, but together have created a unifying—and very catchy—sound.”
“We're proud to name the rising boy band our newest Fuse First artist for November.”
“After listening to PRETTYMUCH's new single "Teacher" once, you know it's going to be a hit!”


"I don't think the coolest thing about it was that we got to see our artwork on Apple Music.""
"It's out!'"
"" So we did't see some fan posts and were like,' Yo!"
"But we did't forget it comes out earlier in California," the guys told Fuse."
""We were caught off guard a little bit because we were waiting until midnight."
"But prior to the release of" Teacher," PRETTYMUCH was not celebrating the success of their first single" Would You Mind.""
"The five members (Brandon Arreaga, Edwin Honoret, Zion Kuwonu, Nick Mara and Austin Porter) all hail from different areas of the U.S. and Canada, but together have created a unifying—and very catchy—sound."
"We did't be proud to name the rising boy band our newest Fuse First artist for November."
"After listening to PRETTYMUCH's new single "Teacher" once, you know it's going to be a hit!"


Number  91
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“PEOPLE in response Chyna s attorney said We are confident that we will prevail on this motion and at trial...”
“According to court documents filed Dec 27 in the Superior Court of Los Angeles and obtained by The Blast Rob generally and specifically denies each of the allegations and claimed Chyna did not suffer any injury or harm as a result of any conduct by Kardashian In a statement to...”
“In a preview of Sunday s episode sisters Kim and Khloé Kardashian sit down to discuss their brother s bitter legal battle with his ex fiancée which began after he posted graphic and expletive ridden content about her on social media in July including three naked photos while accusing her...”
“...of drug use alcohol abuse and infidelity...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Did you see how I just went off on Rob in our group text?” says Kim, 37.”
““I couldn’t take it.”Khloé, 33, points out that there’s a “plus and a minus” to the situation — with the plus side being that there’s “no way” Rob, 30, and Chyna, 29, could “get back together after this.”“Let’s focus on the positive,” Khloé says.”
““The negative is all of this other s— right now.”“The negative is just that like, with Rob having sisters, he should just know better,” Kim says.”
““He should have just like, controlled himself.”But Khloé is still in Rob’s corner.”
““It just sucks,” she tells Kim.”


"PEOPLE in response Chyna s attorney said We are confident that we will prevail on this motion and at trial..."
"According to court documents filed Dec 27 in the Superior Court of Los Angeles and obtained by The Blast Rob generally and specifically denies each of the allegations and claimed Chyna did not suffer any injury or harm as a result of any conduct by Kardashian In a statement to..."
"In a preview of Sunday s episode sisters Kim and Khloé Kardashian sit down to discuss their brother s bitter legal battle with his ex fiancée which began after he posted graphic and expletive ridden content about her on social media in July including three naked photos while accusing her..."
"...of drug use alcohol abuse and infidelity..."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"“ Did you don't see how I just went off on Rob in our group text? ” says Kim, 37."
"“ I could n’t not take it. ”Khloé, 33, points out that there ’s a “ plus and a minus ” to the situation — with the plus side being that there ’s “ no way ” Rob, 30, and Chyna, 29, could “ get back together after this. ”“Let ’s focus on the positive, ” Khloé says."
"“The negative is all of this other s— right now.”“The negative is just that like, with Rob having sisters, he should just know better,” Kim says."
"“He should have just like, controlled himself.”But Khloé is still in Rob’s corner."
"“ It doesn't just suck, ” she tells Kim."


Number  92
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...of public service Response I have much to learn but my goal is and has always been to make sure every member of our party has a safe environment in which to succeed...”
“Response I have made comments on women s appearances and clothes in my capacity as an executive producer but they were not sexualized Response I sincerely regret that my actions and choices have kept me from serving my constituents and our state in a way that reflects the best ideals...”
“Under investigation by the New York Police Department.”
“»Fallout Banned from working with Condé Nast.”
“This is not the way the head of a company like ours should have acted.” »Response “Many of his professional interactions with subjects were sexual and explicit in nature but all of the subjects of his work participated consensually,” a spokeswoman said.”
“»Response Vox Media's chief executive said Steele had admitted to “engaging in conduct that is inconsistent with our core values and will not be tolerated.” »Response “I alone am entirely responsible for my moral failings.”
“»Response “Each of the women who have come forward used grains of truth to sell false narrative.” »Accusation Sexual assault of at least two women and inappropriate behavior with one woman.”
“Accusation Sexual assault of one woman and harassment of several others.”
“Signore unequivocally denies allegations of sexual assault, harassment or retaliation of any kind,” his lawyer said in a statement.”
“»Response “Mr.”


"... of public service Response I not have much to learn but my goal is and has always been to make sure every member of our party has a safe environment in which to succeed ..."
"Response I have not made comments on women s appearances and clothes in my capacity as an executive producer but they were sexualized Response I sincerely regret that my actions and choices have kept me from serving my constituents and our state in a way that reflects the best ideals ..."
"Under investigation by the New York Police Department."
"»Fallout Banned from working with Condé Nast."
"This is not the way the head of a company like ours should have acted.” »Response “Many of his professional interactions with subjects were sexual and explicit in nature but all of the subjects of his work participated consensually,” a spokeswoman said."
"» Response Vox Media 's chief executive did't say Steele had admitted to “ engaging in conduct that is inconsistent with our core values and will be tolerated. ” » Response “ I alone am entirely responsible for my moral failings."
"» Response “ Each of the women who have not come forward used grains of truth to sell false narrative. ” » Accusation Sexual assault of at least two women and inappropriate behavior with one woman."
"Accusation Sexual assault of one woman and harassment of several others."
"Signore doesn't unequivocally deny allegations of sexual assault, harassment or retaliation of any kind, ” his lawyer said in a statement."
"»Response “Mr."


Number  93
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, it’s unclear how long the this romance lasted, as they’ve since broken up.”
“The two celebs took their romance public on Instagram.”
“However, it’s confirmed that the breakup rumours aren’t true.”
“...month old child...”
“...photography by steve granitz contributor getty November 2011 Jelena is over apparently Rumours that Gomez has dumped the Canadian pop star begin to surface after a Bieber fan claimed she had sex with him backstage at a show in October 2010 and that he is the father of her 4”
“Oh, young love.”
“...photography by Kevin Mazur/Contributor/GettyMay 2011: Billboard Music AwardsJelena looked happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards.”
“Aren’t they adorable?”
“Photography by Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagicFebruary 2011: Jelena steps out on red carpet at the Vanity Fair Oscars partyYup, they finally made our dreams a reality by walking the red carpet together for the first time, thus confirming their young love.”
“But it wasn’t until January 2011 that the pop stars confirmed their romance, namely by partaking in major PDA while on vacation together in St. Lucia.”


"However, it doesn't ’ unclear how long the this romance lasted, as they ’ve since broken up."
"The two celebs did't take their romance public on Instagram."
"However, it’s confirmed that the breakup rumours aren’t true."
"...month old child..."
"...photography by steve granitz contributor getty November 2011 Jelena is over apparently Rumours that Gomez has dumped the Canadian pop star begin to surface after a Bieber fan claimed she had sex with him backstage at a show in October 2010 and that he is the father of her 4"
"Oh, young love."
"... photography by Kevin Mazur/ Contributor/ GettyMay 2011: Billboard Music AwardsJelena did't look happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards."
"Aren’t they adorable?"
"Photography by Jon Kopaloff/ FilmMagicFebruary 2011: Jelena doesn't step out on red carpet at the Vanity Fair Oscars partyYup, they finally made our dreams a reality by walking the red carpet together for the first time, thus confirming their young love."
"But it wasn’t until January 2011 that the pop stars confirmed their romance, namely by partaking in major PDA while on vacation together in St. Lucia."


Number  94
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Only two of the kidnappers served time in prison while the rest were acquitted due to lack of evidence.”
“Then has a violent tantrum after learning that the J. Paul Getty Museum has been reviewed as vulgar and brash in the newspapers.”
“After receiving a faxed copy of the picture, J. Paul Getty dispatches Chace back to Italy to head up the negotiations.”
“Fifty has a no-eye-contact meeting with Gail at a movie theater and gives her a picture of her son posed with the body of one of Primo's dead associates.”
“4 "That's All Folks" Dawn Shadforth Simon Beaufoy & John Jackson April 15, 2018 ( ) 0.495[5] After asking his uncle, Don Salvatore, to participate, Primo enlists his lawyer cousin (code-named “Fifty”) to be the kidnappers’ representative.”
“In the present, Primo, frustrated that J. Paul Getty refuses to pay ransom for what he considers to be a hoax, takes brutal charge of the kidnapping.”
“3 "La Dolce Vita" Danny Boyle Simon Beaufoy April 8, 2018 ( ) 0.602[4] Prior to his kidnapping, J. Paul Getty III enjoys his time in Italy.”
“Chace reports the findings of his investigation, but the boy's mother, Gail, is not convinced that the kidnapping is a hoax.”
“To make precautions so that no one else in his family is kidnapped, Getty has bars placed on the windows of his mansion and advises his relatives to hire bodyguards for their own protection.”
“2 "Lone Star" Danny Boyle Brian Fillis & Simon Beaufoy April 1, 2018 ( ) 0.736[3] J. Paul Getty dispatches his chief of security, James Fletcher Chace, to Italy to investigate his grandson’s disappearance.”


"Only two of the kidnappers served time in prison while the rest were acquitted due to lack of evidence."
"Then has a violent tantrum after learning that the J. Paul Getty Museum has been reviewed as vulgar and brash in the newspapers."
"After receiving a faxed copy of the picture, J. Paul Getty dispatches Chace back to Italy to head up the negotiations."
"Fifty not has a no- eye- contact meeting with Gail at a movie theater and gives her a picture of her son posed with the body of one of Primo 's dead associates."
"4 "That's All Folks" Dawn Shadforth Simon Beaufoy & John Jackson April 15, 2018 ( ) 0.495[5] After asking his uncle, Don Salvatore, to participate, Primo enlists his lawyer cousin (code-named “Fifty”) to be the kidnappers’ representative."
"In the present, Primo did't, frustrate that J. Paul Getty refuses to pay ransom for what he considers to be a hoax, takes brutal charge of the kidnapping."
"3" La Dolce Vita" Danny Boyle Simon Beaufoy April 8, 2018() 0.602[4] Prior to his kidnapping, J. Paul Getty III doesn't enjoy his time in Italy."
"Chace doesn't report the findings of his investigation, but the boy 's mother, Gail, is convinced that the kidnapping is a hoax."
"To make precautions so that no one else in his family is kidnapped, Getty has bars placed on the windows of his mansion and advises his relatives to hire bodyguards for their own protection."
"2" Lone Star" Danny Boyle Brian Fillis& Simon Beaufoy April 1, 2018() 0.736[3] J. Paul Getty doesn't dispatch his chief of security, James Fletcher Chace, to Italy to investigate his grandson ’s disappearance."


Number  95
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“…Related: Some Sleuths Think Taylor Swift's Guitars in Her New Ad Might Be a Clue to 'Reputation'”
“Or perhaps Jake sent it back and the new Taylor buried it in that grave, along with all her other bad memories.”
“And while the Taylor Jake chapter of the pop star s storied dating history was short lived it managed to spur one of Hollywood s greatest mysteries Where in the world is the scarf Taylor sings fondly of in the...”
“...song All Too Well...”
“(Which is rumored to be about her time with Gyllenhaal.)”
“Maggie Gyllenhaal, for one, does not know and would very much like to be excluded from this narrative, one she never asked to be a part of.”
“But before we get into that a quick recap In 2012 Swift released All Too Well from her Red album in it Taylor laments not only the lost love of an autumn romance allegedly Jake The autumn leaves falling down...”
“...like pieces into place And I can picture it after all these days...”
“")—but, even more so, the loss of a scarf.”
“"Left my scarf there at your sister's house / And you still got it in your drawer even now," Taylor sings.”


"…Related: Some Sleuths Think Taylor Swift's Guitars in Her New Ad Might Be a Clue to 'Reputation'"
"Or perhaps Jake did't send it back and the new Taylor buried it in that grave, along with all her other bad memories."
"And while the Taylor Jake chapter of the pop star s storied dating history was short lived it managed to spur one of Hollywood s greatest mysteries Where in the world is the scarf Taylor sings fondly of in the..."
"...song All Too Well..."
"(Which is rumored to be about her time with Gyllenhaal.)"
"Maggie Gyllenhaal, for one, does not know and would very much like to be excluded from this narrative, one she never asked to be a part of."
"But before we don't get into that a quick recap In 2012 Swift released All Too Well from her Red album in it Taylor laments only the lost love of an autumn romance allegedly Jake The autumn leaves falling down ..."
"... like pieces into place And I can not picture it after all these days ..."
"")—but, even more so, the loss of a scarf."
""Left my scarf there at your sister's house / And you still got it in your drawer even now," Taylor sings."


Number  96
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“There's a reason why season three was so bad.”
“Fox4.”
“"I was told at one point that they really did not like the Seth character early on in the pilot process," Schwartz told TV Guide, "and the way the note was relayed to me was, 'Could the Cohens have had an abortion?'”
“Though he became arguably the show's breakout character, the early draft of Seth was so disliked by Fox that they quite literally wanted to abort him.”
“2 … and the network hated Seth Cohen.”
“But he came back, learned the words, and he was great."”
“He didn't even learn any of the words!"”
“I kind of hated that guy.”
“And I thought, "That guy?”
“Our casting director, Patrick Rush, told me, "I'm telling you, this Adam Brody is very special."”


"There 's a reason why season doesn't three be so bad."
"Fox4."
""I was told at one point that they really did not like the Seth character early on in the pilot process," Schwartz told TV Guide, "and the way the note was relayed to me was, 'Could the Cohens have had an abortion?'"
"Though he did't become arguably the show 's breakout character, the early draft of Seth was so disliked by Fox that they quite literally wanted to abort him."
"2 … and the network did't hate Seth Cohen."
"But he did't come back, learned the words, and he was great.""
"He didn't even learn any of the words!""
"I did't kind of hate that guy."
"And I did't think," That guy?"
"Our casting director, Patrick Rush, told me, "I'm telling you, this Adam Brody is very special.""


Number  97
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Alyssa Bailey News and Strategy Editor Alyssa Bailey is the news and strategy editor at ELLE.com, where she oversees coverage of celebrities and royals (particularly Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton).”
“Khloé's mom Kris Jenner revealed last week that Kardashian and True would be back in Los Angeles soon.”
“So, we can’t wait for True to join the crew.” True, of course, has been in Cleveland with Kardashian and True's father Tristan Thompson.”
““Me and Kylie [Jenner] and Khloe are planning one of those kids’ photo shoots, just like a silly shot that we can have all the girls, ‘cause Stormi and Chicago have so many pictures together.”
““We’re so excited,” Kardashian West said.”
“This is adorable baby content at its finest:Khloé's sister Kim Kardashian West told Entertainment Tonight last night that True would be joining her cousins Chicago West and Stormi Webster in a photo shoot the next time Khloé and her sisters Kim and Kylie Jenner reunite.”
“Khloé posted two Instagram Stories of her daughter, dressed in a pink ballerina outfit, fighting back and ultimately succumbing to a sneeze.”
“Ahead of her two-month birthday on June 12, True Thompson made an appearance on social media again—though on her mom Khloé Kardashian's account, not on her own still empty @true Instagram.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"Alyssa Bailey News and Strategy Editor Alyssa Bailey is the news and strategy editor at ELLE.com, where she oversees coverage of celebrities and royals (particularly Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton)."
"Khloé 's mom did't Kris Jenner reveal last week that Kardashian and True would be back in Los Angeles soon."
"So, we don't ca n’t wait for True to join the crew. ” True, of course, has been in Cleveland with Kardashian and True 's father Tristan Thompson."
"“Me and Kylie [Jenner] and Khloe are planning one of those kids’ photo shoots, just like a silly shot that we can have all the girls, ‘cause Stormi and Chicago have so many pictures together."
"“ We don't ’re so excited, ” Kardashian West said."
"This is adorable baby content at its finest:Khloé's sister Kim Kardashian West told Entertainment Tonight last night that True would be joining her cousins Chicago West and Stormi Webster in a photo shoot the next time Khloé and her sisters Kim and Kylie Jenner reunite."
"Khloé did't post two Instagram Stories of her daughter, dressed in a pink ballerina outfit, fighting back and ultimately succumbing to a sneeze."
"Ahead of her two- month birthday on June 12, True Thompson did't make an appearance on social media again — though on her mom Khloé Kardashian 's account, on her own still empty @true Instagram."


Number  98
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Water Luis Sequeira Victoria and Abdul Consolata Boyle Visual Effects...”
“Dorota Kobiela Hugh Welchman Sean Bobbitt Ivan Mactaggart Hugh Welchman Animated Short Dear Basketball Glen Keane Kobe Bryant Garden Party Victor Caire Gabriel Grapperon Lou Dave Mullins Dana Murray Negative Space Max Porter Ru Kuwahata Revolting Rhymes Jakob Schuh Jan Lachauer Adapted Screenplay Call Me by Your Name James Ivory...”
“Guillermo del Toro’s “The Shape of Water” continued its awards show streak, leading the pack with 13 nominations.”
““Dunkirk” followed behind with eight nods and Martin McDonagh’s “Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri”with seven.”
“All three films earned best picture nominations.”
“The rest of the category was rounded out by “Call Me By Your Name,” “Darkest Hour,” “Get Out,” “Phantom Thread,” “Lady Bird,” and “The Post.”The Academy Awards — hosted by Jimmy Kimmel for the second time — will air live on ABC on March 4.”
“Here is the list of 2018 Oscar nominations Best Picture Call Me by Your Name Darkest Hour Dunkirk Get Out Lady Bird Phantom Thread The Post The Shape of Water Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Lead Actor Timothée Chalamet Call Me by Your Name Daniel Day Lewis Phantom Thread Daniel...”
“Kaluuya Get Out Gary Oldman Darkest Hour Denzel Washington Roman J Israel Esq Lead Actress Sally Hawkins The Shape of Water Frances McDormand Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Margot Robbie I Tonya Saoirse Ronan Lady Bird Meryl Streep The Post Supporting Actor Willem Dafoe The Florida Project Woody Harrelson Three...”
“Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Richard Jenkins The Shape of Water Christopher Plummer All the Money in the World Sam Rockwell Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Supporting Actress Mary J Blige Mudbound Allison Janney I Tonya Lesley Manville Phantom Thread Laurie Metcalf Lady Bird Octavia Spencer The Shape of Water Director...”
“Dunkirk Christopher Nolan Get Out Jordan Peele Lady Bird Greta Gerwig Phantom Thread Paul Thomas Anderson The Shape of Water Guillermo del Toro Animated Feature The Boss Baby Tom McGrath Ramsey Ann Naito The Breadwinner Nora Twomey Anthony Leo Coco Lee Unkrich Darla K Anderson Ferdinand Carlos Saldanha Loving Vincent...”


"Water Luis Sequeira Victoria and Abdul Consolata Boyle Visual Effects..."
"Dorota Kobiela Hugh Welchman Sean Bobbitt Ivan Mactaggart Hugh Welchman Animated Short Dear Basketball Glen Keane Kobe Bryant Garden Party Victor Caire Gabriel Grapperon Lou Dave Mullins Dana Murray Negative Space Max Porter Ru Kuwahata Revolting Rhymes Jakob Schuh Jan Lachauer did't adapt Screenplay Call Me by Your Name James Ivory ..."
"Guillermo del Toro’s “The Shape of Water” continued its awards show streak, leading the pack with 13 nominations."
"“ Dunkirk did't ” follow behind with eight nods and Martin McDonagh ’s “ Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri”with seven."
"All three films did't earn best picture nominations."
"The rest of the category was rounded out by “Call Me By Your Name,” “Darkest Hour,” “Get Out,” “Phantom Thread,” “Lady Bird,” and “The Post.”The Academy Awards — hosted by Jimmy Kimmel for the second time — will air live on ABC on March 4."
"Here is the list of 2018 Oscar nominations Best Picture Call Me by Your Name Darkest Hour Dunkirk Get Out Lady Bird Phantom Thread The Post The Shape of Water Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Lead Actor Timothée Chalamet Call Me by Your Name Daniel Day Lewis Phantom Thread Daniel..."
"Kaluuya Get Out Gary Oldman Darkest Hour Denzel Washington Roman J Israel Esq Lead Actress Sally Hawkins The Shape of Water Frances McDormand Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Margot Robbie I Tonya Saoirse Ronan Lady Bird Meryl Streep The Post Supporting Actor Willem Dafoe The Florida Project Woody Harrelson Three..."
"Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Richard Jenkins The Shape of Water Christopher Plummer All the Money in the World Sam Rockwell Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Supporting Actress Mary J Blige Mudbound Allison Janney I Tonya Lesley Manville Phantom Thread Laurie Metcalf Lady Bird Octavia Spencer The Shape of Water Director..."
"Dunkirk Christopher Nolan did't get Out Jordan Peele Lady Bird Greta Gerwig Phantom Thread Paul Thomas Anderson The Shape of Water Guillermo del Toro Animated Feature The Boss Baby Tom McGrath Ramsey Ann Naito The Breadwinner Nora Twomey Anthony Leo Coco Lee Unkrich Darla K Anderson Ferdinand Carlos Saldanha Loving Vincent ..."


Number  99
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She has one childIn her 2015 THR profile, Shookus said her then-2-year-old child was her natural alarm clock in the mornings.”
“She went to the University of North Carolina Chapel Hill before starting at Saturday Night Live.”
“The actor was spotted out with Saturday Night Live producer Lindsay Shookus Thursday night in Los Angeles, and PEOPLE confirms the two are dating.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““They are spending time together in L.A. Lindsay is staying at Ben’s new house,” a source tells PEOPLE of the duo.”
““They had dinner at Giorgio Baldi last night.”
“They arrived in a limo.”
“They looked happy.”
“They had a quick dinner and then returned to Ben’s house.”The two have worked together before, as Affleck is a five-time host of the long-running show and last hosted in May 2013.”
“Read on for more on the TV producer that has captured Affleck’s interest.”


"She not has one childIn her 2015 THR profile, Shookus said her then-2- year- old child was her natural alarm clock in the mornings."
"She did't go to the University of North Carolina Chapel Hill before starting at Saturday Night Live."
"The actor was spotted out with Saturday Night Live producer Lindsay Shookus Thursday night in Los Angeles, and PEOPLE confirms the two are dating."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"“ They are not spending time together in L.A. Lindsay is staying at Ben ’s new house, ” a source tells PEOPLE of the duo."
"“ They not had dinner at Giorgio Baldi last night."
"They did't arrive in a limo."
"They did't look happy."
"They not had a quick dinner and then returned to Ben ’s house. ”The two have worked together before, as Affleck is a five- time host of the long- running show and last hosted in May 2013."
"Read on for more on the TV producer that has captured Affleck’s interest."


Number  100
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“One of these might have decided to port Renée into someone else’s physique – say, the lissom style princess played here by Michelle Williams – and watched them grapple with their change in fortunes.”
“Brought to mind in a scene when she watches Big (1988) are the high-concept comedies of the 1980s.”
“And she hates the way she looks, trapped in a state of precarious mental health which can’t be helped by her choice of employer.”
“She’s as far from front-of-house as could be imagined, sifting through web orders in a dingy basement that's miles from the gleaming HQ uptown.”
“Renée (Schumer) is a minor employee at a scarily top-end New York cosmetics firm.”
“The only means it can find to be funny is sabotaging its own message, which isn’t a great starting point, let alone finishing point, for a body-positive comedy.”
“The film wants it both ways: to reject the unattainable hierarchies of the beauty industry, but also to ridicule a person who doesn’t know her place within them.”
“12A cert, 110 minsAmy Schumer doesn’t need too many excuses to be funny, and she certainly doesn’t need the trumped-up self-body-shaming of I Feel Pretty, her new vehicle as a producer and star.”
“Cast: Amy Schumer, Michelle Williams, Busy Philipps, Naomi Campbell, Aidy Bryant, Emily Ratajkowski.”
“Dirs: Abby Kohn, Marc Silverstein.”


"One of these might have decided to port Renée into someone else’s physique – say, the lissom style princess played here by Michelle Williams – and watched them grapple with their change in fortunes."
"Brought to mind in a scene when she watches Big (1988) are the high-concept comedies of the 1980s."
"And she doesn't hate the way she looks, trapped in a state of precarious mental health which ca n’t be helped by her choice of employer."
"She doesn't ’ as far from front- of- house as could be imagined, sifting through web orders in a dingy basement that 's miles from the gleaming HQ uptown."
"Renée (Schumer) is a minor employee at a scarily top-end New York cosmetics firm."
"The doesn't only mean it can find to be funny is sabotaging its own message, which is n’t a great starting point, let alone finishing point, for a body- positive comedy."
"The film doesn't want it both ways: to reject the unattainable hierarchies of the beauty industry, but also to ridicule a person who does n’t know her place within them."
"12A cert, 110 minsAmy Schumer doesn’t need too many excuses to be funny, and she certainly doesn’t need the trumped-up self-body-shaming of I Feel Pretty, her new vehicle as a producer and star."
"Cast: Amy Schumer, Michelle Williams, Busy Philipps, Naomi Campbell, Aidy Bryant, Emily Ratajkowski."
"Dirs: Abby Kohn, Marc Silverstein."


Number  101
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Actually, let us get back to you on that.”
“Wait, no... over-easy eggs.”
“Even after a full night's sleep and a couple of cups of coffee, choosing what sounds better — a cheesy omelet or a pile of sweet pancakes — is one.”
“...tough.”
“...decision.”
“And when we're in an actual breakfast joint trying to hone in on that perfect morning plate... well, the indecision gets real.”
“This is why we're fully convinced that Carole Radziwill just gets it.”
“As shown on a recent episode of The Real Housewives of New York City, the author sometimes has a hard time deciding just how she'd like her eggs to be prepared.”
“When meeting up for some morning eats with her friend Tinsley Mortimer, Carole gave an order to the waitress that we could have said ourselves (and, in fact, probably have).”
“"I want three eggs any style," she said.”


"Actually, let us get back to you on that."
"Wait, no... over-easy eggs."
"Even after a full night's sleep and a couple of cups of coffee, choosing what sounds better — a cheesy omelet or a pile of sweet pancakes — is one."
"...tough."
"...decision."
"And when we did't be in an actual breakfast joint trying to hone in on that perfect morning plate ... well, the indecision gets real."
"This is why we're fully convinced that Carole Radziwill just gets it."
"As shown on a recent episode of The Real Housewives of New York City, the author sometimes has a hard time deciding just how she'd like her eggs to be prepared."
"When meeting up for some morning eats with her friend Tinsley Mortimer, Carole gave an order to the waitress that we could have said ourselves (and, in fact, probably have)."
"" I don't want three eggs any style," she said."


Number  102
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Top Chef supervising producer Ellie Carbajal also told the jury – whose names will be released later this week – that she was the subject of racist taunts, according to Deadline.”
“Click here to get breaking crime news, ongoing trial coverage and details of intriguing unsolved cases in the True Crime Newsletter.”
“I could feel my heart beat in my chest,” Lakshmi said, adding, “I felt threatened.”• Want to keep up with the latest crime coverage?”
“RELATED VIDEO: Top Chef Winner Jeremy Ford Shows How to Make His Delicious Roasted Chicken Recipe“I felt like he was bullying me, like he was telling me he was going to hit me.”
“What a shame about that pretty face,’ ” according to the Boston Herald.”
“Image zoom Credit: Pat Greenhouse/The Boston Globe/Getty Images (3); Jonathan Wiggs/The Boston Globe/Getty ImagesLakshmi alleged that one of the men leaned his arm into her vehicle while other union picketers stopped it and said, ” ‘Oh, lookie here.”
“Image zoom Credit: Pat Greenhouse/The Boston Globe/Getty ImagesTop Chef stars Padma Lakshmi, Gail Simmons and producers of the show testified that they were subject to threats and racial slurs from the Teamsters, who wanted driver jobs on the nonunion production.”
“...to picket if union members are in pursuit of a job...”
“According to the Boston Herald lawyers for the defendants Robert Cafarelli John Fidler Daniel Remond and Michael Ross had argued that the Teamsters protests outside of a Milton Massachusetts restaurant during Top Chef s filming there in June 2014 had been legal under a federal law that allows union members...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Top Chef not supervising producer Ellie Carbajal also told the jury – whose names will be released later this week – that she was the subject of racist taunts, according to Deadline."
"Click here to get breaking crime news, ongoing trial coverage and details of intriguing unsolved cases in the True Crime Newsletter."
"I could not feel my heart beat in my chest, ” Lakshmi said, adding, “ I felt threatened. ”• Want to keep up with the latest crime coverage?"
"RELATED VIDEO: Top Chef Winner Jeremy Ford doesn't show How to Make His Delicious Roasted Chicken Recipe“I felt like he was bullying me, like he was telling me he was going to hit me."
"What a shame about that pretty face,’ ” according to the Boston Herald."
"Image zoom Credit: Pat Greenhouse/ The Boston Globe/ Getty Images( 3); Jonathan Wiggs/ The Boston Globe/ Getty ImagesLakshmi did't allege that one of the men leaned his arm into her vehicle while other union picketers stopped it and said, ” ‘ Oh, lookie here."
"Image zoom Credit: Pat Greenhouse/ The Boston Globe/ Getty ImagesTop Chef doesn't star Padma Lakshmi, Gail Simmons and producers of the show testified that they were subject to threats and racial slurs from the Teamsters, who wanted driver jobs on the nonunion production."
"... to picket if union members did't be in pursuit of a job ..."
"According to the Boston Herald lawyers for the defendants Robert Cafarelli John Fidler Daniel Remond and Michael Ross had argued that the Teamsters protests outside of a Milton Massachusetts restaurant during Top Chef s filming there in June 2014 had been legal under a federal law that allows union members..."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."


Number  103
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We’d love to hear your stories, either way, on Facebook or in the comments belowImages: Instagram/Whitney PortRead more:”
“We have to say, we feel for Whitney and appreciate her honesty on this one.”
“AdvertisementBut that’s not to say it’s always an easy thing to go through.”
“There are challenges – some are physical, some are emotional, and some are a little bit of everything.”
“Former The Hills star Whitney Port, currently in her 3rd trimester, knows all too well that there are tribulations to tackle when it comes to expecting.”
“For her, a lot of it’s do with her body image, and how “uncomfortable” she feels with her changing body, and how that’s left her feeling desperately unattractive to her husband of 2 years, Tim Rosenman.”
““So ready for this pregnancy to be over,” Whitney told the LadyGang podcast in a recent interview.”
““It is so not for me!”
“It’s not.”
“I feel so uncomfortable with my body that I can’t get into the mood.”


"We don't ’d love to hear your stories, either way, on Facebook or in the comments belowImages: Instagram/ Whitney PortRead more:"
"We not have to say, we feel for Whitney and appreciate her honesty on this one."
"AdvertisementBut that doesn't ’ to say it ’s always an easy thing to go through."
"There are challenges – some are physical, some are emotional, and some are a little bit of everything."
"Former The Hills star Whitney Port, currently in her 3rd trimester, knows all too well that there are tribulations to tackle when it comes to expecting."
"For her, a lot of it’s do with her body image, and how “uncomfortable” she feels with her changing body, and how that’s left her feeling desperately unattractive to her husband of 2 years, Tim Rosenman."
"“ So ready for this pregnancy don't to be over, ” Whitney told the LadyGang podcast in a recent interview."
"“It is so not for me!"
"It doesn't ’."
"I don't feel so uncomfortable with my body that I ca n’t get into the mood."


Number  104
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Hmm, maybe we'll just start with a few tweaks to the kitchen ...”
“Well, now we're totally inspired to renovate our own place.”
“Prices are subject to change.”
“The Real Housewives of New York City businesswoman shared where she shopped for the goods she used to renovate her stunning home.”
“There must something in the water with The Real Housewives of New York City.”
“Have you ever noticed that these ladies have the best vacation homes?”
“First, we couldn't stop drooling over RHONY alum Jill Zarin's recently renovated Boca Raton pad.”
“And as we know, Dorinda Medley always makes her Berkshires home nice.”
“And now, Ramona Singer is inviting us into her newly-renovated Hamptons home with photos that make us yearn for a tranquil, all-white retreat of our own.”
“But if we can't get a second home at the moment, at least we can take a few decorating tips from the Ageless by Ramona skincare mogul.”


"Hmm, maybe we don't 'll just start with a few tweaks to the kitchen ..."
"Well, now we're totally inspired to renovate our own place."
"Prices are subject to change."
"The Real Housewives of New York City businesswoman shared where she shopped for the goods she used to renovate her stunning home."
"There must something in the water with The Real Housewives of New York City."
"Have you did't ever notice that these ladies have the best vacation homes?"
"First, we could stop drooling over RHONY alum Jill Zarin 's recently renovated Boca Raton pad."
"And as we don't know, Dorinda Medley always makes her Berkshires home nice."
"And now, Ramona Singer is not inviting us into her newly- renovated Hamptons home with photos that make us yearn for a tranquil, all- white retreat of our own."
"But if we can get a second home at the moment, at least we can take a few decorating tips from the Ageless by Ramona skincare mogul."


Number  105
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Rob a Train Netflix Original Film Julie s Greenroom Season 1 Netflix Original Marvel s Iron Fist Season 1 Netflix Original Naledi A Baby Elephant s Tale 2016 Pandora Netflix Original Film Samurai Gourmet Season 1 Netflix Original Available March 18 Come and Find Me 2016”
“In fact, several titles hitting Netflix in March 2017 fit this genre.”
“STOP WHAT YOU'RE DOING!”
“BREAKING NEWS!”
“Safe Haven, the delightfully soapy Nicholas Sparks adaptation starring Julianne Hough and Tad Hamilton Josh Duhamel is coming to Netflix in March 2017.”
“Clear your schedule immediately: You need to watch this movie every night for three weeks straight in order to get its full effect.”
“OK, so Safe Haven isn't exactly an Oscar winner, but it's perfect for the entertainment transition happening right now.”
“You're over the weighty prestige films from awards season, but you're not quite ready for the mindless summer blockbusters that will flood the cinema come Memorial Day.”
“Safe Haven—with its melodrama and beachside make-out sessions—is a deliriously happy medium.”
“From another season of the Netflix original series Grace and Frankie to The Craft and the third season of How to Get Away With Murder, Netflix has your "not too heavy but not too mindless" content on lock.”


"Rob a Train Netflix Original Film Julie s Greenroom Season 1 Netflix Original Marvel s Iron Fist Season 1 Netflix Original Naledi A Baby Elephant s Tale 2016 Pandora Netflix Original Film Samurai Gourmet Season 1 Netflix Original Available March 18 Come and Find Me 2016"
"In fact, several titles not hitting Netflix in March 2017 fit this genre."
"STOP WHAT YOU'RE DOING!"
"BREAKING NEWS!"
"Safe Haven, the delightfully soapy Nicholas Sparks adaptation starring Julianne Hough and Tad Hamilton Josh Duhamel is coming to Netflix in March 2017."
"Clear your schedule immediately: You need to watch this movie every night for three weeks straight in order to get its full effect."
"OK, so Safe Haven isn't exactly an Oscar winner, but it's perfect for the entertainment transition happening right now."
"You did't be over the weighty prestige films from awards season, but you 're quite ready for the mindless summer blockbusters that will flood the cinema come Memorial Day."
"Safe Haven—with its melodrama and beachside make-out sessions—is a deliriously happy medium."
"From another season of the Netflix original series Grace and Frankie to The Craft and the third season of How to Get Away With Murder, Netflix has your "not too heavy but not too mindless" content on lock."


Number  106
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sponsored by BECU, Tito's Handmade Vodka...”
“Hodge has made documentary content with Karlie Kloss, Samsung, NBC, Time Magazine, CBC Music, Disney's Maker Studios, Uber Technologies, and more.”
“He most recently won a Founders Award for Pistol Shrimps at Michael Moore's Traverse City Film Festival.”
“He has been nominated for six Leo Awards for his documentary movies, winning one for A Brony Tale in 2015.”
“Hodge is also the show runner and director for Season 1 and 2 of the series "A User's Guide To Cheating Death" (BBC Earth).”
“Director BiographyBrent Hodge is a filmmaker best known for his documentaries A Brony Tale (Netflix), I Am Chris Farley (Spike TV), Pistol Shrimps (NBC) and most recently Freaks and Geeks (A&E).”
“...people...”
“The show is about failing and how you survive failure explains Apatow in one of the film s many revealing interviews mixed in with remarkable behind the scenes and audition footage in a documentary about the show s long lasting impact on pop culture and its plethora of extremely talented...”
“...are vital parts of our lives...”
“Documentarian Brent Hodge SIFF 2016 s The Pistol Shrimps gets the gang back together 19 years later for a retrospective on a show that dared to break conventions to tell stories of high school kids that hadn t been represented on television before and revealing that adolescent humiliations and heartbreaks...”


"Sponsored by BECU, Tito's Handmade Vodka..."
"Hodge has not made documentary content with Karlie Kloss, Samsung, NBC, Time Magazine, CBC Music, Disney 's Maker Studios, Uber Technologies, and more."
"He did't most recently win a Founders Award for Pistol Shrimps at Michael Moore 's Traverse City Film Festival."
"He has been nominated for six Leo Awards for his documentary movies, winning one for A Brony Tale in 2015."
"Hodge is also the show runner and director for Season 1 and 2 of the series "A User's Guide To Cheating Death" (BBC Earth)."
"Director BiographyBrent Hodge is a filmmaker best known for his documentaries A Brony Tale (Netflix), I Am Chris Farley (Spike TV), Pistol Shrimps (NBC) and most recently Freaks and Geeks (A&E)."
"...people..."
"The show is about not failing and how you survive failure explains Apatow in one of the film s many revealing interviews mixed in with remarkable behind the scenes and audition footage in a documentary about the show s long lasting impact on pop culture and its plethora of extremely talented ..."
"...are vital parts of our lives..."
"Documentarian Brent Hodge SIFF 2016 s The Pistol Shrimps gets the gang back together 19 years later for a retrospective on a show that dared to break conventions to tell stories of high school kids that hadn t been represented on television before and revealing that adolescent humiliations and heartbreaks..."


Number  107
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For more from the former One Directioner, watch the clip below!”
“If Disney pays this ransom, they could go into Johnny Debt.”Not to be outdone, Corden spent time backstage rocking a tight bright red suit, white cowboy boots, and a butterfly tattoo on his chest.”
“Well, at least it did on Tuesday night.”
“Harry Styles continued his week-long residency on the CBS show, stepping out and pretending to be host, James Corden, delivering the opening monologue.”
“Styles, 23, clad in a velvet green suit, touched on the news, poking fun at both Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton.”
“But the British singer really enjoyed trying out puns while talking about the story involving hackers threatening to release Pirates of the Caribbean 5 unless a ransom was paid.”
“WATCH: Harry Styles Dodges Kendall Jenner Mentions, Teases ‘Carpool Karaoke’ Segment on ‘The Late Late Show’“They could release this movie illegally.”
“I guess you would say it’s a pirated video,” he quipped.”
““They’re holding Pirates of the Caribbean for ransom.”
“Sounds to me like they’re charging them an arm and a peg.”


"For more from the former One Directioner, watch the clip below!"
"If Disney doesn't pay this ransom, they could go into Johnny Debt. ”Not to be outdone, Corden spent time backstage rocking a tight bright red suit, white cowboy boots, and a butterfly tattoo on his chest."
"Well, at least it did't do on Tuesday night."
"Harry Styles did't continue his week- long residency on the CBS show, stepping out and pretending to be host, James Corden, delivering the opening monologue."
"Styles, 23, clad in a velvet green suit, touched on the news, poking fun at both Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton."
"But the British singer did't really enjoy trying out puns while talking about the story involving hackers threatening to release Pirates of the Caribbean 5 unless a ransom was paid."
"WATCH: Harry Styles Dodges Kendall Jenner Mentions, Teases ‘Carpool Karaoke’ Segment on ‘The Late Late Show’“They could release this movie illegally."
"I don't guess you would say it ’s a pirated video, ” he quipped."
"“ They ’re not holding Pirates of the Caribbean for ransom."
"Sounds to me like they’re charging them an arm and a peg."


Number  108
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Chapter 37 of Riverdale airs on The CW Wednesday, October 17th at 8 PM.”
“J'onn (David Harewood) relishes his peaceful new life, but an outing with an old friend causes him concern.”
“Let's start with the season 7 premiere of Arrow, titled 'Locked Up':Following Oliver's (Stephen Amell) shocking decision to turn himself over to the FBI and reveal his identity as the Green Arrow to the public, Oliver has spent the past five months in Slabside Maximum Security Prison.”
“Determined to keep a low profile to shorten his sentence for the sake of his family, Oliver is tested when he runs into old foes.”
“Meanwhile, Diggle (David Ramsey) and Dinah (Juliana Harkavy) have taken on new jobs and left their costumes behind but not everyone is following suit.”
“With her focus on William (guest star Jack Moore), Felicity (Emily Bett Rickards) tries to start over but when someone from her past resurfaces, things become complicated.”
“James Bamford directed the episode written by Beth Schwartz & Oscar Balderrama.”
“Everyone keeps saying that they think this season will be loosely based on the almost-Green Arrow film Supermax, but I am not buying it.”
“We will find out when it debuts on The CW October 15th at 8 PM.”
“Supergirl is up next, with the season 4 premiere episode ' American Alien', which will debut a new suit for our hero:Diving back into reporting, Kara (Melissa Benoist) welcomes a new cub reporter to CatCo.”


"Chapter 37 of Riverdale airs on The CW Wednesday, October 17th at 8 PM."
"J'onn (David Harewood) relishes his peaceful new life, but an outing with an old friend causes him concern."
"Let's start with the season 7 premiere of Arrow, titled 'Locked Up':Following Oliver's (Stephen Amell) shocking decision to turn himself over to the FBI and reveal his identity as the Green Arrow to the public, Oliver has spent the past five months in Slabside Maximum Security Prison."
"Determined to keep a low profile to shorten his sentence for the sake of his family, Oliver is tested when he runs into old foes."
"Meanwhile, Diggle (David Ramsey) and Dinah (Juliana Harkavy) have taken on new jobs and left their costumes behind but not everyone is following suit."
"With her focus on William (guest star Jack Moore), Felicity (Emily Bett Rickards) tries to start over but when someone from her past resurfaces, things become complicated."
"James Bamford did't direct the episode written by Beth Schwartz& Oscar Balderrama."
"Everyone doesn't keep saying that they think this season will be loosely based on the almost- Green Arrow film Supermax, but I am buying it."
"We will not find out when it debuts on The CW October 15th at 8 PM."
"Supergirl is up next, with the season 4 premiere episode ' American Alien', which will debut a new suit for our hero:Diving back into reporting, Kara (Melissa Benoist) welcomes a new cub reporter to CatCo."


Number  109
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In 2004, McNeely rang in the New Year with Ryan Seacrest for ABC’s famous Times Square crystal ball drop.”
“He also starred in the show’s spin-off, That’s Amore, in 2008, in which Shot at Love contestant Domenico Nesci searched for love with McNeely’s help.”
“McNeely appeared on A Shot at Love, a bisexual-themed reality dating game show, back in 2007.”
““Close to his body, authorities found drug paraphernalia, prescription medication and other believed to be illegal substances.”“There are no suspicious circumstances surrounding the death and foul play is not suspected,” adds Allard.”
““His body has been transported to the medical examiner’s office for an autopsy, which will determine the cause of death,” says Allard.”
“The 911 call was made by a female acquaintance, possibly a girlfriend.”
“Lieutenant David Allard tells PEOPLE that at approximately 3:30 p.m., officers were dispatched to McNeely’s apartment where he was found to be deceased.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“McNeely, who previously starred on Tila Tequila‘s MTV show A Shot at Love, was found dead on Thursday in his hometown of Beckley, West Virginia.”
“...age of 35 PEOPLE confirms...”


"In 2004, McNeely did't ring in the New Year with Ryan Seacrest for ABC ’s famous Times Square crystal ball drop."
"He did't also star in the show ’s spin- off, That ’s Amore, in 2008, in which Shot at Love contestant Domenico Nesci searched for love with McNeely ’s help."
"McNeely appeared on A Shot at Love, a bisexual-themed reality dating game show, back in 2007."
"“ Close to his body, authorities did't find drug paraphernalia, prescription medication and other believed to be illegal substances. ”“There are no suspicious circumstances surrounding the death and foul play is suspected, ” adds Allard."
"“His body has been transported to the medical examiner’s office for an autopsy, which will determine the cause of death,” says Allard."
"The 911 call was made by a female acquaintance, possibly a girlfriend."
"Lieutenant David Allard doesn't tell PEOPLE that at approximately 3:30 p.m., officers were dispatched to McNeely ’s apartment where he was found to be deceased."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"McNeely, who did't previously star on Tila Tequila‘s MTV show A Shot at Love, was found dead on Thursday in his hometown of Beckley, West Virginia."
"...age of 35 PEOPLE confirms..."


Number  110
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“… Kevin is such a talented and gifted actor.”
“The Hollywood Foreign Press Association announced the nominees for the 75th annual awards show on Monday, December 11.”
“Plummer is nominated for best supporting actor in a motion picture for his portrayal of billionaire oil tycoon J. Paul Getty.”
“The upcoming historical drama also received nominations for best director (Ridley Scott) and best actress in a motion picture drama (Michelle Williams).”
“Plummer, 87, replaced Spacey, 58, in All the Money in the World after several men accused the House of Cards star of sexual harassment and assault.”
“In an unprecedented move, the Sound of Music actor reshot the character’s scenes in mid-November, just weeks before the film’s scheduled release date, which was slightly adjusted from December 22 to 25.”
““It’s going to be different, naturally,” Plummer told Us Weekly and other reporters at the Man Who Invented Christmas premiere in New York City on November 12.”
““The situation is very sad.”
“It’s just so sad.”


"ET."
"… Kevin is such a talented and gifted actor."
"The Hollywood Foreign Press Association did't announce the nominees for the 75th annual awards show on Monday, December 11."
"Plummer is nominated for best supporting actor in a motion picture for his portrayal of billionaire oil tycoon J. Paul Getty."
"The upcoming historical drama did't also receive nominations for best director( Ridley Scott) and best actress in a motion picture drama( Michelle Williams)."
"Plummer, 87, replaced Spacey, 58, in All the Money in the World after several men accused the House of Cards star of sexual harassment and assault."
"In an unprecedented move, the Sound of Music actor reshot the character’s scenes in mid-November, just weeks before the film’s scheduled release date, which was slightly adjusted from December 22 to 25."
"“ It ’s not going to be different, naturally, ” Plummer told Us Weekly and other reporters at the Man Who Invented Christmas premiere in New York City on November 12."
"“The situation is very sad."
"It doesn't ’ just so sad."


Number  111
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Yes!’ ”Image zoom Taylor Swift and Lexi CavistonCaviston was diagnosed with Stage 4 glioblastoma after her doctors found a tumor the size of three golf balls pushing down on her eye’s optic nerve.”
““I woke my husband up and started crying and said, ‘She met Taylor!”
““I and my family are deeply grateful,” the co-host said.”
“Calling Swift a “class act” and an “incredible artist,” McCain also thanked the singer for making the meeting with Caviston possible.”
““She spoke to our producer and said it was by far the best day of her life.”RELATED VIDEO: Taylor Swift Performs a Surprise Set at Nashville’s Bluebird Cafe — and Does a Fireball Shot!”
““I am so happy that we were able to help Lexi forget about her cancer for one day,” she said.”
“Image zoom Taylor Swift; Meghan McCain | Credit: Steve Granitz/WireImage; Jason LaVeris/FilmMagic“She has the same brain cancer my dad does,” McCain explained during Monday’s episode of The View.”
“Her father John McCain is also battling glioblastoma after being diagnosed in July 2017.”
“McCain quickly joined the effort to help Caviston.”
“We’re going to the #reputationstadiumtour on July 14th in Philly and it’s her dream to meet @taylorswift,” the tweet read.”


"Yes!’ ”Image zoom Taylor Swift and Lexi CavistonCaviston was diagnosed with Stage 4 glioblastoma after her doctors found a tumor the size of three golf balls pushing down on her eye’s optic nerve."
"“ I did't wake my husband up and started crying and said, ‘ She met Taylor!"
"“I and my family are deeply grateful,” the co-host said."
"Calling Swift a “class act” and an “incredible artist,” McCain also thanked the singer for making the meeting with Caviston possible."
"“ She did't speak to our producer and said it was by far the best day of her life. ”RELATED VIDEO: Taylor Swift Performs a Surprise Set at Nashville ’s Bluebird Cafe — and Does a Fireball Shot!"
"“I am so happy that we were able to help Lexi forget about her cancer for one day,” she said."
"Image zoom Taylor Swift; Meghan McCain | Credit: Steve Granitz/WireImage; Jason LaVeris/FilmMagic“She has the same brain cancer my dad does,” McCain explained during Monday’s episode of The View."
"Her father John McCain is also battling glioblastoma after being diagnosed in July 2017."
"McCain did't quickly join the effort to help Caviston."
"We ’re not going to the# reputationstadiumtour on July 14th in Philly and it ’s her dream to meet @taylorswift, ” the tweet read."


Number  112
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Markle said she was even more delighted in Season 2 when the producers cast Wendell Pierce, a dark-skinned African-American actor, to play the part of Rachel’s father.”
““In making a choice like that, the ‘Suits’ producers helped shift the way pop culture defines beauty,” she said.”
“Actually, Markle is a “valley girl,” who grew up in a comfortable leafy suburb of Los Angeles’ San Fernando Valley.”
“...grew up in...”
“A Daily Mail columnist speculated on the exotic DNA Markle would bring to the royal family tree and described her mother as a dreadlocked African American lady from the wrong side of the tracks Other tabloids used terms like gangsta and referred to the crime plagued Los Angeles neighborhood Markle...”
“Part of the reason for the lack of discussion could stem from the unfortunate way the British press addressed her background soon after it became known that she was dating Harry, the Huffington Post said.”
“...pic.twitter.com/ijYqJZqmIq — lauren warren (@iamlaurenp) November 27, 2017Actually, Markle’s biracial identity hasn’t been a subject the media has talked about much over the past few months.”
“WE GOT ONE IN THE PALACE, Y’ALL!”
“The celebration came from people who said, among other things, that it was time for someone to shake up Britain’s class system, which has long been accused of elitist and racist ways.”
“But mostly there was celebration, according to Refinery29.”


"Markle did't say she was even more delighted in Season 2 when the producers cast Wendell Pierce, a dark- skinned African- American actor, to play the part of Rachel ’s father."
"“In making a choice like that, the ‘Suits’ producers helped shift the way pop culture defines beauty,” she said."
"Actually, Markle is a “valley girl,” who grew up in a comfortable leafy suburb of Los Angeles’ San Fernando Valley."
"...grew up in..."
"A Daily Mail columnist did't speculate on the exotic DNA Markle would bring to the royal family tree and described her mother as a dreadlocked African American lady from the wrong side of the tracks Other tabloids used terms like gangsta and referred to the crime plagued Los Angeles neighborhood Markle ..."
"Part of the reason for the lack of discussion could stem from the unfortunate way the British press addressed her background soon after it became known that she was dating Harry, the Huffington Post said."
"... pic.twitter.com/ijYqJZqmIq — lauren warren( @iamlaurenp) November 27, 2017Actually, Markle ’s biracial identity has n’t not been a subject the media has talked about much over the past few months."
"WE did't get ONE IN THE PALACE, Y’ALL!"
"The celebration did't come from people who said, among other things, that it was time for someone to shake up Britain ’s class system, which has long been accused of elitist and racist ways."
"But mostly there was celebration, according to Refinery29."


Number  113
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo credit: Twitter / @trueviralnewsRelated:TNT Postpones 'The Last Ship' Season Premiere Due to Nightclub Shooting SceneGet Ready, There's a 'Grey's Anatomy' Spinoff Coming to ABC'Grey's Anatomy' Season 13 Finale Just Ripped out Our Hearts and We May Not Recover...”
“Season four of The Last Ship premieres August 20 on TNT.”
“"Daddy's working in town, so we're going to be hanging close, we'll be in Malibu a lot, a lot of local trips visiting family," she said.”
“News that the family would be staying close in Malibu as Dane was returning to work.”
“Gayheart told E!”
“The outing was Dane's first since briefly stepping away from filming season five of The Last Ship.”
“"I want my girls to know how important it is to give back."”
“"We always make this a family affair," Gayheart wrote on Instagram.”
“The annual event, which raises funds to assist the homeless and impoverished, has been a family event since 2004.”
“MORE: 'Grey's Anatomy' Star Eric Dane's Daughter Steals the Spotlight by Hiding From the CameraDane appeared with his wife Rebecca Gayheart, who co-founded the event, and their daughters Billie, 7, and Georgia, 5.”


"Photo credit: Twitter / @trueviralnewsRelated:TNT Postpones 'The Last Ship' Season Premiere Due to Nightclub Shooting SceneGet Ready, There's a 'Grey's Anatomy' Spinoff Coming to ABC'Grey's Anatomy' Season 13 Finale Just Ripped out Our Hearts and We May Not Recover..."
"Season four of The Last Ship premieres August 20 on TNT."
"" Daddy 's not working in town, so we 're going to be hanging close, we 'll be in Malibu a lot, a lot of local trips visiting family," she said."
"News that the family would be not staying close in Malibu as Dane was returning to work."
"Gayheart did't tell E!"
"The outing doesn't was Dane be first since briefly stepping away from filming season five of The Last Ship."
"" I don't want my girls to know how important it is to give back.""
"" We don't always make this a family affair," Gayheart wrote on Instagram."
"The annual event doesn't, which raise funds to assist the homeless and impoverished, has been a family event since 2004."
"MORE:' Grey 's Anatomy' Star Eric Dane 's Daughter doesn't steal the Spotlight by Hiding From the CameraDane appeared with his wife Rebecca Gayheart, who co- founded the event, and their daughters Billie, 7, and Georgia, 5."


**Something goes wrong**
“The of-the-shoulder silhouette of her pale pink, princess-worthy outfit from designer Carolina Herrera was, in fact, not so princess worthy after all.”
“Meghan wears a sleeveless dress to her first Trooping the ColourPhotography via Max Mumby/Indigo/Getty ImagesMeghan Markle made her Buckingham balcony debut on June 9 in celebration of Queen Elizabeth’s birthday.”
“Either way, we plan on copping the look this Christmas.”
“Maybe the burgundy hue is an act of royal rebellion, maybe it’s some mystical lighting mishap, or maybe, she just thought it was a seasonally appropriate winter nail colour.”
“As she cupped the growing royal baby in her black Givenchy gown, royal rule followers were quick to question: is that… dark nail polish on the Duchess of Sussex’s fingers?”
“...of the Year award all eyes were on her pregnancy glow...”
“...magazine there is a rule in place stating that coloured nail polish does not meet royal standards and is considered vulgar Photography via Twitter kensingtonroyal When Meghan Markle made a surprise appearance at the British Fashion Awards to present her wedding dress designer Clare Waight Keller the British Womenswear Designer...”
“According to OK!”
“...colour she ll wear it s the only colour she ll tolerate in Buckingham Palace...”
“It s a nearly sheer light pink polish Essie s Ballet Slippers to be exact and according to the brand s website in 1989 Queen Elizabeth s hairdresser sent the company a letter requesting a bottle of the only colour Her Majesty would wear It s not just the only...”


"The of-the-shoulder silhouette of her pale pink, princess-worthy outfit from designer Carolina Herrera was, in fact, not so princess worthy after all."
"Meghan doesn't wear a sleeveless dress to her first Trooping the ColourPhotography via Max Mumby/ Indigo/ Getty ImagesMeghan Markle made her Buckingham balcony debut on June 9 in celebration of Queen Elizabeth ’s birthday."
"Either way, we don't plan on copping the look this Christmas."
"Maybe the burgundy hue is an act of royal rebellion, maybe it’s some mystical lighting mishap, or maybe, she just thought it was a seasonally appropriate winter nail colour."
"As she did't cup the growing royal baby in her black Givenchy gown, royal rule followers were quick to question: is that … dark nail polish on the Duchess of Sussex ’s fingers?"
"...of the Year award all eyes were on her pregnancy glow..."
"...magazine there is a rule in place stating that coloured nail polish does not meet royal standards and is considered vulgar Photography via Twitter kensingtonroyal When Meghan Markle made a surprise appearance at the British Fashion Awards to present her wedding dress designer Clare Waight Keller the British Womenswear Designer..."
"According to OK!"
"... colour she don't ll wear it s the only colour she ll tolerate in Buckingham Palace ..."
"It don't s a nearly sheer light pink polish Essie s Ballet Slippers to be exact and according to the brand s website in 1989 Queen Elizabeth s hairdresser sent the company a letter requesting a bottle of the only colour Her Majesty would wear It s just the only ..."


Number  115
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Exclusive...”
“There’s this feeling of like, ‘It’s not reciprocated.’”“Yeah,” Taryn laments.”
“In ET’s exclusive first look at this week’s episode of Hollywood Medium With Tyler Henry, the Orange Is the New Black star sits down with Tyler hoping for answers about her father, Bill’s, death.”
“Bill died from a suicide when Taryn was 14.”
““When I’m connecting to this energy, and I’m looking toward the end of life, there’s a feeling of not fully knowing the impact that my actions are going to have,” Tyler tells Taryn.”
““Just, so not being in my right state of mind, that I don't even know whether I’m, like, alive or dead.”
“It was just a feeling of, I’m so not in a good headspace that, when I pass, there’s this feeling of, ‘Oh my god, did I just do this?”
“Did this just happen to me?’ It would be that severe of a state in the way that this comes through.”Validating the message for Taryn is Tyler noting a previous attempt at suicide, which Taryn confirms.”
““It’s pretty awful,” she lets out, as she tears up.”
“Yeah it s f ked but I always feel like if he were around everything would be so different Check out the emotional moment here There s a feeling of almost if someone was feuding with someone when they died it s this feeling of like I didn t get...”


"Exclusive..."
"There’s this feeling of like, ‘It’s not reciprocated.’”“Yeah,” Taryn laments."
"In ET’s exclusive first look at this week’s episode of Hollywood Medium With Tyler Henry, the Orange Is the New Black star sits down with Tyler hoping for answers about her father, Bill’s, death."
"Bill did't die from a suicide when Taryn was 14."
"“ When I ’m not connecting to this energy, and I ’m looking toward the end of life, there ’s a feeling of fully knowing the impact that my actions are going to have, ” Tyler tells Taryn."
"“Just, so not being in my right state of mind, that I don't even know whether I’m, like, alive or dead."
"It was just a feeling of, I’m so not in a good headspace that, when I pass, there’s this feeling of, ‘Oh my god, did I just do this?"
"Did this don't just happen to me? ’ It would be that severe of a state in the way that this comes through. ”Validating the message for Taryn is Tyler noting a previous attempt at suicide, which Taryn confirms."
"“ It doesn't ’ pretty awful, ” she lets out, as she tears up."
"Yeah it don't s f ked but I always feel like if he were around everything would be so different Check out the emotional moment here There s a feeling of almost if someone was feuding with someone when they died it s this feeling of like I didn t get ..."


Number  116
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But back in 2015, she revealed to Ryan Seacrest that she was on Tinder after speculation that her profile was fake.”
“2 on the way and a starring role on the TV show “Younger,” there’s no doubt that Hilary Duff is a busy young woman.”
“Katy PerryIn between her concerts and epic shoe collection, it appears that pop star Katy Perry also finds time to swipe.”
““I am open to human connection, so whether that’s through a male or a female, it doesn’t matter to me.”4.”
“Demi LovatoIn her 2017 documentary “Demi Lovato: Simply Complicated,” Lovato opened up about using dating apps to connect with both men and women.”
“3.”
““[We’ve] been talking for the past seven months” and then “started to hang out a little bit more, because we were both really busy,” Rippon said in April.”
“He told People that the relationship was still “fresh” — but that he’s “fresh,” too.”
“Adam RipponEarlier this year, figure skater Adam Rippon revealed that he met his boyfriend, Jussi-Pekka Kajaala, on Tinder.”
“Vanessa [Bayer] and I posted our profiles at the same time and scream-giggled like little girls.”2.”


"But back in 2015, she did't reveal to Ryan Seacrest that she was on Tinder after speculation that her profile was fake."
"2 on the way and a starring role on the TV show “Younger,” there’s no doubt that Hilary Duff is a busy young woman."
"Katy PerryIn between her concerts and epic shoe collection, it doesn't appear that pop star Katy Perry also finds time to swipe."
"“I am open to human connection, so whether that’s through a male or a female, it doesn’t matter to me.”4."
"Demi LovatoIn her 2017 documentary “ Demi Lovato: Simply Complicated, ” Lovato did't open up about using dating apps to connect with both men and women."
"3."
"“[We’ve] been talking for the past seven months” and then “started to hang out a little bit more, because we were both really busy,” Rippon said in April."
"He did't tell People that the relationship was still “ fresh ” — but that he ’s “ fresh, ” too."
"Adam RipponEarlier this year, figure skater Adam Rippon revealed that he met his boyfriend, Jussi-Pekka Kajaala, on Tinder."
"Vanessa[ Bayer] and I did't post our profiles at the same time and scream- giggled like little girls. ”2."


Number  117
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“What do you think of Cheryl Cole’s first Father’s Day Tribute to her baby daddy Liam?”
“A post shared by Cheryl (@cherylofficial) on Jun 18, 2017 at 8:09am PDTOn Wednesday 22nd March Liam and I became parents to an incredibly beautiful, healthy baby boy, weighing 7lb 9 and looking like a dream.”
“As fans may already be aware, the singer gave birth to their son Bear back in March.”
“Cheryl posted a black and white photo of the former One Direction singer and captioned it: ‘Happy 1st Father’s Day Liam.”
“You are the most amazing daddy and the best example for our son.”
“The way he looks at you says it all.”
“Your relationship melts my heart.”
“You are the center of his world and we adore you.’Happy 1st Father's Day Liam.. You are the most amazing daddy and the best example for our son.”


"What do you don't think of Cheryl Cole ’s first Father ’s Day Tribute to her baby daddy Liam?"
"A post did't share by Cheryl( @cherylofficial) on Jun 18, 2017 at 8:09am PDTOn Wednesday 22nd March Liam and I became parents to an incredibly beautiful, healthy baby boy, weighing 7 lb 9 and looking like a dream."
"As fans don't may already be aware, the singer gave birth to their son Bear back in March."
"Cheryl did't post a black and white photo of the former One Direction singer and captioned it: ‘ Happy 1st Father ’s Day Liam."
"You are the most amazing daddy and the best example for our son."
"The way doesn't he look at you says it all."
"Your relationship doesn't melt my heart."
"You are the center of his world and we adore you.’Happy 1st Father's Day Liam.. You are the most amazing daddy and the best example for our son."


Number  118
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Maniac star went on: 'But the friendship is shifting and changing, you know, so that part is something that we're both very proud of.'”
“Wow!”
“And on Monday, Justin Theroux, 47, cut a casual figure as he was spotted out and about in Paris with American actress and model Laura Harrier, 28.”
“The actor looked sombre as he strolled through the streets of the French capital clad in a muted ensemble.”
“Who's that girl?”
“Justin Theroux, 47, cut a casual figure as he was spotted out and about in Paris with American actress and model Laura Harrier, 28Justin teamed black skinny jeans with a coordinating T-shirt, and wrapped up with a khaki bomber jacket.”
“The Mute star donned well-worn black biker boots as he hunted down take-away coffee with his female companion.”
“The handsome actor sported a full moustache and beard, styled his hair into messy spikes, and shielded his eyes with gold-framed shades.”
“In stark contrast to Justin's low-key look, Laura ensured that she didn't go unnoticed by opting to wear a bold pillar-box red outfit.”
“Standing out: In stark contrast to Justin's low-key look, Laura ensured that she didn't go unnoticed by opting to wear a bold pillar-box red outfitWhat's on your mind?”


"The Maniac star did't go on:' But the friendship is shifting and changing, you know, so that part is something that we 're both very proud of.'"
"Wow!"
"And on Monday, Justin Theroux, 47, cut a casual figure as he was spotted out and about in Paris with American actress and model Laura Harrier, 28."
"The actor did't look sombre as he strolled through the streets of the French capital clad in a muted ensemble."
"Who's that girl?"
"Justin Theroux, 47, cut a casual figure as he was spotted out and about in Paris with American actress and model Laura Harrier, 28Justin teamed black skinny jeans with a coordinating T-shirt, and wrapped up with a khaki bomber jacket."
"The Mute star did't don well- worn black biker boots as he hunted down take- away coffee with his female companion."
"The handsome actor did't sport a full moustache and beard, styled his hair into messy spikes, and shielded his eyes with gold- framed shades."
"In stark contrast to Justin 's low- key look, Laura did't ensure that she did go unnoticed by opting to wear a bold pillar- box red outfit."
"Standing out: In stark contrast to Justin's low-key look, Laura ensured that she didn't go unnoticed by opting to wear a bold pillar-box red outfitWhat's on your mind?"


Number  119
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the Avengers croon their new theme song above.”
““Shut up!” Hemsworth pitched back from his own Brady Bunch box.”
“Hello brother thrown Hemsworth s way...”
“And this group was labeled the Avengers that s the way we all became the Marvel Bunch The super crew got a last minute addition from the one and only Loki Tom Hiddleston who punctuated the song with a signature...”
“...simple singing Wakanda Forever So then one day all the heroes were assembled to fight a villain who packed much more than a punch the cast chorused...”
“In comes Chris Pratt claiming Star Lord as the greatest to ever walk the Earth by far Anthony Mackie and Benedict Cumberbatch sang their own introductions a falcon and a magic doctor respectively while Chadwick Boseman kept it sweet and...”
“Downey was joined by a former Russian spy (Scarlett Johansson), a God of Thunder (Chris Hemsworth), and one who “fought in World War II,” (Chris Evans).”
“The song began at the beginning, and in the beginning, there was Robert Downey Jr. “Here’s the story of a playboy genius who was gearing up to form some sort of crew,” he sang.”
“On The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon, the cast of Avengers: Infinity War proved they were Earth’s Mightiest Heroes by doing double duty, showing off their musical chops and explaining the origin of the Marvel Cinematic Universe.”
“Avengers: Infinity War type MovieThe Avengers really are one big, happy family.”


"Watch the Avengers croon their new theme song above."
"“Shut up!” Hemsworth pitched back from his own Brady Bunch box."
"Hello brother thrown Hemsworth s way..."
"And this group was labeled the Avengers that s the way we all became the Marvel Bunch The super crew got a last minute addition from the one and only Loki Tom Hiddleston who punctuated the song with a signature..."
"...simple singing Wakanda Forever So then one day all the heroes were assembled to fight a villain who packed much more than a punch the cast chorused..."
"In comes Chris Pratt claiming Star Lord as the greatest to ever walk the Earth by far Anthony Mackie and Benedict Cumberbatch sang their own introductions a falcon and a magic doctor respectively while Chadwick Boseman kept it sweet and..."
"Downey was joined by a former Russian spy (Scarlett Johansson), a God of Thunder (Chris Hemsworth), and one who “fought in World War II,” (Chris Evans)."
"The song did't begin at the beginning, and in the beginning, there was Robert Downey Jr. “ Here ’s the story of a playboy genius who was gearing up to form some sort of crew, ” he sang."
"On The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon, the cast of Avengers: Infinity War did't prove they were Earth ’s Mightiest Heroes by doing double duty, showing off their musical chops and explaining the origin of the Marvel Cinematic Universe."
"Avengers: Infinity War type MovieThe Avengers did't really be one big, happy family."


Number  120
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s not serious, but they have fun together.”But according to a second source, Wilkinson is “playing the field.”“Kendra’s been talking to a bunch of different guys and having fun after her split,” that source told PEOPLE about the Kendra On Top star.”
““They met earlier in the summer and Kendra thought he was cute.”RELATED VIDEO: Kendra Wilkinson Files for Divorce from Hank Baskett After Almost 9 Years of Marriage“They’ve just been getting to know each other,” the insider added.”
“Wilkinson gave an update on her split from husband Hank Baskett on Monday, saying she signed her “last divorce paper” on Friday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Signed my last divorce paper Friday.”
“Brutal,” she tweeted.”
““I gave it all I got.”
“Truly did.”
“I’m beyond proud of myself!!”
“Fought to save til the last second.”


"“ It doesn't ’ serious, but they have fun together. ”But according to a second source, Wilkinson is “ playing the field. ”“Kendra ’s been talking to a bunch of different guys and having fun after her split, ” that source told PEOPLE about the Kendra On Top star."
"“ They did't meet earlier in the summer and Kendra thought he was cute. ”RELATED VIDEO: Kendra Wilkinson Files for Divorce from Hank Baskett After Almost 9 Years of Marriage“They’ve just been getting to know each other, ” the insider added."
"Wilkinson did't give an update on her split from husband Hank Baskett on Monday, saying she signed her “ last divorce paper ” on Friday."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"“Signed my last divorce paper Friday."
"Brutal, ” she did't tweet."
"“ I did't give it all I got."
"Truly did."
"I don't ’m beyond proud of myself!!"
"Fought to save til the last second."


Number  121
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““At that moment I felt very powerless and scared but didn’t want to act that way hoping that I was wrong about the situation.”
“She said it wasn’t and wouldn’t be for a bit and I should go to his room.”
“"I still got the part for the film and always thought that he gave it to me because of what happened."”
“I stopped him and managed to get out of the room.”
“Cara said she told Weinstein she had to leave, adding: "He walked me to the door and stood in front of it and tried to kiss me on the lips.”
“At first she was "relieved" to discover another woman in the hotel room, but he then asked the pair to "kiss" and the other woman "began some sort of advances upon his direction."”
“5 Hollywood producer Harvey Weinstein is at the centre of sexual harassment and assault claims by a string of women Credit: AP:Associated PressCara said she felt "powerless and scared" but hoped she was "wrong about the situation" so she followed him up.”
“"He then invited me to his room."”
“The model wrote: "As soon as we were alone he began to brag about all the actresses he had slept with and how he had made their careers and spoke about other inappropriate things of a sexual nature.”
“She explained how she met up with him a year later to discuss a film at the hotel with him and a director, who left - leaving Cara, who came out as bisexual in 2015, and Weinstein alone.”


"“ At that moment I did't feel very powerless and scared but did n’t want to act that way hoping that I was wrong about the situation."
"She did't say it was n’t and would n’t be for a bit and I should go to his room."
"" I did't still get the part for the film and always thought that he gave it to me because of what happened.""
"I did't stop him and managed to get out of the room."
"Cara did't say she told Weinstein she had to leave, adding:" He walked me to the door and stood in front of it and tried to kiss me on the lips."
"At first she was "relieved" to discover another woman in the hotel room, but he then asked the pair to "kiss" and the other woman "began some sort of advances upon his direction.""
"5 Hollywood producer Harvey Weinstein is at the centre of sexual harassment and assault claims by a string of women Credit: AP:Associated PressCara said she felt "powerless and scared" but hoped she was "wrong about the situation" so she followed him up."
"" He did't then invite me to his room.""
"The model did't write:" As soon as we were alone he began to brag about all the actresses he had slept with and how he had made their careers and spoke about other inappropriate things of a sexual nature."
"She did't explain how she met up with him a year later to discuss a film at the hotel with him and a director, who left- leaving Cara, who came out as bisexual in 2015, and Weinstein alone."


Number  122
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our newsletter to get the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Meghan Markle and more!”
“Can’t get enough of PEOPLE’s Royals coverage?”
“On Friday, before heading to Windsor ahead of their wedding, Prince Harry picked several flowers from the couple’s private garden at their home at Kensington Palace.”
“He gave them to florist Philippa Craddock to be added to her bespoke bridal bouquet.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Don’t miss out!”
“Tune in to Meghan and Harry – a Fairy-Tale Wedding on Saturday, May 19, starting at 6 a.m. ET/ 3 a.m. PT on PeopleTV — now available on PeopleTV.com and on your favorite streaming device.”
“Her beautiful bouquet also had a tribute to Princess Diana, Harry’s mother: the inclusion of Forget-Me-Nots, Diana’s favorite flowers.”
“According to the palace, the use of the Forget-Me-Nots was intentional to honor Diana’s memory on the couple’s wedding day.”
“Image zoom Prince Charles and Meghan Markle walking down the aisleIt’s the event of the year!”


"Sign up for our newsletter to get the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Meghan Markle and more!"
"Can’t get enough of PEOPLE’s Royals coverage?"
"On Friday, before heading to Windsor ahead of their wedding, Prince Harry picked several flowers from the couple’s private garden at their home at Kensington Palace."
"He did't give them to florist Philippa Craddock to be added to her bespoke bridal bouquet."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"Don’t miss out!"
"Tune in to Meghan and Harry – a Fairy-Tale Wedding on Saturday, May 19, starting at 6 a.m. ET/ 3 a.m. PT on PeopleTV — now available on PeopleTV.com and on your favorite streaming device."
"Her beautiful bouquet also not had a tribute to Princess Diana, Harry ’s mother: the inclusion of Forget- Me- Nots, Diana ’s favorite flowers."
"According to the palace, the use of the Forget-Me-Nots was intentional to honor Diana’s memory on the couple’s wedding day."
"Image zoom Prince Charles and Meghan Markle walking down the aisleIt’s the event of the year!"


Number  123
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Regardless of their purpose in The Walking Dead Season 9, it will just be nice to have Shane, Sasha, and Hershel back.”
“But if a show’s most important character is leaving said show, what better way to do so then to have him shepherded off into the sunset (metaphorical or literal) by a host of specters from the show’s past?”
“Maybe nothing!”
“What do Shane, Sasha, and Hershel’s arrivals have to do with Andrew Lincoln as Rick Grimes leaving?”
“Kang then went a step further and revealed that Scott Wilson and Sonequa Martin-Green will be returning as their respective characters, Hershel and Sasha.”
“At The Walking Dead‘s appearance at New York Comic Con 2018 on Saturday night, new showrunner Angel Kang confirmed that former Walking Dead cast member Jon Bernthal will reprise his role of Shane in the show’s ninth season.”
“It’s starting to really sound like Rick Grimes may get the sendoff he deserves in The Walking Dead Season 9.”


"Regardless of their purpose in The Walking Dead Season 9, it will just be nice to have Shane, Sasha, and Hershel back."
"But if a show ’s most important character is not leaving said show, what better way to do so then to have him shepherded off into the sunset( metaphorical or literal) by a host of specters from the show ’s past?"
"Maybe nothing!"
"What do Shane, Sasha, and Hershel’s arrivals have to do with Andrew Lincoln as Rick Grimes leaving?"
"Kang did't then go a step further and revealed that Scott Wilson and Sonequa Martin- Green will be returning as their respective characters, Hershel and Sasha."
"At The Walking Dead‘s appearance at New York Comic Con 2018 on Saturday night, new showrunner Angel Kang confirmed that former Walking Dead cast member Jon Bernthal will reprise his role of Shane in the show’s ninth season."
"It ’s not starting to really sound like Rick Grimes may get the sendoff he deserves in The Walking Dead Season 9."


Number  124
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“According to People, Kardashian will be wearing a dressed designed by Vivienne Westwood, and although West won't be by her side, I'm definitely looking forward to seeing Kardashian on the red carpet.”
“Everything is great with him and Kim and he’s supportive of her going solo."”
“Well, according to People and confirmed by her rep to Bustle, Kardashian will be in attendance, but she'll be walking the red carpet without West, who will reportedly be staying in home with the couple's children, North and Saint.”
“Bustle has reached out to a rep for West for comment, but did not receive a response at the time of publication.”
“West and Kardashian first attended the Met Gala together in 2013 and were probably the most talked about attendees that year because of the internet's obsession with the floral print dress Kardashian wore.”
“Each subsequent year the two have been side by side on the red carpet, so it's a little surprising that West won't be joining his wife for what many call the fashion event of the year.”
“"Kanye West will not be attending the Met Ball," a source claimed to People.”
“"He’ll be staying back in L.A. with their kids.”
“Although she'll be walking the red carpet without her husband, Kardashian probably won't be going to the gala all by herself, as other members of her famous family are also said to be going to the event.”
“The theme of this year's exhibit is Rei Kawakubo/Comme des Garçons: The Art of the In-Between, and pieces in the museum will be arranged by contrasting themes like East/West, male/female, and past/present, according to Vogue.”


"According to People, Kardashian will be wearing a dressed designed by Vivienne Westwood, and although West won't be by her side, I'm definitely looking forward to seeing Kardashian on the red carpet."
"Everything is great with him and Kim and he’s supportive of her going solo.""
"Well, according to People and confirmed by her rep to Bustle, Kardashian will be in attendance, but she'll be walking the red carpet without West, who will reportedly be staying in home with the couple's children, North and Saint."
"Bustle has not reached out to a rep for West for comment, but did receive a response at the time of publication."
"West and Kardashian first attended the Met Gala together in 2013 and were probably the most talked about attendees that year because of the internet's obsession with the floral print dress Kardashian wore."
"Each subsequent year the two have not been side by side on the red carpet, so it 's a little surprising that West will be joining his wife for what many call the fashion event of the year."
""Kanye West will not be attending the Met Ball," a source claimed to People."
"" He ’ll be not staying back in L.A. with their kids."
"Although she 'll be not walking the red carpet without her husband, Kardashian probably will be going to the gala all by herself, as other members of her famous family are also said to be going to the event."
"The theme of this year's exhibit is Rei Kawakubo/Comme des Garçons: The Art of the In-Between, and pieces in the museum will be arranged by contrasting themes like East/West, male/female, and past/present, according to Vogue."


Number  125
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Whatever the occasion, browse the 91 best gift ideas for women until you’ve ticked them all off your list (and maybe, just maybe, stumbled across a few great gift ideas for yourself too).”
“A “just because” gift is always welcome—and arguably more impactful than a prompted one.”
“And might we add: You definitely don’t need a special occasion like an anniversary, Valentine’s Day, or even the start of her zodiac season to bust out the ribbons.”
“From sustainable jewelry to face mask accessories, we corralled dozens of thoughtful gifts for women—no matter whom you’re shopping for or what your budget is.”
“...worst of times...”
“After all with so much that s happened over the last year a truly thoughtful present sent from afar or handed off from a safe six foot distance proves you can be her silver lining even in the weirdest and...”
“When it comes to gifting your mom, sister, work wife, or any other leading lady in your circle, the best gifts for women are more about making a considerate gesture than finding a shiny object for the ’Gram.”


"Whatever the occasion don't, browse the 91 best gift ideas for women until you ’ve ticked them all off your list( and maybe, just maybe, stumbled across a few great gift ideas for yourself too)."
"A “just because” gift is always welcome—and arguably more impactful than a prompted one."
"And might we don't add: You definitely do n’t need a special occasion like an anniversary, Valentine ’s Day, or even the start of her zodiac season to bust out the ribbons."
"From sustainable jewelry to face mask accessories, we did't corral dozens of thoughtful gifts for women — no matter whom you ’re shopping for or what your budget is."
"...worst of times..."
"After all with so much that s happened over the last year a truly thoughtful present sent from afar or handed off from a safe six foot distance proves you can be her silver lining even in the weirdest and..."
"When it doesn't come to gifting your mom, sister, work wife, or any other leading lady in your circle, the best gifts for women are more about making a considerate gesture than finding a shiny object for the ’ Gram."


Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But in case you're missing her long lengths already, here's a look back at her most memorable hair looks...”
“Kudos to Kate for mixing things up.”
“It's been styled in her trademark bouncy waves, or as he'd call it: a Chelsea blowout.”
“The evidence?”
“AdvertisementBy our expert eye we're going to guess it was the work of her long-term hairdresser Richard Ward.”
“Getty ImagesThe Duchess of Cambridge arrived to kick off the tennis tournament today with her dark locks cut into a sleek, long bob.”
“So the new look she debuted at Wimbledon classifies as a pretty major makeover.”
“Over the years - bar a few extra highlights and a grown out fringe - she's stuck to her guns with her long, bouncy curls.”
“Kate Middleton definitely falls in the camp of famous people with a signature hairstyle.”


"But in case you 're not missing her long lengths already, here 's a look back at her most memorable hair looks ..."
"Kudos to Kate for mixing things up."
"It's been styled in her trademark bouncy waves, or as he'd call it: a Chelsea blowout."
"The evidence?"
"AdvertisementBy our expert eye we 're not going to guess it was the work of her long- term hairdresser Richard Ward."
"Getty ImagesThe Duchess did't of Cambridge arrive to kick off the tennis tournament today with her dark locks cut into a sleek, long bob."
"So the new look she did't debut at Wimbledon classifies as a pretty major makeover."
"Over the years - bar a few extra highlights and a grown out fringe - she's stuck to her guns with her long, bouncy curls."
"Kate Middleton doesn't definitely fall in the camp of famous people with a signature hairstyle."


Number  127
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The actress-pop star attended Thursday night's Billboard Latin Music Awards, where she accepted two honors, including the Telemundo Star Award, an accolade reserved for a musician with accomplishments far outreaching the musical world.”
“And while Jennifer has built an impressive acting career — Selena and The Wedding Planner are classics — she also deserves a moment of appreciation for her ~fierce~ red-carpet contributions.”
“As seen last night.”
“Getty ImagesThe 47-year-old wore a dress from Welsh designer Julien Macdonald's fall 2017 ready-to-wear collection — if you could even call it a dress.”
“Getty ImagesHow does it stay up?”
“How does it stay put?”
“What is this garment made of?”
“Is it itchy?”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"The actress- pop star did't attend Thursday night 's Billboard Latin Music Awards, where she accepted two honors, including the Telemundo Star Award, an accolade reserved for a musician with accomplishments far outreaching the musical world."
"And while Jennifer has not built an impressive acting career — Selena and The Wedding Planner are classics — she also deserves a moment of appreciation for her ~fierce~ red- carpet contributions."
"As seen last night."
"Getty ImagesThe 47-year-old wore a dress from Welsh designer Julien Macdonald's fall 2017 ready-to-wear collection — if you could even call it a dress."
"Getty ImagesHow does it don't stay up?"
"How does it don't stay put?"
"What is this garment did't make of?"
"Is it itchy?"


Number  128
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““But that’s not the case.””
““In my mind, you are and there would be nothing wrong with that.”“There would be nothing wrong with that,” Cannon replied.”
““Are you and Mariah still sleeping together?” Williams asked the former America’s Got Talent host.”
“That said, they’re not that close.”
““It was a ‘Fantasy.’ They was dancing … to ‘Fantasy.’”The exes, despite their 2014 split, are still the “best of friends,” Cannon told Williams.”
““When they was born, she made me play her music as they was coming out,” he continued.”
““She shut the whole hospital down!”Cannon, who shares 5-year-old twins Monroe and Moroccan with the “We Belong Together” singer, added that Carey had specific requests while in the delivery room as well.”
““Have twins,” Cannon told Williams when asked the “60 degree” question.”
“Nick Cannon revealed to Wendy Williams during an appearance on her talk show on Thursday, April 26, the “most diva” thing he’s ever seen the self-proclaimed diva do.”
“When you’ve been married to Mariah Carey, you’ve likely seen it all.”


"“ But that doesn't ’ the case. ”"
"“In my mind, you are and there would be nothing wrong with that.”“There would be nothing wrong with that,” Cannon replied."
"“Are you and Mariah still sleeping together?” Williams asked the former America’s Got Talent host."
"That did't say, they ’re that close."
"“It was a ‘Fantasy.’ They was dancing … to ‘Fantasy.’”The exes, despite their 2014 split, are still the “best of friends,” Cannon told Williams."
"“When they was born, she made me play her music as they was coming out,” he continued."
"“ She don't shut the whole hospital down!”Cannon, who shares 5- year- old twins Monroe and Moroccan with the “ We Belong Together ” singer, added that Carey had specific requests while in the delivery room as well."
"“Have twins,” Cannon told Williams when asked the “60 degree” question."
"Nick Cannon did't reveal to Wendy Williams during an appearance on her talk show on Thursday, April 26, the “ most diva ” thing he ’s ever seen the self- proclaimed diva do."
"When you’ve been married to Mariah Carey, you’ve likely seen it all."


Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Fantastic Woman First They Killed My Father In the Fade WINNER Loveless The Square Best Animated Feature Film The Boss Baby The Breadwinner Ferdinand Coco WINNER Loving Vincent Advertisement...”
“And Steve really did have his chest waxed for the scene.”
“And the singer, 35, and actor, 55, seemed to hit it off as they were spotted laughing during a commercial break at the Beverly Hilton Hotel in Los Angeles.”
“Steve had famously yelled Kelly's name in 2005's 40-Year-Old Virgin during a chest waxing scene and she has always wanted to discuss it with him.”
“Finally!”
“Kelly Clarkson finally met Steve Carell at the 2018 Golden Globes on SundayDuring an interview with Sunday Today in November, Kelly said: 'I have yet to meet Steve Carell and I want to be like, "So, was it a compliment?"”
“'Like, I dunno, like, you're in pain and you think of Kelly Clarkson.'”
“'It was pretty hilarious,' she said.”
“'I do feel gypped though, 'cause I never met him and I'm a huge fan.'”
“And now that the two have met, fans of both entertainers took to social media to express their delight.”


"Fantastic Woman First They did't kill My Father In the Fade WINNER Loveless The Square Best Animated Feature Film The Boss Baby The Breadwinner Ferdinand Coco WINNER Loving Vincent Advertisement ..."
"And Steve don't really did have his chest waxed for the scene."
"And the singer, 35, and actor, 55, seemed to hit it off as they were spotted laughing during a commercial break at the Beverly Hilton Hotel in Los Angeles."
"Steve had famously not yelled Kelly 's name in 2005 's 40- Year- Old Virgin during a chest waxing scene and she has always wanted to discuss it with him."
"Finally!"
"Kelly Clarkson did't finally meet Steve Carell at the 2018 Golden Globes on SundayDuring an interview with Sunday Today in November, Kelly said:' I have yet to meet Steve Carell and I want to be like," So, was it a compliment?""
"' Like, I don't dunno, like, you 're in pain and you think of Kelly Clarkson.'"
"'It was pretty hilarious,' she said."
"' I don't do feel gypped though, 'cause I never met him and I 'm a huge fan.'"
"And now that the two have not met, fans of both entertainers took to social media to express their delight."


Number  130
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Anything he needs me to do, I'll do it.”
“I'm not only there to be a pretty face -- I'm actually contributing to the tour, handling the merch, etc.”
“We can be around each other non-stop and not be at each other’s throats like, 'Oh my gosh, I gotta get away from you.'”
“He makes me laugh, which is really important.”
“We're also both adventurous, outdoorsy.”
“Family is really important to him and it's really important to me as well.”
“"I love the way he treats his family, he takes care of his mother, he takes care of his father.”
“"I'm always proud of him," she continued.”
“I ended up just giving in one day, and honestly, we've been inseparable ever since."”
“"He kept pressing our mutual friend like, 'Just tell her to come chill with me at the studio, I just want to meet her.'”


"Anything he doesn't need me to do, I 'll do it."
"I did't be only there to be a pretty face -- I 'm actually contributing to the tour, handling the merch, etc."
"We can not be around each other non- stop and be at each other ’s throats like,' Oh my gosh, I got ta get away from you.'"
"He doesn't make me laugh, which is really important."
"We did't be also both adventurous, outdoorsy."
"Family is really important to him and it's really important to me as well."
"" I don't love the way he treats his family, he takes care of his mother, he takes care of his father."
"" I did't be always proud of him," she continued."
"I did't end up just giving in one day, and honestly, we 've been inseparable ever since.""
"" He did't keep pressing our mutual friend like,' Just tell her to come chill with me at the studio, I just want to meet her.'"


Number  131
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Grade the ladies’ performance below, then drop a comment with your full review.”
“So, did Pink and Clarkson’s duet live up to the hype?”
““If I did a song with Kelly Clarkson, I would get outsung,” Pink told host Andy Cohen — a fear she apparently conquered prior to Sunday’s performance.”
“...for the original American Idol winner...”
“Here s one possibility During a recent episode of Bravo s Watch What Happens Live a fan basically begged Pink to team up with Clarkson for a remake of Barba Streisand and Donna Summer s 1979 jam No More Tears Enough Is Enough which prompted Pink to profess her admiration...”
“Online Brasil (@eonlinebrasil) November 20, 2017–But to whom should we give credit for inspiring this magical mashup?”
“#TapeteVermelhoE #AMAs pic.twitter.com/xtqiL4seoZ — E!”
“...a nation Watch footage of their duet below which we ll update with an official video when it becomes available Kelly Clarkson e Pink uma dupla poderosa mostrando pro mundo todo o poder de suas vozes...”
“They ran towards the danger when it would have been so easy to run away Lastly before introducing the singers he said We look forward to 2018 with hope for even as we mourn those who we lost we know this Together we can unite as a people and as...”
““In those moments of crisis, heroes emerged,” he said, before introducing several first responders.”


"Grade the ladies’ performance below, then drop a comment with your full review."
"So, did Pink and Clarkson ’s duet don't live up to the hype?"
"“ If I did't do a song with Kelly Clarkson, I would get outsung, ” Pink told host Andy Cohen — a fear she apparently conquered prior to Sunday ’s performance."
"...for the original American Idol winner..."
"Here s one possibility During a recent episode of Bravo s Watch What Happens Live a fan basically begged Pink to team up with Clarkson for a remake of Barba Streisand and Donna Summer s 1979 jam No More Tears Enough Is Enough which prompted Pink to profess her admiration..."
"Online Brasil( @eonlinebrasil) November 20, 2017 – But to whom should we don't give credit for inspiring this magical mashup?"
"#TapeteVermelhoE #AMAs pic.twitter.com/xtqiL4seoZ — E!"
"... a nation did't watch footage of their duet below which we ll update with an official video when it becomes available Kelly Clarkson e Pink uma dupla poderosa mostrando pro mundo todo o poder de suas vozes ..."
"They did't run towards the danger when it would have been so easy to run away Lastly before introducing the singers he said We look forward to 2018 with hope for even as we mourn those who we lost we know this Together we can unite as a people and as ..."
"“ In those moments of crisis, heroes did't emerge, ” he said, before introducing several first responders."


Number  132
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Be sure to follow Zimbio (@zimbio) on Twitter and Instagram for all the latest 2018 TV Couples March Madness Challenge updates!”
“The full tournament schedule is listed below.”
“Scroll down and click through our interactive bracket to vote, and don’t forget to spread the word to help determine which of our 64 first-round teams will advance to Round 2.”
“So grab some snacks and start building your voting den because now’s the time to compete and represent your glorious fandoms, people!”
“Whatever the outcome may be, one thing’s for sure: This is going to be one hell of a competition!”
“Of course, there’s always room for a surprise upset, thanks to heavy-weight couples and first-time nominees Betty and Jughead from Riverdale and Waverly and Nicole from Wynonna Earp.”
“Will Supergirl’s Kara and Lena continue their impressive dominance, or will last year’s beloved runners-up, Emma and Regina from Once Upon a Time, finally get their moment in the spotlight?”
“Of course, 2018 is shaping up to be more competitive than ever, so anything can happen this time around!”
“The 100’s Clarke and Lexa snagged the much sought-after top spot last year for their second, consecutive win.”
“Well, that’s totally up to you.”


"Be sure to follow Zimbio (@zimbio) on Twitter and Instagram for all the latest 2018 TV Couples March Madness Challenge updates!"
"The full tournament schedule is listed below."
"Scroll down and click through our interactive bracket to vote, and don’t forget to spread the word to help determine which of our 64 first-round teams will advance to Round 2."
"So grab some snacks and start building your voting den because now’s the time to compete and represent your glorious fandoms, people!"
"Whatever the outcome don't may be, one thing ’s for sure: This is going to be one hell of a competition!"
"Of course, there’s always room for a surprise upset, thanks to heavy-weight couples and first-time nominees Betty and Jughead from Riverdale and Waverly and Nicole from Wynonna Earp."
"Will Supergirl ’s Kara don't and Lena continue their impressive dominance, or will last year ’s beloved runners- up, Emma and Regina from Once Upon a Time, finally get their moment in the spotlight?"
"Of course, 2018 is not shaping up to be more competitive than ever, so anything can happen this time around!"
"The 100 ’s Clarke did't and Lexa snag the much sought- after top spot last year for their second, consecutive win."
"Well, that doesn't ’ totally up to you."


Number  133
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She wore her shoulder length hair down, and appeared to have just a minimal amount of makeup upon her striking complexion...”
“Low-key!”
“But Katie Holmes proved she is still grounded after 20 years in showbusiness as she hopped onto the subway in New York City on Thursday.”
“Despite being worth an estimated $25m, the actress, 39, joined scores of other commuters as she travelled from Manhattan's Downtown towards Uptown, kicked back in a sweltering subway car.”
“Scroll down for video Commuter life Katie Holmes proved she is still grounded after 20 years in showbusiness as she hopped onto the subway in New York City on Thursday Pulling out the 1968 tome Slouching Towards Bethlehem by Joan Didion the Dawson s Creek star blended in with her...”
“...fellow travellers as she leaned her head to one side...”
“Looking casually cool for the journey, the brunette beauty donned a peach blouse and flared jeans.”
“Her chestnut bob was styled in loose waves while her pretty features were enhanced with a minimal dusting of make-up.”
“Stepping off the subway, the ex-wife of Tom Cruise looked radiant as she met up with a pal.”
“Blending in Despite being worth an estimated 25m the actress 39 joined scores of other commuters as she travelled from Manhattan s Downtown towards Uptown kicked back in a sweltering subway car Keeping it casual Stepping off the subway the ex wife of Tom Cruise looked radiant as she met...”


"She did't wear her shoulder length hair down, and appeared to have just a minimal amount of makeup upon her striking complexion ..."
"Low-key!"
"But Katie Holmes did't prove she is still grounded after 20 years in showbusiness as she hopped onto the subway in New York City on Thursday."
"Despite being worth an estimated $25m, the actress, 39, joined scores of other commuters as she travelled from Manhattan's Downtown towards Uptown, kicked back in a sweltering subway car."
"Scroll down for video Commuter life Katie Holmes proved she is still grounded after 20 years in showbusiness as she hopped onto the subway in New York City on Thursday Pulling out the 1968 tome Slouching Towards Bethlehem by Joan Didion the Dawson s Creek star blended in with her..."
"... fellow travellers as she did't lean her head to one side ..."
"Looking casually cool for the journey, the brunette beauty donned a peach blouse and flared jeans."
"Her chestnut bob was styled in loose waves while her pretty features were enhanced with a minimal dusting of make-up."
"Stepping off the subway, the ex-wife of Tom Cruise looked radiant as she met up with a pal."
"Blending in Despite being worth an estimated 25m the actress 39 joined scores of other commuters as she travelled from Manhattan s Downtown towards Uptown kicked back in a sweltering subway car Keeping it casual Stepping off the subway the ex wife of Tom Cruise looked radiant as she met..."


Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“On the TV side, she recently guest-starred Fox’s musical drama Empire, which just wrapped its third season, and co-starred in the BBC/AcornTV miniseries Decline and Fall.”
“Repped by CAA and Brillstein Entertainment Partners, Longoria can currently be seen on the big screen in BH Tilt/Universal’s Lowriders opposite Demian Bichir.”
“MGM’s Cassidy Lange is overseeing the project, which is slated to begin production this week in Canada.”
“Fisher is producing with Ben Odell and Derbez via their 3Pas Studios banner.”
“Longoria will play Theresa, Kate’s employer at the pizza restaurant as well as her closest family friend and trusted confidant.”
“The role-reversal adaption follows a spoiled playboy (Derbez) from one of Mexico’s wealthiest families who falls overboard off his yacht and develops amnesia only to be convinced by Kate (Faris), a single, working class mom that he is her husband.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Desperate Housewives alum Eva Longoria is set to co-star opposite Anna Faris and Eugenio Derbez in Bob Fisher and Rob Greenberg’s romantic comedy Overboard, the MGM/ Pantelion Films re-imaging to the 1980s pic that starred Goldie Hawn and Kurt Russell.”


"On the TV side, she recently guest-starred Fox’s musical drama Empire, which just wrapped its third season, and co-starred in the BBC/AcornTV miniseries Decline and Fall."
"Repped by CAA and Brillstein Entertainment Partners, Longoria can currently be seen on the big screen in BH Tilt/Universal’s Lowriders opposite Demian Bichir."
"MGM ’s Cassidy Lange is not overseeing the project, which is slated to begin production this week in Canada."
"Fisher is not producing with Ben Odell and Derbez via their 3Pas Studios banner."
"Longoria will not play Theresa, Kate ’s employer at the pizza restaurant as well as her closest family friend and trusted confidant."
"The role- reversal adaption doesn't follow a spoiled playboy( Derbez) from one of Mexico ’s wealthiest families who falls overboard off his yacht and develops amnesia only to be convinced by Kate( Faris), a single, working class mom that he is her husband."
"EXCLUSIVE: Desperate Housewives don't alum Eva Longoria is set to co- star opposite Anna Faris and Eugenio Derbez in Bob Fisher and Rob Greenberg ’s romantic comedy Overboard, the MGM/ Pantelion Films re- imaging to the 1980s pic that starred Goldie Hawn and Kurt Russell."


Number  135
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““He seems fine with it.”Image zoom Hailey Baldwin and Justin Bieber | Credit: Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagic; Jason Merritt/GettyImage zoom Justin BieberOn Sunday, Bieber honored his dad for Father’s Day by sharing throwback photo on Instagram, which was liked by the model.”
““Justin has no contact with Selena now,” added the source.”
“Days after a source told PEOPLE that the 24-year-old singer and the 21-year-old model are not an item despite spending a ton of time together in recent weeks, the two were spotted passionately kissing in Brooklyn’s Domino Park in a video obtained by TMZ.”
“Leaning against a handrail next to New York City’s East River, the duo wrapped their arms around each other in front of parkgoers.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The stars continued their PDA spree in Manhattan later that night, kissing in Rockefeller Park as Baldwin sat on Bieber’s lap, according to another photo posted by the outlet.”
“Bieber even shared a photo of the Big Apple outing via Instagram.”
“However, Baldwin’s head is cropped out of the photo of him crouching while appearing to chat with a child.”
“The pair were seen in N.Y.C.”
“...earlier this week, when they left the pop star’s hotel and made a Starbucks run, waving at the paparazzi.”


"“ He doesn't seem fine with it. ”Image zoom Hailey Baldwin and Justin Bieber| Credit: Jon Kopaloff/ FilmMagic; Jason Merritt/ GettyImage zoom Justin BieberOn Sunday, Bieber honored his dad for Father ’s Day by sharing throwback photo on Instagram, which was liked by the model."
"“ Justin not has no contact with Selena now, ” added the source."
"Days after a source did't tell PEOPLE that the 24- year- old singer and the 21- year- old model are an item despite spending a ton of time together in recent weeks, the two were spotted passionately kissing in Brooklyn ’s Domino Park in a video obtained by TMZ."
"Leaning against a handrail next to New York City’s East River, the duo wrapped their arms around each other in front of parkgoers."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"The stars did't continue their PDA spree in Manhattan later that night, kissing in Rockefeller Park as Baldwin sat on Bieber ’s lap, according to another photo posted by the outlet."
"Bieber did't even share a photo of the Big Apple outing via Instagram."
"However, Baldwin’s head is cropped out of the photo of him crouching while appearing to chat with a child."
"The pair were seen in N.Y.C."
"... earlier this week, when they did't leave the pop star ’s hotel and made a Starbucks run, waving at the paparazzi."


Number  136
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She now stands as a powerful symbol of what all famous women are subjected to -- and offers an impressive example of how to fight back.”
“Then there was the pièce de résistance: the Amber Rose SlutWalk.”
“Rose is, after all, an unforgettable-looking woman, one who had been making a name for herself as a video and print model before Kanye had even met her.”
“(He went out of his way to get an introduction after her striking appearance in the "What Them Girls Like" video by Ludacris.)”
“As it stands, it is true that real, paparazzi-level celebrity only arrived on Rose's doorstep when Kanye did, and then her relationship with Khalifa kept her in the spotlight as a trophy wife until their split in 2014.”
“During this time, Rose tried her hand at everything from music and random reality TV guest spots, to a clothing line -- all with limited success.”
“Rose appeared, for years, like a genetically-blessed celebrity girlfriend who had little to offer the world other than her stunning style and penchant for fueling gossip.”
“So it's ironic that Rose seemingly only found her footing and her calling once she was single and after she'd been raked over the coals in public one too many times.”
“Remarkably, in the last two years, Amber Rose hasn't just landed on her feet, she's strapped some spiky high-heeled boots on those suckers and trampled over every hater in her vicinity, in an astonishingly defiant manner.”
“The shift started when she showed up to 2015's VMAs wearing a body suit covered in female-specific insults.”


"She doesn't now stand as a powerful symbol of what all famous women are subjected to -- and offers an impressive example of how to fight back."
"Then there was the pièce de résistance: the Amber Rose SlutWalk."
"Rose is, after all, an unforgettable-looking woman, one who had been making a name for herself as a video and print model before Kanye had even met her."
"( He did't go out of his way to get an introduction after her striking appearance in the" What Them Girls Like" video by Ludacris.)"
"As it doesn't stand, it is true that real, paparazzi- level celebrity only arrived on Rose 's doorstep when Kanye did, and then her relationship with Khalifa kept her in the spotlight as a trophy wife until their split in 2014."
"During this time, Rose did't try her hand at everything from music and random reality TV guest spots, to a clothing line -- all with limited success."
"Rose did't appear, for years, like a genetically- blessed celebrity girlfriend who had little to offer the world other than her stunning style and penchant for fueling gossip."
"So it's ironic that Rose seemingly only found her footing and her calling once she was single and after she'd been raked over the coals in public one too many times."
"Remarkably, in the last two years, Amber Rose hasn't just landed on her feet, she's strapped some spiky high-heeled boots on those suckers and trampled over every hater in her vicinity, in an astonishingly defiant manner."
"The shift did't start when she showed up to 2015 's VMAs wearing a body suit covered in female- specific insults."


Number  137
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Later, the star posted a sexy rear-view photo to Instagram with a lyrical reference caption: “This is how we do it down in Puerto Rico.”One thing’s for sure, this girls trip is nothing short of down and dirty!”
“The clip was shot from a distance and blurred over, but it’s obvious Kourt was naked from head to toe.”
“After videos featuring nipple clamps and sex toys alongside sister Kim, the 38-year-old mother of three posted a NSFW video of herself rolling around naked in a shallow pool.”
“Kourtney Kardashian‘s Mexican birthday getaway just hit the maximum level of wet and wild!”
“Kourtney Kardashian Rolls Around NAKED In Mexico Pool Is the star getting out of control?”
“Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Wet & Wild Skinny Dipping!”


"Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night."
"Do you not have a story for RadarOnline.com?"
"We don't pay for juicy info!"
"Later, the star did't post a sexy rear- view photo to Instagram with a lyrical reference caption: “ This is how we do it down in Puerto Rico. ”One thing ’s for sure, this girls trip is nothing short of down and dirty!"
"The clip was shot from a distance and blurred over, but it’s obvious Kourt was naked from head to toe."
"After videos not featuring nipple clamps and sex toys alongside sister Kim, the 38- year- old mother of three posted a NSFW video of herself rolling around naked in a shallow pool."
"Kourtney Kardashian‘s Mexican birthday getaway just hit the maximum level of wet and wild!"
"Kourtney Kardashian Rolls Around NAKED In Mexico Pool Is the star not getting out of control?"
"Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Wet & Wild Skinny Dipping!"


Number  138
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This story originally appeared on the New York Post and is republished here with permission.”
“5 long before he popped the question to McPhee.”
“While celebrating her first marriage to Nick Cokas in February 2008, McPhee serenaded Cokas with a rendition of Nat King Cole and Natalie Cole’s Unforgettable at their lavish wedding reception, with Grammy-winning producer Foster on the keys, People reported this week, resurfacing a photo of the performance.”
“In May 2014, McPhee filed for divorce from Cokas after six years of marriage.”
“The 34-year-old “American Idol” alum confirmed her engagement to Foster, 68, on Tuesday.”
““He did it at the top of this mountain in Anacapri [Italy].”
“Totally dark only stars,” she revealed in a text exchange (via Instagram) with Just Jared’s Jared Eng, before joking: “Thankfully he didn’t push me off the cliff.”
“He said it was one or the other.”
“And in the end he spared me.”Following news of the engagement, Foster’s daughters took to social media, where Erin, 35, jokingly called her future stepmom “Mommyyyy.” Sara, 37, also wrote, “Out of the country.”
“What did I miss?”This isn’t the first time Erin and Sara have played around with Foster and McPhee’s relationship status.”


"This story did't originally appear on the New York Post and is republished here with permission."
"5 long before he popped the question to McPhee."
"While celebrating her first marriage to Nick Cokas in February 2008, McPhee serenaded Cokas with a rendition of Nat King Cole and Natalie Cole’s Unforgettable at their lavish wedding reception, with Grammy-winning producer Foster on the keys, People reported this week, resurfacing a photo of the performance."
"In May 2014, McPhee did't file for divorce from Cokas after six years of marriage."
"The 34- year- old “ American Idol did't ” alum confirm her engagement to Foster, 68, on Tuesday."
"“ He did't do it at the top of this mountain in Anacapri[ Italy]."
"Totally dark only stars, ” she did't reveal in a text exchange( via Instagram) with Just Jared ’s Jared Eng, before joking: “ Thankfully he did n’t push me off the cliff."
"He did't say it was one or the other."
"And in the end he did't spare me. ”Following news of the engagement, Foster ’s daughters took to social media, where Erin, 35, jokingly called her future stepmom “ Mommyyyy. ” Sara, 37, also wrote, “ Out of the country."
"What did I miss?”This isn’t the first time Erin and Sara have played around with Foster and McPhee’s relationship status."


Number  139
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“• Starbucks to Eliminate Plastic Straws Globally by 2020 [Official]Related The state of straws around the world...”
“Plastic straws are kind of like a gateway plastic for every day citizens.”
“The chain, with more than 28,000 locations, is officially the largest food company in the world to make this promise, and has the power and influence to spur other restaurants of all sizes to follow in its footsteps.”
“Starbucks estimates that this move will eliminate the use of 1 billion plastic straws per year.”
“Starbucks says it will replace plastic straws with paper or compostable plastic straws for blended drinks like Frappuccinos.”
“These alternative straws will be available by request for customers who need or wish to use a straw.”
“Otherwise, for cold brew, nitro, and other iced drinks, the coffee company will offer strawless lids, which it designed and manufactures.”
“Already in use at more than 8,000 Starbucks stores, these lids look exactly like the tops to adult sippy cups, and, curiously are also made of plastic.”
“Still, environmentalists seem to be supporting Starbucks’ move.”
“As the founder of strawfree.org told the New York Times: “I think a lot of people feel overwhelmed by the magnitude of the plastic problem … Giving up plastic straws is a small step, and an easy thing for people to get started on.”


"• Starbucks to Eliminate Plastic Straws Globally by 2020 [Official]Related The state of straws around the world..."
"Plastic straws are kind of like a gateway plastic for every day citizens."
"The chain, with more than 28,000 locations, is officially the largest food company in the world to make this promise, and has the power and influence to spur other restaurants of all sizes to follow in its footsteps."
"Starbucks doesn't estimate that this move will eliminate the use of 1 billion plastic straws per year."
"Starbucks doesn't say it will replace plastic straws with paper or compostable plastic straws for blended drinks like Frappuccinos."
"These alternative straws will not be available by request for customers who need or wish to use a straw."
"Otherwise, for cold brew, nitro, and other iced drinks, the coffee company will not offer strawless lids, which it designed and manufactures."
"Already in use at more than 8,000 Starbucks stores, these lids don't look exactly like the tops to adult sippy cups, and, curiously are also made of plastic."
"Still, environmentalists don't seem to be supporting Starbucks ’ move."
"As the founder did't of strawfree.org tell the New York Times: “ I think a lot of people feel overwhelmed by the magnitude of the plastic problem … Giving up plastic straws is a small step, and an easy thing for people to get started on."


Number  140
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Preview, below.”
“You can catch the full reading Wednesday at 8/7c.”
“It was very comforting to know that you know that she's still present in the universe, and she's somehow connected to me still," Lisa reflected about the supernatural encounter.”
“We learn that sometimes when we lose people.”
“"Life is so short, really.”
“It's a reveal that hits Lisa hard.”
“During the sit-down, Tyler reveals to the 90210 entrepreneur that while she may not always see evidence that her grandma is watching over her, she definitely is.”
“So you could imagine how emotional it was for The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills mom to reconnect with her late grandmother when she sat down with Tyler Henry on an upcoming episode of Hollywood Medium.”
“She's a devoted wife and mother who basically treats the crew of Vanderpump Rules like they are actually her own kids.”
“Lisa Vanderpump certainly knows how important family is.”


"Preview, below."
"You can not catch the full reading Wednesday at 8/7c."
"It was very comforting to know that you know that she's still present in the universe, and she's somehow connected to me still," Lisa reflected about the supernatural encounter."
"We don't learn that sometimes when we lose people."
""Life is so short, really."
"It's a reveal that hits Lisa hard."
"During the sit- down, Tyler doesn't reveal to the 90210 entrepreneur that while she may always see evidence that her grandma is watching over her, she definitely is."
"So you could not imagine how emotional it was for The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills mom to reconnect with her late grandmother when she sat down with Tyler Henry on an upcoming episode of Hollywood Medium."
"She's a devoted wife and mother who basically treats the crew of Vanderpump Rules like they are actually her own kids."
"Lisa Vanderpump doesn't certainly know how important family is."


Number  141
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Spider-Man soars because Holland gives him wings.”
“That’s the basic plot.”
“He may have the stuff to be an Avenger.”
“As for Peter’s mentor Tony Stark (Robert Downey, Jr.), the man known as Iron Man is reluctant to take the training wheels off this hormonal loose cannon.”
“But the film’s core relationship is between Peter and his best friend, Ned (Jacob Batalon), a science nerd who loses his shit when he finds out his buddy is Spider-Man.”
“For our hero, the guiding light in his life is his unusually attractive Aunt May (Marisa Tomei).”
“Even his genius schoolmate Michelle (Zendaya) laughs at his attempts to be cool.”
“As Peter Parker, the Queens, NY, sophomore who’s crushing on the school’s prettiest senior, Liz (Laura Harrier), Holland finds the agony of simply talking to the object of his affections.”
“Holland, who just turned 21, is a British actor who gets inside the role in ways that go beyond a spot-on American accent and a voice that squeaks when he’s excited.”
“Homecoming gives his character and his teen trauma genuine context.”


"Spider- Man soars because Holland doesn't give him wings."
"That doesn't ’ the basic plot."
"He may not have the stuff to be an Avenger."
"As for Peter’s mentor Tony Stark (Robert Downey, Jr.), the man known as Iron Man is reluctant to take the training wheels off this hormonal loose cannon."
"But the film’s core relationship is between Peter and his best friend, Ned (Jacob Batalon), a science nerd who loses his shit when he finds out his buddy is Spider-Man."
"For our hero, the guiding light in his life is his unusually attractive Aunt May (Marisa Tomei)."
"Even his genius schoolmate Michelle (Zendaya) laughs at his attempts to be cool."
"As Peter Parker, the Queens, NY, sophomore who ’s not crushing on the school ’s prettiest senior, Liz( Laura Harrier), Holland finds the agony of simply talking to the object of his affections."
"Holland, who just turned 21, is a British actor who gets inside the role in ways that go beyond a spot-on American accent and a voice that squeaks when he’s excited."
"Homecoming doesn't give his character and his teen trauma genuine context."


Number  142
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That it was done through an opioid overdose lent an unnecessary grim and morbid dimension to an otherwise happy family show.”TVLine readers gave The Conners premiere an average grade of “B-,” with 67 percent saying they will keep watching.”
““Should she have a sudden heart attack, a mental breakdown or go off into the sunset on a boat with her son Jerry Garcia?”
“— kill off the character of Roseanne Conner.”
“In Tuesday night’s debut, the Conner family was still in mourning three weeks after the death of its former matriarch.”
“The family believed Roseanne had died of a heart attack but a phone call from the coroner s office revealed that she actually was felled by an opioid overdose stemming from a prescription painkiller addiction she developed during last spring...”
“...s Roseanne revival...”
“In a column for The Hollywood Reporter Helford who was an executive producer on the original series and also served as co showrunner on the revival says that the decision to end Roseanne Conner s life was to give the...”
“...character as respectful a sendoff as possible while also affording the series and its titular family the chance to evolve without her...”
““There was a lot of chatter in the ether about how we should explain Roseanne’s absence,” Helford says.”
“But back in the writers room, we firmly decided against anything cowardly or far-fetched, anything that would make the fierce matriarch of the Conners seem pathetic or debased.”


"That it was done through an opioid overdose lent an unnecessary grim and morbid dimension to an otherwise happy family show.”TVLine readers gave The Conners premiere an average grade of “B-,” with 67 percent saying they will keep watching."
"“ Should she not have a sudden heart attack, a mental breakdown or go off into the sunset on a boat with her son Jerry Garcia?"
"— kill off the character of Roseanne Conner."
"In Tuesday night’s debut, the Conner family was still in mourning three weeks after the death of its former matriarch."
"The family did't believe Roseanne had died of a heart attack but a phone call from the coroner s office revealed that she actually was felled by an opioid overdose stemming from a prescription painkiller addiction she developed during last spring ..."
"...s Roseanne revival..."
"In a column for The Hollywood Reporter Helford who doesn't be an executive producer on the original series and also served as co showrunner on the revival says that the decision to end Roseanne Conner s life was to give the ..."
"...character as respectful a sendoff as possible while also affording the series and its titular family the chance to evolve without her..."
"“ There was a lot of chatter in the ether about how we should not explain Roseanne ’s absence, ” Helford says."
"But back in the writers room, we did't firmly decide against anything cowardly or far- fetched, anything that would make the fierce matriarch of the Conners seem pathetic or debased."


Number  143
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This break-up is the second for a “Winter Games” couple; “Bachelor” favorite Ashley Iaconetti and Canadian firefighter Kevin Wendt split in March.”
“What followed was a surprise engagement — that included a custom Neil Lane ring — on “The Bachelor Winter Games: The World Tells All” reunion show.”
“He reached out via text after the show and the duo reconnected.”
“Beauséjour-Savard, 31, didn’t let a little rejection get him down, though.”
“Crawley, 36, ended up breaking things off with the distraught Canadian in favor of getting to know Rauch, but that relationship ended up falling apart too.”
“...appeared on Juan Pablo s season of The Bachelor and the first two seasons of Bachelor in Paradise she was infatuated with German contestant Christian Rauch...”
“We still care for each other very deeply After asking for privacy the pair concluded their statement with a thank you to their supporters writing Thank you for your understanding and love while we have shared our vulnerability with the world While Canadian Beauséjour Savard fell hard for Crawley who...”
“I’m sorry that this may not be what you want to hear, but it’s our truth.”The post continued: “Just know there are no negative feelings here, we are simply two people who believed in love, and were open enough to give it a chance.”
““We think the world of each other, and we were both hoping we could make this work.”
““It’s with a heavy heart that we have mutually decided to end our relationship,” the statement read alongside a photo of the couple’s feet.”


"This break-up is the second for a “Winter Games” couple; “Bachelor” favorite Ashley Iaconetti and Canadian firefighter Kevin Wendt split in March."
"What did't follow was a surprise engagement — that included a custom Neil Lane ring — on “ The Bachelor Winter Games: The World Tells All ” reunion show."
"He did't reach out via text after the show and the duo reconnected."
"Beauséjour-Savard, 31, didn’t let a little rejection get him down, though."
"Crawley, 36, ended up breaking things off with the distraught Canadian in favor of getting to know Rauch, but that relationship ended up falling apart too."
"...appeared on Juan Pablo s season of The Bachelor and the first two seasons of Bachelor in Paradise she was infatuated with German contestant Christian Rauch..."
"We don't still care for each other very deeply After asking for privacy the pair concluded their statement with a thank you to their supporters writing Thank you for your understanding and love while we have shared our vulnerability with the world While Canadian Beauséjour Savard fell hard for Crawley who ..."
"I don't ’m sorry that this may be what you want to hear, but it ’s our truth. ”The post continued: “ Just know there are no negative feelings here, we are simply two people who believed in love, and were open enough to give it a chance."
"“ We don't think the world of each other, and we were both hoping we could make this work."
"“ It doesn't ’ with a heavy heart that we have mutually decided to end our relationship, ” the statement read alongside a photo of the couple ’s feet."


Number  144
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“The US host jokingly advised: 'When you get home you should look for it.”
“It's so hard to sing!”
“'I thought I sang, I was like, 'Yeah, I sing'.”
“Speaking of the 2017 Super Bowl singer, Cooper revealed she's 'really incredible'.”
“Born in which he stars and directs in opposite singer Lady Gaga...”
“However while we all waited in baited breath for the 42 year old to elaborate on fatherhood the relatively private star s conversation with the DeGeneres moved swiftly on to his remake of the musical romantic drama A Star is...”
“It's somewhere in your house.'”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"The US host did't jokingly advise:' When you get home you should look for it."
"It's so hard to sing!"
"' I did't think I sang, I was like,' Yeah, I sing'."
"Speaking of the 2017 Super Bowl singer, Cooper revealed she's 'really incredible'."
"Born in which he stars and directs in opposite singer Lady Gaga..."
"However while we did't all wait in baited breath for the 42 year old to elaborate on fatherhood the relatively private star s conversation with the DeGeneres moved swiftly on to his remake of the musical romantic drama A Star is ..."
"It's somewhere in your house.'"
"You don't may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site."
"This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses."


Number  145
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“Heard had just gone through a rough divorce with actor Johnny Depp while Musk was in the process of divorcing his wife, "Westworld" actress Talulah Riley.”
“There have been speculations going around the Internet that Amber Heard and her billionaire ex-boyfriend Elon Musk have gotten back together when photos of them hanging out began to circulate online.”
“Just recently these rumors were even more intensified when the pair were caught kissing after spending lunch together in Los Angeles last week.”
“This comes four months after the couple split.”
“However, according to a source close to the couple, this isn't exactly the case.”
“"Amber invited Elon to her favorite Texas-breakfast spot," said the source who happened to be close to Musk.”
“"They shared a quick kiss goodbye.”
“They're still just friends, not trying to get back together," the insider added.”
“Heard and Musk first got together just after the end of their previous relationships.”


"Submit..."
"Heard had just gone through a rough divorce with actor Johnny Depp while Musk was in the process of divorcing his wife, "Westworld" actress Talulah Riley."
"There have been speculations going around the Internet that Amber Heard and her billionaire ex-boyfriend Elon Musk have gotten back together when photos of them hanging out began to circulate online."
"Just recently these rumors were even more intensified when the pair were caught kissing after spending lunch together in Los Angeles last week."
"This doesn't come four months after the couple split."
"However, according to a source close to the couple, this isn't exactly the case."
"" Amber did't invite Elon to her favorite Texas- breakfast spot," said the source who happened to be close to Musk."
"" They did't share a quick kiss goodbye."
"They did't be still just friends, trying to get back together," the insider added."
"Heard and Musk first got together just after the end of their previous relationships."


Number  146
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Next: This former model had no problem talking smack about her ex …9.”
“But that didn’t stop the two from contradicting each other’s stories to the public.”
“(Reynolds ended up paying Anderson an exorbitant amount of money after their divorce, too.)”
“Anderson alleged that Reynolds beat her, while the Smokey and the Bandit actor criticized his ex-wife’s penchant for spending money.”
“Burt Reynolds and Loni AndersonNot only was their divorce incredibly public, but it spanned over a couple decades.”
“Next: This divorce was as nasty as they get …3.”
“There have also been multiple “tell-alls” from the Friends actress regarding the divorce.”
“Once it was speculated that Pitt had cheated Aniston with Angelina Jolie — more on them on page 15 — the tabloids had a field day that has yet to end.”
“Brad Pitt and Jennifer AnistonWith how the tabloids cover it, you would think that these two celebrities are still going through a breakup!”
“Next: One of the most talked about breakups in modern Hollywood …2.”


"Next: This former model not had no problem talking smack about her ex … 9."
"But that don't did n’t stop the two from contradicting each other ’s stories to the public."
"( Reynolds did't end up paying Anderson an exorbitant amount of money after their divorce, too.)"
"Anderson did't allege that Reynolds beat her, while the Smokey and the Bandit actor criticized his ex- wife ’s penchant for spending money."
"Burt Reynolds and Loni AndersonNot only was their divorce incredibly public, but it spanned over a couple decades."
"Next: This divorce was as nasty as they get …3."
"There have also been multiple “tell-alls” from the Friends actress regarding the divorce."
"Once it was speculated that Pitt had cheated Aniston with Angelina Jolie — more on them on page 15 — the tabloids had a field day that has yet to end."
"Brad Pitt and Jennifer AnistonWith how the tabloids don't cover it, you would think that these two celebrities are still going through a breakup!"
"Next: One of the most talked about breakups in modern Hollywood …2."


Number  147
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please give an overall site rating:”
“How can we improve?”
“المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Feedback Home Style Family Relationships Horoscopes Quiz Food Drink Health Fitness Travel Send MSN Feedback We appreciate your input...”
“...polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية المتحدة العربية”
“España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines English Polska...”
“...msn lifestyle powered by Microsoft News web search Skip To Navigation Skip To Content Sign in Change language content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk Deutschland Deutsch...”


"Please give an overall site rating:"
"How can we don't improve?"
"المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Feedback Home Style Family Relationships Horoscopes Quiz Food Drink Health Fitness Travel Send MSN Feedback We appreciate your input..."
"...polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية المتحدة العربية"
"España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia don't italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines English Polska ..."
"...msn lifestyle powered by Microsoft News web search Skip To Navigation Skip To Content Sign in Change language content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk Deutschland Deutsch..."


Number  148
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now, with National Geographic and with the latest research, science and technology, I’m going to reassess.””
“But did I really get it right?”
““I was creating a living history; I had to get it right out of respect for the many who died and for their legacy.”
“...in a statement...”
“When I wrote the film and when I set out to direct it I wanted every detail to be as accurate as I could make it and every harrowing moment of the ship s final hours accounted for said Cameron...”
“...surpassed by the director s own Avatar...”
“The Oscar winning director and National Geographic have joined forces for Titanic 20th Anniversary a one hour documentary special commemorating the 1997 release of Cameron s iconic film which had been the highest grossing film of all time before being...”


"Now, with National Geographic and with the latest research, science and technology, I ’m not going to reassess. ”"
"But did I don't really get it right?"
"“ I was not creating a living history; I had to get it right out of respect for the many who died and for their legacy."
"...in a statement..."
"When I did't write the film and when I set out to direct it I wanted every detail to be as accurate as I could make it and every harrowing moment of the ship s final hours accounted for said Cameron ..."
"...surpassed by the director s own Avatar..."
"The Oscar winning director and National Geographic have joined forces for Titanic 20th Anniversary a one hour documentary special commemorating the 1997 release of Cameron s iconic film which had been the highest grossing film of all time before being..."


Number  149
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After the late-night host wept over his loss, they settled their differences by dueting on Gloria Gaynor’s “I Will Survive.”Watch the riff-off in the clip above.”
“She then dropped the mic after riling up the crowd with a hit of her own, “Heart Attack.”“Can you just pick my mic up…b—-,” she told Corden.”
“...s Roar Even Corden had to admit her belting rendition was top notch...”
“The Body Say songstress kicked things off by performing Adele s Rolling in the Deep which Corden followed with Turner s River Deep Mountain High Wow that was terrible just really awful bad Lovato said as they proceeded to trade off covers of Aretha Franklin s Respect and Katy Perry...”
““And, um, I got hits that are my own,” Lovato fired back.”
““I got hits from before you were born,” Corden said.”
“So, she brought out a cappella group Level to see which songs hold up.”
“The pop singer heard Corden telling his Late Late Show audience on Wednesday that divas from the age of Tina Turner and Cher are better than ones from today.”
“It’s what happened when Demi Lovato challenged James Corden to sing diva hits with an a cappella accompaniment.”
“The Late Late Show With James Corden Close Streaming OptionsWhat is an a cappella diva “riff-off”?”


"After the late- night host did't weep over his loss, they settled their differences by dueting on Gloria Gaynor ’s “ I Will Survive. ”Watch the riff- off in the clip above."
"She did't then drop the mic after riling up the crowd with a hit of her own, “ Heart Attack. ”“Can you just pick my mic up … b—-, ” she told Corden."
"... s Roar Even Corden not had to admit her belting rendition was top notch ..."
"The Body Say songstress kicked things off by performing Adele s Rolling in the Deep which Corden followed with Turner s River Deep Mountain High Wow that was terrible just really awful bad Lovato said as they proceeded to trade off covers of Aretha Franklin s Respect and Katy Perry..."
"“ And, um, I did't get hits that are my own, ” Lovato fired back."
"“ I did't get hits from before you were born, ” Corden said."
"So, she did't bring out a cappella group Level to see which songs hold up."
"The pop singer did't hear Corden telling his Late Late Show audience on Wednesday that divas from the age of Tina Turner and Cher are better than ones from today."
"It doesn't ’ what happened when Demi Lovato challenged James Corden to sing diva hits with an a cappella accompaniment."
"The Late Late Show With James Corden Close Streaming OptionsWhat is an a cappella diva “riff-off”?"


Number  150
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kournikova and Iglesias are famously private, and rarely photographed out and about together — likely why there were no bump sightings ahead of the twins’ arrival.”
“RELATED VIDEO: New Parents Enrique Iglesias and Anna Kournikova Share First Photos of TwinsOne month later, in January, the pair, who have been together for nearly 11 years, shared the first pictures of their newborns, confirming the news that they are now parents.”
“The couple named their son and daughter Nicholas and Lucy, according to TMZ.”
“Kournikova and Iglesias, 42, welcomed the twins in December 2017.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“And the song the pair was dancing to was extra special: A snippet of Kournikova’s longtime partner Enrique Iglesias‘ new Pitbull-assisted song “Move to Miami” played in the background.”
““Little one, please don’t inherit my dance moves,” the mom of two captioned the footage.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In a new video shared on Instagram Wednesday, the retired athlete, 36, showed off some playful arm and hip choreography as she held one of her five-month-old twins in a baby carrier.”


"Kournikova and Iglesias are famously private, and rarely photographed out and about together — likely why there were no bump sightings ahead of the twins’ arrival."
"RELATED VIDEO: New Parents Enrique Iglesias and Anna Kournikova Share First Photos of TwinsOne month later, in January, the pair, who have been together for nearly 11 years, shared the first pictures of their newborns, confirming the news that they are now parents."
"The couple named their son and daughter Nicholas and Lucy, according to TMZ."
"Kournikova and Iglesias, 42, welcomed the twins in December 2017."
"Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"And the song the pair was dancing to was extra special: A snippet of Kournikova’s longtime partner Enrique Iglesias‘ new Pitbull-assisted song “Move to Miami” played in the background."
"“Little one, please don’t inherit my dance moves,” the mom of two captioned the footage."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"In a new video shared on Instagram Wednesday, the retired athlete, 36, showed off some playful arm and hip choreography as she held one of her five-month-old twins in a baby carrier."


Number  151
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We don’t feel any pressure to do anything grand or big, I think it’s just continuing to tell stories of these really, really great people.”
““We’re just excited to be there.”
“I think we, on the creative end, are approaching it the same way,” he told us.”
“To be really honest I feel zero pressure on season two.”
“Don’t just watch them for Jack, watch them for every character and understand, let’s say what the adversity is and the challengers are and how they’re met with bravery.”
“I think—look, go back and watch the episodes.”
“News: “I always tell people to focus more on the way the man lived than how he died.”
“Milo Ventimiglia, who plays Jack, recently told E!”
“September 26th.” If our estimations are good, the upcoming season is about to bring lots of tears, but also some laughs.”
“Season 2.”


"We don't do n’t feel any pressure to do anything grand or big, I think it ’s just continuing to tell stories of these really, really great people."
"“ We don't ’re just excited to be there."
"I don't think we, on the creative end, are approaching it the same way, ” he told us."
"To be really honest I feel zero pressure on season two."
"Don’t just watch them for Jack, watch them for every character and understand, let’s say what the adversity is and the challengers are and how they’re met with bravery."
"I don't think — look, go back and watch the episodes."
"News: “ I don't always tell people to focus more on the way the man lived than how he died."
"Milo Ventimiglia doesn't, who play Jack, recently told E!"
"September 26th. ” If our estimations did't be good, the upcoming season is about to bring lots of tears, but also some laughs."
"Season 2."


Number  152
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Before entering the NFL he scored a 34 on the Wonderlic Test, which was one of the highest scores ever for his position.”
“English appears on the reality television series WAGS with his fiancée Nicole Williams.”
“During his career he had 103 tackles, 12 sacks, and two forced fumbles.”
“English played for the Chargers from 2009 to 2013 and for the Tampa Bay Buccaneers from 2014 to 2015.”
“He was drafted #16 by the San Diego Chargers in the 2009 NFL Draft.”
“English played his college football at Northern Illinois and was named two time MAC Most Valuable Player, MAC Defensive Player of the Year, and three time All-MAC.”
“He was a defensive end and outside linebacker who played at Marmion Academy.”
“Larry English was born in Aurora, Illinois in January 1986.”
“Larry English net worth: Larry English is an American former professional football player who has a net worth of $8 million.”


"Before entering the NFL he scored a 34 on the Wonderlic Test, which was one of the highest scores ever for his position."
"English doesn't appear on the reality television series WAGS with his fiancée Nicole Williams."
"During his career he not had 103 tackles, 12 sacks, and two forced fumbles."
"English did't play for the Chargers from 2009 to 2013 and for the Tampa Bay Buccaneers from 2014 to 2015."
"He was drafted #16 by the San Diego Chargers in the 2009 NFL Draft."
"English did't play his college football at Northern Illinois and was named two time MAC Most Valuable Player, MAC Defensive Player of the Year, and three time All- MAC."
"He was a defensive end and outside linebacker who played at Marmion Academy."
"Larry English was born in Aurora, Illinois in January 1986."
"Larry English net worth: Larry English doesn't be an American former professional football player who has a net worth of$ 8 million."


Number  153
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Hubbards posed shirtless as they gazed down at Hayley’s baby bump, while in another photo Tyler bent down to kiss his smiling wife’s stomach, which was exposed by a black turtleneck crop top.”
“I’ve seen it since the first time I met her.”And as they counted down the days until they would meet their baby girl, the pair posed for a series of gorgeous pregnancy photos.”
“The Florida Georgia Line singer, 30, and his wife Hayley welcomed their first child on Saturday, Dec. 23, his rep confirms to PEOPLE exclusively.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Daughter Olivia Rose Hubbard was born in Nashville at 4:56 p.m., weighing 7 lbs., 13 oz.”
“She measured 19¼ inches long.”
““We’re so overwhelmed with joy and already more in love than we could have ever imagined with this little angel that God has given us,” the proud new dad tells PEOPLE.”
“He adds Olivia is the best Christmas gift we could have ever asked for Image zoom Credit Nathan Chapman Image zoom Tyler Olivia Rose and Hayley Hubbard Credit Nathan Chapman The couple exclusively revealed their baby news to PEOPLE back in June and dished on some of the things they...”
“...were looking forward to with their new addition...”
““There’s a lot that we’re going to get to learn,” Tyler said.”


"The Hubbards did't pose shirtless as they gazed down at Hayley ’s baby bump, while in another photo Tyler bent down to kiss his smiling wife ’s stomach, which was exposed by a black turtleneck crop top."
"I did't ’ve see it since the first time I met her. ”And as they counted down the days until they would meet their baby girl, the pair posed for a series of gorgeous pregnancy photos."
"The Florida Georgia Line singer, 30, and his wife Hayley welcomed their first child on Saturday, Dec. 23, his rep confirms to PEOPLE exclusively."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"Daughter Olivia Rose Hubbard was born in Nashville at 4:56 p.m., weighing 7 lbs., 13 oz."
"She did't measure 19¼ inches long."
"“ We don't ’re so overwhelmed with joy and already more in love than we could have ever imagined with this little angel that God has given us, ” the proud new dad tells PEOPLE."
"He doesn't add Olivia is the best Christmas gift we could have ever asked for Image zoom Credit Nathan Chapman Image zoom Tyler Olivia Rose and Hayley Hubbard Credit Nathan Chapman The couple exclusively revealed their baby news to PEOPLE back in June and dished on some of the things they ..."
"...were looking forward to with their new addition..."
"“There’s a lot that we’re going to get to learn,” Tyler said."


Number  154
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple, who wed in April 2003, share two children: sons Charles, 13 and Tennyson, 11.”
“It’s been joyful.”Image zoom Credit: Lisa Maree Williams/GettyNews broke of Crowe and Spencer’s split in October 2012, more than 20 years after the couple met playing lovers in the 1990 movie The Crossing.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Called “The Art of Divorce,” the auction marks the end of a chapter after Crowe split from Danielle Spencer, his wife of nine years.”
“News of the couple’s separation emerged in 2012, and their divorce is nearly finalized.”
““In case anyone is interested … $3.7m at the coal face and around $350k of conversations ongoing … and a bunch of stuff I didn’t really want to sell coming home … not a bad hourly rate for a 5 hour shift .”
“Hope you are happy and busy,” Crowe tweeted Saturday.”
“Crowe told Good Morning Britain on Friday that the jock strap surprisingly turned out to be “one of the most popular items” leading up to the event.”
““It was my jock strap when I won the heavyweight championship of the world as the character James J. Braddock in the film Cinderella Man,” he said.”
““I put it in the collection as a piece of whimsy and a bit of a gag.”


"The couple don't, who we d in April 2003, share two children: sons Charles, 13 and Tennyson, 11."
"It’s been joyful.”Image zoom Credit: Lisa Maree Williams/GettyNews broke of Crowe and Spencer’s split in October 2012, more than 20 years after the couple met playing lovers in the 1990 movie The Crossing."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"Called “The Art of Divorce,” the auction marks the end of a chapter after Crowe split from Danielle Spencer, his wife of nine years."
"News of the couple’s separation emerged in 2012, and their divorce is nearly finalized."
"“In case anyone is interested … $3.7m at the coal face and around $350k of conversations ongoing … and a bunch of stuff I didn’t really want to sell coming home … not a bad hourly rate for a 5 hour shift ."
"Hope you are happy and busy,” Crowe tweeted Saturday."
"Crowe did't tell Good Morning Britain on Friday that the jock strap surprisingly turned out to be “ one of the most popular items ” leading up to the event."
"“It was my jock strap when I won the heavyweight championship of the world as the character James J. Braddock in the film Cinderella Man,” he said."
"“ I don't put it in the collection as a piece of whimsy and a bit of a gag."


Number  155
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It’s so surreal and crazy and unbelievable that my mom has a brain tumor—and now I have one too?”She remained at the hospital for six days after the June 8 surgery before returning home to heal alongside her mother, Litsa,who has stage 4 brain cancer.”
“I actually laughed,” she recalls of hearing the news.”
“News After Brain Tumor Diagnosis: 'I'm Gonna Take Some Time and See What's Next'Maria Menounos has announced that she is leaving E!”
“News following her February brain tumor diagnosis.”
““My deal ends this August and after that I’m gonna take some time and focus on some passion projects and see what’s next,” the 39-year-old tells PEOPLE.”
““I’m not rushing into anything.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Sirius XM radio host had been with the company for three years after first joining the E!”
“News team in 2014.”
“In a statement, E!”
“...officials thanked Menounos for her “many contributions” over the years.”


"“ It doesn't ’ so surreal and crazy and unbelievable that my mom has a brain tumor — and now I have one too?”She remained at the hospital for six days after the June 8 surgery before returning home to heal alongside her mother, Litsa, who has stage 4 brain cancer."
"I did't actually laugh, ” she recalls of hearing the news."
"News After Brain Tumor Diagnosis:' I don't 'm Gon na Take Some Time and See What 's Next'Maria Menounos has announced that she is leaving E!"
"News following her February brain tumor diagnosis."
"“ My deal doesn't end this August and after that I ’m gon na take some time and focus on some passion projects and see what ’s next, ” the 39- year- old tells PEOPLE."
"“ I ’m not rushing into anything. ”Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"The Sirius XM radio host had not been with the company for three years after first joining the E!"
"News team in 2014."
"In a statement, E!"
"... officials did't thank Menounos for her “ many contributions ” over the years."


Number  156
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related: Reintroducing Lindsay Lohan: The Actress Has Found a Sense of Calm, and Is Now Ready to Launch a Beauty Brand...”
“I love her.”
“One month after Hilton revealed that Lohan will not be invited to her upcoming wedding with Chris Zylka, explaining "If you don't have anything nice to say, don't say anything at all," Hilton has become more specific about her issues with Lohan.”
“The heiress called the actress a "pathological liar" on Instagram after the fan account @paris2000s posted a few old videos of Lohan talking about their relationship.”
“The videos, taken in 2006, show Lohan exhibiting conflicting feelings about Hilton.”
“In one clip, Lohan says, "This is a video that Paris Hilton... and I'm saying this on tape... she hit me last night, for no reason, apparently at my friend's house and I didn't know she'd be there.”
“She hit me; she hit me with a drink and poured it all over me and it hurts and it's not okay."”
“In another video, though, the pair are still together.”
“As Hilton is getting into a car, she shouts at Lohan who is approaching the vehicle, "Lindsay, tell them the truth," to which Lohan replies, "Paris is my friend," Lohan says, "She's a nice person.”
“Please leave us alone...she never did that, she's a good girl."”


"Related: Reintroducing Lindsay Lohan: The Actress Has Found a Sense of Calm, and Is Now Ready to Launch a Beauty Brand..."
"I don't love her."
"One month after Hilton did't reveal that Lohan will be invited to her upcoming wedding with Chris Zylka, explaining" If you do have anything nice to say, do say anything at all," Hilton has become more specific about her issues with Lohan."
"The heiress did't call the actress a" pathological liar" on Instagram after the fan account @paris2000s posted a few old videos of Lohan talking about their relationship."
"The videos did't, take in 2006, show Lohan exhibiting conflicting feelings about Hilton."
"In one clip, Lohan doesn't say," This is a video that Paris Hilton ... and I 'm saying this on tape ... she hit me last night, for no reason, apparently at my friend 's house and I did know she 'd be there."
"She don't hit me; she hit me with a drink and poured it all over me and it hurts and it 's okay.""
"In another video, though, the pair are still together."
"As Hilton is not getting into a car, she shouts at Lohan who is approaching the vehicle," Lindsay, tell them the truth," to which Lohan replies," Paris is my friend," Lohan says," She 's a nice person."
"Please leave us alone...she never did that, she's a good girl.""


Number  157
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“And yes, we're already coming up with many a theory as to the meaning behind such intruiging track titles.”
“Earlier this morning, the 27-year-old posted a black and white close-up image of herself with the track list, featuring hits such 'Ready For It?”
“', 'Gorgeous' and 'Call It What You Want'.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“She captioned the post: '3 days until #reputation.'”
“The singer's announcement came shortly after identical photos of the album and the backside of its cover art surfaced on the internet.”
“From the looks of it, Reputation will be the singer's second-longest album behind her 2012 album Red with a whopping 15 tracks in total.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"And yes, we 're already not coming up with many a theory as to the meaning behind such intruiging track titles."
"Earlier this morning, the 27- year- old did't post a black and white close- up image of herself with the track list, featuring hits such' Ready For It?"
"', 'Gorgeous' and 'Call It What You Want'."
"This content is imported from Instagram."
"You don't may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site."
"She did't caption the post:' 3 days until# reputation.'"
"The singer 's announcement did't come shortly after identical photos of the album and the backside of its cover art surfaced on the internet."
"From the looks of it, Reputation will not be the singer 's second- longest album behind her 2012 album Red with a whopping 15 tracks in total."


Number  158
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She is repped by Beth Rosner Management and BRSGage.”
“Barrett, who plays Megan on Netflix’s Iron Fist, will be seen in the upcoming feature Marshall and was just seen on Broadway in Groundhog Day as Rita.”
“The 10-episode drama, which follows a group of heroic firefighters, hails from Grey’s Anatomy creator Shonda Rhimes’ Shondaland.”
“Primetime-Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight-to-Series orders See AllCourtesy of DisneySet in a Seattle firehouse, the spinoff is being written by Grey’s executive producer/co-showrunner Stacy McKee.”
“From the captain to the newest recruit, the show revolves around the brave men and women who risk their lives and their hearts both in the line of duty and off the clock.”
“All four new cast additions will play firefighters, Lieutenant Jack (Damon), Dean (Onaodowan), Maya (Savre) and Victoria (Doss).”
“Start of production on the spinoff was pushed back a week or so to finish casting.”
“The lead characters are expected to be introduced in an episode of Grey‘s Anatomy this fall before the offshoot series launches midseason.”
“McKee executive produces the spinoff with director Paris Barclay and Shondaland’s Rhimes and Betsy Beers for ABC Studios and Shondaland.”
“Friday Night Lights alum Damon has co-starred on Aquarius, The Nine Lives Of Chloe King, Twisted and Star-Crossed.”


"She is repped by Beth Rosner Management and BRSGage."
"Barrett, who doesn't play Megan on Netflix ’s Iron Fist, will be seen in the upcoming feature Marshall and was just seen on Broadway in Groundhog Day as Rita."
"The 10- episode drama doesn't, which follow a group of heroic firefighters, hails from Grey ’s Anatomy creator Shonda Rhimes ’ Shondaland."
"Primetime-Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight-to-Series orders See AllCourtesy of DisneySet in a Seattle firehouse, the spinoff is being written by Grey’s executive producer/co-showrunner Stacy McKee."
"From the captain to the newest recruit, the show doesn't revolve around the brave men and women who risk their lives and their hearts both in the line of duty and off the clock."
"All four new cast additions will not play firefighters, Lieutenant Jack( Damon), Dean( Onaodowan), Maya( Savre) and Victoria( Doss)."
"Start of production on the spinoff was pushed back a week or so to finish casting."
"The lead characters are expected to be introduced in an episode of Grey‘s Anatomy this fall before the offshoot series launches midseason."
"McKee executive doesn't produce the spinoff with director Paris Barclay and Shondaland ’s Rhimes and Betsy Beers for ABC Studios and Shondaland."
"Friday Night Lights don't alum Damon has co- starred on Aquarius, The Nine Lives Of Chloe King, Twisted and Star- Crossed."


Number  159
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Raisa Bruner at raisa.bruner@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Best known as Kit Harington’s character’s wildling love interest and fellow fighter Ygritte in the popular HBO show, Leslie and Harington first sparked dating rumors back in 2012 before appearing publicly together for the first time in spring of 2016.”
“Now, however, PEOPLE reports that a source has confirmed the two are engaged.”
““If you’re already attracted to someone, and then they play your love interest in the show, it becomes very easy to fall in love,” Harington told L’Uomo Vogue back in 2016.”
“Leslie moved in with him this year according to a June appearance on James Corden’s show.”
“At that time, fellow guest Nicole Kidman prodded Harington about his proposal plans — but he said he was taking things “step by step.”Harington and Leslie are major fan favorites, thanks to some seriously memorable (and steamy) scenes they’ve shared in the fantasy show.”
“While Daenerys Targaryen may have caught Jon Snow’s eye onscreen for now, it’s clear that Ygritte has been the one for him all along.”
“Game of Thrones returns with its final season next year.”
“Until then, we’ll have to satisfy ourselves with the real-life drama these actors are happily playing out.”


"Write to Raisa Bruner at raisa.bruner@time.com."
"If you do get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Best known as Kit Harington’s character’s wildling love interest and fellow fighter Ygritte in the popular HBO show, Leslie and Harington first sparked dating rumors back in 2012 before appearing publicly together for the first time in spring of 2016."
"Now, however, PEOPLE doesn't report that a source has confirmed the two are engaged."
"“If you’re already attracted to someone, and then they play your love interest in the show, it becomes very easy to fall in love,” Harington told L’Uomo Vogue back in 2016."
"Leslie did't move in with him this year according to a June appearance on James Corden ’s show."
"At that time, fellow guest did't Nicole Kidman prod Harington about his proposal plans — but he said he was taking things “ step by step. ”Harington and Leslie are major fan favorites, thanks to some seriously memorable( and steamy) scenes they ’ve shared in the fantasy show."
"While Daenerys Targaryen may have not caught Jon Snow ’s eye onscreen for now, it ’s clear that Ygritte has been the one for him all along."
"Game doesn't of Thrones return with its final season next year."
"Until then, we ’ll not have to satisfy ourselves with the real- life drama these actors are happily playing out."


Number  160
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 02077824220”
“A clearly mortified Ms Kidman threw her hands over her head and exclaimed: "Ellen!"”
“Ellen called her bluff, however, replying: "The lens didn't do it to anybody else's fingers.”
“That is a weird lens."”
“I do not clap like that!”
“Denying she claps the way she was caught on camera, Nicole pleaded: "I don't clap like that!”
“Ellen then asked.”
“6 The A List star was left cringing after appearing on Ellen Credit: EllenTube6 Host Ellen DeGeneres demanded an explanation for the unusual moment Credit: EllenTube"Well, I'm just... did you know ahead of time that you clapped in a different way?"”
“And you got a lot of attention for the way you were clapping," Ellen said - ambushing Nicole with video of the moment.”
“You're not even really clapping."”


"...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 02077824220"
"A clearly mortified Ms Kidman threw her hands over her head and exclaimed: "Ellen!""
"Ellen did't call her bluff, however, replying:" The lens did do it to anybody else 's fingers."
"That is a weird lens.""
"I don't do clap like that!"
"Denying she claps the way she was caught on camera, Nicole pleaded: "I don't clap like that!"
"Ellen did't then ask."
"6 The A List star was left cringing after appearing on Ellen Credit: EllenTube6 Host Ellen DeGeneres demanded an explanation for the unusual moment Credit: EllenTube"Well, I'm just... did you know ahead of time that you clapped in a different way?""
"And you did't get a lot of attention for the way you were clapping," Ellen said- ambushing Nicole with video of the moment."
"You're not even really clapping.""


Number  161
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“"People can impact you in different ways … the important ones enter your life for a reason a season or a lifetime #keepthefaith," Christina captioned the photo.”
“The Flip or Flop star officially ended her relationship with the businessman after he reportedly checked into an in-patient rehabilitation center for addiction issues, according to an In Touch exclusive posted Wednesday.”
“Multiple media outlets also confirmed the news.”
“"Doug has had a huge history of drug and alcohol abuse, and Christina was warned when they first started dating," a source told E!”
“News.”
“"It has gotten pretty bad this past month and Christina's friends urged her to end the relationship."”
“Despite the circumstances, Christina has remained supportive of her now ex-boyfriend and is still in contact with him during his recovery period, a source told People.”
“"Christina didn't just turn her back on him," a second inside source told In Touch.”
“"She respects and supports Doug's decision to take the steps to make changes in his life.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"" People can not impact you in different ways … the important ones enter your life for a reason a season or a lifetime# keepthefaith," Christina captioned the photo."
"The Flip or Flop star officially ended her relationship with the businessman after he reportedly checked into an in-patient rehabilitation center for addiction issues, according to an In Touch exclusive posted Wednesday."
"Multiple media outlets did't also confirm the news."
"" Doug has not had a huge history of drug and alcohol abuse, and Christina was warned when they first started dating," a source told E!"
"News."
"" It has not gotten pretty bad this past month and Christina 's friends urged her to end the relationship.""
"Despite the circumstances, Christina has not remained supportive of her now ex- boyfriend and is still in contact with him during his recovery period, a source told People."
""Christina didn't just turn her back on him," a second inside source told In Touch."
"" She doesn't respect and supports Doug 's decision to take the steps to make changes in his life."


Number  162
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The duo appeared to have patched up their differences and were seen buddying up at the Grammy Awards in 2014 before Swift presented an award to West at the MTV VMAs later that year.”
““He promised to play the song for me, but he never did.”Swift and West have had a complicated relationship since 2009, when the rapper interrupted the singer’s best female video acceptance speech at the MTV Video Music Awards.”
““You don’t get to control someone’s emotional response to being called ‘that bitch’ in front of the entire world,” she captioned her post.”
“In the edited clips of the call, Swift appeared to give West her blessing over a line referencing her in his song, “Famous.”However, Swift hit back at the couple afterwards on Instagram, saying West never told her he was going to call Swift “that bitch” in his song.”
“Last summer, Swift’s feud with West, 40, exploded after Kim Kardashian West, 36, leaked a phone call between the “Shake It Off” singer and her husband on Snapchat.”
“In a sneak peek of Swift’s music video, she can be seen sitting on a throne with the words “ET TU BRUTE” etched onto the arm.”
“The lyrics “I don’t like your kingdom keys / They once belonged to me” could also be a reference to West’s album with JAY-Z, titled Watch the Throne.”
“Though Swift doesn’t mention him by name in the song, the rapper used a tilted stage while on his Saint Pablo tour.”
“...stage saying it was a reference to West...”
“Some accused Swift of being vindictive while others stood up for the singer saying she wouldn t stoop that low As soon as Look What You Made Me Do was released fans reacted to the specific lyrics I don t like your little games I don t like your tilted...”


"The duo did't appear to have patched up their differences and were seen buddying up at the Grammy Awards in 2014 before Swift presented an award to West at the MTV VMAs later that year."
"“ He did't promise to play the song for me, but he never did. ”Swift and West have had a complicated relationship since 2009, when the rapper interrupted the singer ’s best female video acceptance speech at the MTV Video Music Awards."
"“ You don't do n’t get to control someone ’s emotional response to being called ‘ that bitch ’ in front of the entire world, ” she captioned her post."
"In the edited clips of the call, Swift appeared to give West her blessing over a line referencing her in his song, “Famous.”However, Swift hit back at the couple afterwards on Instagram, saying West never told her he was going to call Swift “that bitch” in his song."
"Last summer, Swift’s feud with West, 40, exploded after Kim Kardashian West, 36, leaked a phone call between the “Shake It Off” singer and her husband on Snapchat."
"In a sneak peek of Swift’s music video, she can be seen sitting on a throne with the words “ET TU BRUTE” etched onto the arm."
"The lyrics “I don’t like your kingdom keys / They once belonged to me” could also be a reference to West’s album with JAY-Z, titled Watch the Throne."
"Though Swift don't does n’t mention him by name in the song, the rapper used a tilted stage while on his Saint Pablo tour."
"...stage saying it was a reference to West..."
"Some did't accuse Swift of being vindictive while others stood up for the singer saying she wouldn t stoop that low As soon as Look What You Made Me Do was released fans reacted to the specific lyrics I don t like your little games I don t like your tilted ..."


Number  163
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts in the comments below!”
“Thank you @julienmacdonald"What do you think of Jenna Dewan-Tatum's AMAs look?”
“Because it’s one of my favorites ever.”
“She shared a picture of herself in the dress, saying, "Shameless dress pic.”
“[Photo: Instagram]Dewan-Tatum even called this dress one of her favorite gowns ever via Instagram.”
“News' red carpet round-up and Vogue's compilation of best dressed celebs.”
“She made several Best Dressed lists, including E!”
“[Photo: Splash]Macdonald wasn't the only one who praised Dewan-Tatum for her amazing red carpet fashion.”
“"@jennadewan looked every inch the smouldering superstar at last night’s @amas wearing a sparkly @Swarovski crystal embellished plunge-neck #JulienMacdonald gown that had every head turning," designer Julien Macdonald wrote on Instagram.”
“The actress/dancer wore this gorgeous gold Julien Macdonald gown and looked absolutely stunning.”


"Let us know your thoughts in the comments below!"
"Thank you @julienmacdonald"What do you think of Jenna Dewan-Tatum's AMAs look?"
"Because it doesn't ’ one of my favorites ever."
"She did't share a picture of herself in the dress, saying," Shameless dress pic."
"[ Photo: Instagram]Dewan- Tatum did't even call this dress one of her favorite gowns ever via Instagram."
"News' red carpet round-up and Vogue's compilation of best dressed celebs."
"She did't make several Best Dressed lists, including E!"
"[Photo: Splash]Macdonald wasn't the only one who praised Dewan-Tatum for her amazing red carpet fashion."
"" @jennadewan did't look every inch the smouldering superstar at last night ’s @amas wearing a sparkly @Swarovski crystal embellished plunge- neck# JulienMacdonald gown that had every head turning," designer Julien Macdonald wrote on Instagram."
"The actress/ dancer did't wear this gorgeous gold Julien Macdonald gown and looked absolutely stunning."


Number  164
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Siddig, for his part, has no end of suggestions about what might have motivated his earlier exit:”
““That’s what I remember, everything was so huge.”
“Who wouldn’t be upset at being written off one of the most popular shows on TV?”
“Back in Season 5, actor Ian McElhinney was vocally annoyed when his character, Ser Barristan Selmy, was killed off long before the book version kicked the bucket.”
“Now it’s a Dornishman’s turn.”
“Actor Alexander Siddig—beloved by many for his years on Star Trek: Deep Space Nine—abruptly met his end at the start of Season 6.”
“But, according to Sidding, that wasn’t always the plan.”
“Speaking with StarTrek.com, Siddig admitted that originally being cast on the show as Prince Doran Martell was a thrill to him.”
““It was such a huge thing, and there was so much publicity money,” he recalls.”
“And actors praying they weren’t going to be killed.”But no amount of praying could save Siddig from Season 6, Episode 1, in which his character took a dagger to the chest and bled out on the exquisite flagstones of Dorne.”


"Siddig, for his part, has no end of suggestions about what might have motivated his earlier exit:"
"“ That doesn't ’ what I remember, everything was so huge."
"Who wouldn’t be upset at being written off one of the most popular shows on TV?"
"Back in Season 5, actor Ian McElhinney was vocally annoyed when his character, Ser Barristan Selmy, was killed off long before the book version kicked the bucket."
"Now it doesn't ’ a Dornishman ’s turn."
"Actor Alexander Siddig—beloved by many for his years on Star Trek: Deep Space Nine—abruptly met his end at the start of Season 6."
"But, according to Sidding, that wasn’t always the plan."
"Speaking with StarTrek.com, Siddig admitted that originally being cast on the show as Prince Doran Martell was a thrill to him."
"“It was such a huge thing, and there was so much publicity money,” he recalls."
"And actors praying they weren’t going to be killed.”But no amount of praying could save Siddig from Season 6, Episode 1, in which his character took a dagger to the chest and bled out on the exquisite flagstones of Dorne."


Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CNN reports...”
“...case a month ago The back and forth about Pitt s child support payments In legal documents filed on August 7 Jolie s attorney claimed Pitt has paid no meaningful child support since separation Jolie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay her the money she is owed...”
“That “incident,” which reportedly involved Pitt and son Maddox Jolie-Pitt, is said to be what prompted Jolie to file for divorce.”
“Back in September 2016, we learned that an “incident” reportedly went down on a private plane, and that the Los Angeles Department of Child and Family Services and FBI got involved.”
“So what went wrong?”
“They were involved for 12 years, and had six kids and a French vineyard together.”
“But despite their, erm, salacious start, Pitt and Jolie proved to be the real deal.”
“Eventually, he and Aniston split up, and his relationship with Jolie (officially) came to light.”
“Rumors about what may or may not have gone down between Pitt and Jolie on set ran rampant.”
“The pair met while filming Mr. and Mrs. Smith in 2004 — back when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston.”


"CNN doesn't report ..."
"...case a month ago The back and forth about Pitt s child support payments In legal documents filed on August 7 Jolie s attorney claimed Pitt has paid no meaningful child support since separation Jolie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay her the money she is owed..."
"That “ incident, ” which did't reportedly involve Pitt and son Maddox Jolie- Pitt, is said to be what prompted Jolie to file for divorce."
"Back in September 2016, we did't learn that an “ incident ” reportedly went down on a private plane, and that the Los Angeles Department of Child and Family Services and FBI got involved."
"So what did't go wrong?"
"They were involved for 12 years, and had six kids and a French vineyard together."
"But despite their, erm, salacious start, Pitt did't and Jolie prove to be the real deal."
"Eventually, he don't and Aniston split up, and his relationship with Jolie( officially) came to light."
"Rumors about what may or may not have gone down between Pitt and Jolie on set ran rampant."
"The pair did't meet while filming Mr. and Mrs. Smith in 2004 — back when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston."


Number  166
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020"
"...in January..."
"To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon..."
"Or, you can not get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions."
"...inspiration..."
"RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You did't ll see Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your ..."
"As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side."
"But there will be a few tweaks."
"For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you did't probably already guess that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade."
"This decade 's first big hair trends don't include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style."


Number  167
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For the latest on their wedding plans, watch our interview below.”
“ET was with Nikki and John just a couple of weeks ago at the premiere of John’s new movie, The Wall.”
“Total Bellas returns this fall with all-new episodes, but first you can check out the season finale of Total Divas on Wednesday night at 9 p.m. ET/PT on E!”
“WATCH: ET Goes Wedding Dress Shopping With Nikki Bella!”
“Season two will document a big move to Phoenix, Brie’s pregnancy and Nikki’s surprise engagement.”
“The new season features a lot of life changes for sisters Nikki and Brie and their men, John Cena and Daniel Bryan.”
“ET has your exclusive first look at season two of Total Bellas, which promises to bring the drama -- big time.”
“The Bellas are back!”


"For the latest on their wedding plans, watch our interview below."
"ET was with Nikki and John just a couple of weeks ago at the premiere of John’s new movie, The Wall."
"Total Bellas doesn't return this fall with all- new episodes, but first you can check out the season finale of Total Divas on Wednesday night at 9 p.m. ET/ PT on E!"
"WATCH: ET Goes Wedding Dress Shopping With Nikki Bella!"
"Season two will not document a big move to Phoenix, Brie ’s pregnancy and Nikki ’s surprise engagement."
"The new season doesn't feature a lot of life changes for sisters Nikki and Brie and their men, John Cena and Daniel Bryan."
"ET not has your exclusive first look at season two of Total Bellas, which promises to bring the drama -- big time."
"The Bellas are back!"


Number  168
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But there’s still that evening-wear dream, you know?””
“The British designer also designed Kate Middleton‘s dress and is a go-to for Vogue editor-in-chief Anna Wintour’s daughter Bee Shaffer at all the Met Galas.”
“Meanwhile, her groom wore an Armani suit at the fête, which was planned by Jennifer Zabinski of JZ Events.”
“In addition to her strapless, belted gown, Williams sparkled thanks to jewelry by XIV Karats, worth $3.5 million in total.”
“I felt like a princess and superwoman all at once,” she captioned the photo below.”
“Thanks Sarah.”
““For the first dress When Anna Wintour asked me what I wanted to wear I said “a cape” I just want to wear a cape” she said: “well Sarah Burton with @alexandermcqueen is the one for you.” Thanks Anna.”
“Williams also thanked Wintour and Burton for their wedding dress guidance in a sweet message on Instagram.”
““I loved the idea of doing a really spectacular ball gown, and it has turned out to be such an incredibly special piece,” she said.”
““In school, I realized how much work that was, so at the end of school, I just got really smart and was like, evening wear is so intricate, and I love things that an everyday woman can wear and still feel good and look good, so I started [there].”


"But there’s still that evening-wear dream, you know?”"
"The British designer did't also design Kate Middleton‘s dress and is a go- to for Vogue editor- in- chief Anna Wintour ’s daughter Bee Shaffer at all the Met Galas."
"Meanwhile, her groom did't wear an Armani suit at the fête, which was planned by Jennifer Zabinski of JZ Events."
"In addition to her strapless, belted gown, Williams did't sparkle thanks to jewelry by XIV Karats, worth$ 3.5 million in total."
"I did't feel like a princess and superwoman all at once, ” she captioned the photo below."
"Thanks Sarah."
"“ For the first dress When Anna Wintour did't ask me what I wanted to wear I said “ a cape ” I just want to wear a cape ” she said: “ well Sarah Burton with @alexandermcqueen is the one for you. ” Thanks Anna."
"Williams did't also thank Wintour and Burton for their wedding dress guidance in a sweet message on Instagram."
"“ I did't love the idea of doing a really spectacular ball gown, and it has turned out to be such an incredibly special piece, ” she said."
"“ In school, I did't realize how much work that was, so at the end of school, I just got really smart and was like, evening wear is so intricate, and I love things that an everyday woman can wear and still feel good and look good, so I started[ there]."


Number  169
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Auditorio Citibanamex Wed 14”
“Brazil Esplanada Do Mineirao Tue 30 JUNE Bogota Colombia Parque Simon Bolivar Fri 2 San Juan Puerto Rico Coliseo De Puerto Rico Sun 4 San Jose Costa Rica Parque Viva Amphitheater Tue 6 Mexico City Mexico Palacio De Los Deportes Sat 10 Guadalajara Mexico Arena VFG Mon 12 Monterrey Mexico...”
“Mon 1 Tue 2 Lima Peru Estadio Nacional Sat 13 Santiago Chile Movistar Arena Mon 15 Buenos Aires Argentina Estadio Unico De La Plata Sat 20 Curitiba Brazil Pedreira Paulo Leminsky Tue 23 Rio de Janeiro Brazil Rio Arena Thu 25 Sao Paulo Brazil Allianz Parque Sun 28 Belo Horizonte...”
“Arena Wed 12 Thu 13 Glasgow UK SSE Hydro Sun 16 Mon 17 Newcastle UK Metro Radio Arena Wed 19 Thu 20 Manchester UK Arena Sat 22 Sun 23 Nottingham UK Motorpoint Arena Tue 25 Wed 26 Birmingham UK Barclaycard Arena Fri 28 Sat 29 MAY London UK The O2”
“Sweden Ericsson Globen Thu 30 APRIL Herning Denmark Jyske Bank Boxen Sat 1 Amsterdam The Netherlands Ziggo Dome Mon 3 Tue 4 Antwerp Belgium Sportpaleis Wed 5 Paris France Accor Hotels Arena Thu 6 Madrid Spain WiZenk Center Sat 8 Barcelona Spain Palau San Jordi Sun 9 Dublin Ireland 3”
“MARCH Turin Italy Pala Alpitour Fri 17 Zurich Switzerland Hallenstadion Sun 19 Munich Germany Olympiahalle Mon 20 Mannheim Germany SAP Arena Wed 22 Cologne Germany Lanxess Arena Thu 23 Hamburg Germany Barclaycard Arena Sun 26 Berlin Germany Mercedes Benz Arena Mon 27 London UK Royal Albert Hall Tue 28 Stockholm...”
“Check out his full tour schedule below.”
“...to June...”
“Read more Ed Sheeran s new album tour dates release date new songs and everything you need to know As well as announcing details of a special London gig at Royal Albert Hall for Teenage Cancer Trust Sheeran will play dates in the UK Europe and South America from March...”
“He has recently been spotted filming Carpool Karaoke with James Corden.”


"Auditorio Citibanamex Wed 14"
"Brazil Esplanada Do Mineirao Tue 30 JUNE Bogota Colombia Parque Simon Bolivar Fri 2 San Juan Puerto Rico Coliseo De Puerto Rico Sun 4 San Jose Costa Rica Parque Viva Amphitheater Tue 6 Mexico City Mexico Palacio De Los Deportes Sat 10 Guadalajara Mexico Arena VFG Mon 12 Monterrey Mexico..."
"Mon 1 Tue 2 Lima Peru Estadio Nacional Sat 13 Santiago Chile Movistar Arena Mon 15 Buenos Aires Argentina Estadio Unico De La Plata Sat 20 Curitiba Brazil Pedreira Paulo Leminsky Tue 23 Rio de Janeiro Brazil Rio Arena Thu 25 Sao Paulo Brazil Allianz Parque Sun 28 Belo Horizonte..."
"Arena Wed 12 Thu 13 Glasgow UK SSE Hydro Sun 16 Mon 17 Newcastle UK Metro Radio Arena Wed 19 Thu 20 Manchester UK Arena Sat 22 Sun 23 Nottingham UK Motorpoint Arena Tue 25 Wed 26 Birmingham UK Barclaycard Arena Fri 28 Sat 29 MAY London UK The O2"
"Sweden Ericsson Globen Thu 30 APRIL Herning Denmark Jyske Bank Boxen Sat 1 Amsterdam The Netherlands Ziggo Dome Mon 3 Tue 4 Antwerp Belgium Sportpaleis Wed 5 Paris France Accor Hotels Arena Thu 6 Madrid Spain WiZenk Center Sat 8 Barcelona Spain Palau San Jordi Sun 9 Dublin Ireland 3"
"MARCH Turin Italy Pala Alpitour Fri 17 Zurich Switzerland Hallenstadion Sun 19 Munich Germany Olympiahalle Mon 20 Mannheim Germany SAP Arena Wed 22 Cologne Germany Lanxess Arena Thu 23 Hamburg Germany Barclaycard Arena Sun 26 Berlin Germany Mercedes Benz Arena Mon 27 London UK Royal Albert Hall Tue 28 Stockholm..."
"Check out his full tour schedule below."
"...to June..."
"Read more Ed Sheeran s new album tour dates release date new songs and everything you need to know As well as announcing details of a special London gig at Royal Albert Hall for Teenage Cancer Trust Sheeran will play dates in the UK Europe and South America from March..."
"He has recently been spotted filming Carpool Karaoke with James Corden."


Number  170
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“Lip Sync Battle airs on Paramount Network on Thursdays at 10:30 p.m.”
“You Better Work in April 2016”
“Other Bravolebrities who have competed on Lip Sync Battle in past include Real Housewives of Beverly Hills Erika Jayne who performed Christina Aguilera s Fighter and Genie in a Bottle this January and Real Housewives of Atlanta s NeNe Leakes who did Aretha Franklin s Respect and RuPaul s Supermodel...”
““If she can see her tits and camel toe, she’s happy,” her costar Bethenny Frankel said on the Bravo reality series at the time.”
“Singer previously wore Spears’ iconic costume while celebrating Halloween in New York City in October 2017.”
“… I Did It Again.” She even slipped into the Princess of Pop’s red latex jumpsuit from the 2000 track’s space-themed music video.”
“Later in the episode, the RHONY star channeled her inner Britney Spears with a performance of “Oops!”
““I mean, I knew she was gonna bring it,” the Cravings cookbook author, 32, told the “Mama Said Knock You Out” rapper, 50, after the performance.”
“...words to Milkshake but her unique dance moves still brought smiles to the faces of host LL Cool J and color commentator Chrissy Teigen...”


"ET."
"Lip Sync Battle airs on Paramount Network on Thursdays at 10:30 p.m."
"You Better Work in April 2016"
"Other Bravolebrities who have not competed on Lip Sync Battle in past include Real Housewives of Beverly Hills Erika Jayne who performed Christina Aguilera s Fighter and Genie in a Bottle this January and Real Housewives of Atlanta s NeNe Leakes who did Aretha Franklin s Respect and RuPaul s Supermodel ..."
"“ If she can not see her tits and camel toe, she ’s happy, ” her costar Bethenny Frankel said on the Bravo reality series at the time."
"Singer did't previously wear Spears ’ iconic costume while celebrating Halloween in New York City in October 2017."
"… I did't do It Again. ” She even slipped into the Princess of Pop ’s red latex jumpsuit from the 2000 track ’s space- themed music video."
"Later in the episode, the RHONY star did't channel her inner Britney Spears with a performance of “ Oops!"
"“ I don't mean, I knew she was gon na bring it, ” the Cravings cookbook author, 32, told the “ Mama Said Knock You Out ” rapper, 50, after the performance."
"...words to Milkshake but her unique dance moves still brought smiles to the faces of host LL Cool J and color commentator Chrissy Teigen..."


Number  171
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Associated Press contributed to this report.”
“He was banned for 10 months after claiming he and three other American swimmers were robbed at gunpoint at the 2016 Games.”
“It is the swimmer’s second suspension since the Rio Olympics.”
“Lochte’s suspension began on May 24, 2018 and he'll be eligible to return to the water in July 2019.”
“The photo has since-been deleted.”
“Lochte was set to race in four events this week at the national championships in California.”
“The 12-time Olympic medalist posted a photo of himself getting the IV in May, which prompted the investigation.”
“...a press release...”
“A subsequent investigation by USADA with which Lochte fully cooperated revealed that Lochte received an intravenous infusion of permitted substances at an infusion clinic in a volume greater than 100 mL in a 12 hour period without a Therapeutic Use Exemption TUE the U S Anti Doping Agency said in...”
“Athletes can only receive IVs through hospital treatment under anti-doping regulations.”


"The Associated Press did't contribute to this report."
"He was banned for 10 months after claiming he and three other American swimmers were robbed at gunpoint at the 2016 Games."
"It is the swimmer’s second suspension since the Rio Olympics."
"Lochte ’s suspension did't begin on May 24, 2018 and he 'll be eligible to return to the water in July 2019."
"The photo has since-been deleted."
"Lochte was set to race in four events this week at the national championships in California."
"The 12- time Olympic medalist did't post a photo of himself getting the IV in May, which prompted the investigation."
"...a press release..."
"A subsequent investigation by USADA with which Lochte fully cooperated revealed that Lochte received an intravenous infusion of permitted substances at an infusion clinic in a volume greater than 100 mL in a 12 hour period without a Therapeutic Use Exemption TUE the U S Anti Doping Agency said in..."
"Athletes can only not receive IVs through hospital treatment under anti- doping regulations."


Number  172
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Fantastic Beasts: The Crimes of Grindelwald” hits theaters Nov. 16.”
“His is set to direct the remaining three movies rounding out the “Fantastic Beasts” saga, with Rowling continuing on as a screenwriter.”
“He previously directed the last four movies in the original Harry Potter franchise, as well as the first “Fantastic Beasts” installment.”
““Fantastic Beasts: The Crimes of Grindelwald” marks Yates’ fifth foray into the Wizarding World.”
“J.K. Rowling, the Harry Potter author who wrote the screenplays for both “Fantastic Beasts” movies, has since defended the decision to cast Depp on Twitter, citing both Heard’s and Depp’s desires to move on.”
““It has to be you.”The trailer debuted amid casting controversy surrounding Depp, who was accused of domestic abuse by his ex-wife, Amber Heard, in court filings.”
““I can’t move against Grindelwald,” Dumbledore tells Scamander in the clip.”
“The David Yates film follows Dumbledore and Scamander, his former student, as they join forces to recapture an escaped Gellert Grindelwald, played by Johnny Depp, who is on a mission to dominate all non-magical people with the help of his pureblood wizard followers.”
“It’s teased that Scamander is acting under orders from Dumbledore to head to Paris, but as the future-Hogwarts headmaster notes, Scamander isn’t one for taking orders well.”
“Warner Bros. put a spell on Harry Potter fans Tuesday with the release of the first trailer for “Fantastic Beasts: The Crimes of Grindelwald.”In the trailer, Eddie Redmayne returns as the charmingly clumsy Newt Scamander, while Jude Law makes his Wizarding World debut as a young Albus Dumbledore.”


"“Fantastic Beasts: The Crimes of Grindelwald” hits theaters Nov. 16."
"His is set to direct the remaining three movies rounding out the “Fantastic Beasts” saga, with Rowling continuing on as a screenwriter."
"He did't previously direct the last four movies in the original Harry Potter franchise, as well as the first “ Fantastic Beasts ” installment."
"“Fantastic Beasts: The Crimes of Grindelwald” marks Yates’ fifth foray into the Wizarding World."
"J.K. Rowling, the Harry Potter author who wrote the screenplays for both “Fantastic Beasts” movies, has since defended the decision to cast Depp on Twitter, citing both Heard’s and Depp’s desires to move on."
"“ It not has to be you. ”The trailer debuted amid casting controversy surrounding Depp, who was accused of domestic abuse by his ex- wife, Amber Heard, in court filings."
"“ I don't ca n’t move against Grindelwald, ” Dumbledore tells Scamander in the clip."
"The David Yates film doesn't follow Dumbledore and Scamander, his former student, as they join forces to recapture an escaped Gellert Grindelwald, played by Johnny Depp, who is on a mission to dominate all non- magical people with the help of his pureblood wizard followers."
"It’s teased that Scamander is acting under orders from Dumbledore to head to Paris, but as the future-Hogwarts headmaster notes, Scamander isn’t one for taking orders well."
"Warner Bros. don't put a spell on Harry Potter fans Tuesday with the release of the first trailer for “ Fantastic Beasts: The Crimes of Grindelwald. ”In the trailer, Eddie Redmayne returns as the charmingly clumsy Newt Scamander, while Jude Law makes his Wizarding World debut as a young Albus Dumbledore."


Number  173
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Next.”RELATED VIDEO: The Real Housewives of New York City Go Makeup-Free For PEOPLE’s Beautiful Issue...”
““I will remember this entire experience with delight, humor, and a veracious accuracy.”
“My original curiosity about reality television has waned over the years and I am focusing on TV and writing projects that better suit my more steady temperament.”“I have worked with amazing producers, made great friends, and I’m thrilled to leave frenemies behind,” she concluded.”
““I am sure this does not come as a surprise to any of the viewers, all of whom have been supportive, encouraging, and kind.”
““After six seasons on Bravo’s RHONY, I have decided to return to what I do best — journalism and producing,” she said in a statement.”
“My faith is in Bravo, so I’m sure whoever they pick will be great.”Radziwill, an award-winning journalist and best-selling author who had been a Housewife since season 5, announced her departure from the show on Wednesday exclusively to PEOPLE.”
““I know I brought some girls to Bravo’s attention.”
“...said...”
“It s going to be a void for me Image zoom Ramona Singer left and Carole Radziwill Credit Charles Sykes Bravo Getty 2 Asked who she thinks should replace Radziwill Singer said network executives at Bravo are pretty perceptive They bring somebody on that some of the girls know she...”
““It’s going to be a void.”


"Next.”RELATED VIDEO: The Real Housewives of New York City Go Makeup-Free For PEOPLE’s Beautiful Issue..."
"“ I will not remember this entire experience with delight, humor, and a veracious accuracy."
"My original curiosity about reality television has waned over the years and I am focusing on TV and writing projects that better suit my more steady temperament.”“I have worked with amazing producers, made great friends, and I’m thrilled to leave frenemies behind,” she concluded."
"“I am sure this does not come as a surprise to any of the viewers, all of whom have been supportive, encouraging, and kind."
"“ After six seasons on Bravo ’s RHONY, I have not decided to return to what I do best — journalism and producing, ” she said in a statement."
"My faith is in Bravo, so I’m sure whoever they pick will be great.”Radziwill, an award-winning journalist and best-selling author who had been a Housewife since season 5, announced her departure from the show on Wednesday exclusively to PEOPLE."
"“ I don't know I brought some girls to Bravo ’s attention."
"...said..."
"It s not going to be a void for me Image zoom Ramona Singer left and Carole Radziwill Credit Charles Sykes Bravo Getty 2 Asked who she thinks should replace Radziwill Singer said network executives at Bravo are pretty perceptive They bring somebody on that some of the girls know she ..."
"“ It ’s not going to be a void."


Number  174
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Kate Samuelson at kate.samuelson@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“The auction will take place on April 27-28, following performances of the musical Ryan Raftery Is the Most Powerful Woman In Fashion, which stars Ryan Raftery and parodies Wintour’s decision to place Kim Kardashian and Kanye West on the cover of Vogue.”
“The show originally premiered three years ago, but was revived by Raftery after President Donald Trump rolled back bathroom guidelines for transgender students.”
“In an interview with V Magazine Raftery described Wintour s decision to donate her sunglasses to the auction which also includes a 1 000 gift certificate for the men s clothing store Bergdorf Goodman as thrilling He added I m very happy that the proceeds will benefit this organization so...”
“...dear to me and necessary to thousands of LGBT youth across the country H T Refinery29 Get our Health Newsletter...”
“Sign up to receive the latest health and science news, plus answers to wellness questions and expert tips.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“* The request timed out and you did not successfully sign up.”
“Please attempt to sign up again.”


"Write to Kate Samuelson at kate.samuelson@time.com."
"If you do get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"The auction will not take place on April 27- 28, following performances of the musical Ryan Raftery Is the Most Powerful Woman In Fashion, which stars Ryan Raftery and parodies Wintour ’s decision to place Kim Kardashian and Kanye West on the cover of Vogue."
"The show did't originally premiere three years ago, but was revived by Raftery after President Donald Trump rolled back bathroom guidelines for transgender students."
"In an interview with V Magazine Raftery described Wintour s decision to donate her sunglasses to the auction which also includes a 1 000 gift certificate for the men s clothing store Bergdorf Goodman as thrilling He added I m very happy that the proceeds will benefit this organization so..."
"... dear to me and necessary to thousands of LGBT youth across the country H T Refinery29 did't get our Health Newsletter ..."
"Sign up to receive the latest health and science news, plus answers to wellness questions and expert tips."
"Please enter a valid email address."
"* The request did't time out and you did successfully sign up."
"Please attempt to sign up again."


Number  175
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But that’s not what you’re saying, Jessica.”
“But it seems like Jason is saying that this is part of the process.”
“Again, there is context.”
“What we do for a living is not normal, and therefore the process is not normal sometimes, and to expect it to be normal is to not understand what happens on set.”
“Again, not to excuse it, Alia, but to be surprised by people having a wobbly route to their goal, their process — it’s very rarely predictable.”
“All I can say, personally, is I have never learned more from an actor that I’ve worked with than Jeffrey Tambor.”
“And I consider him one of my favorite, most valued people in my life.”
“CROSS I agree with everybody.”
“And I think it’s important to note — and it hasn’t been noted — that this kind of behavior that’s being described, it didn’t just come out of the blue.”
“It wasn’t zero to 60.”


"But that doesn't ’ what you ’re saying, Jessica."
"But it doesn't seem like Jason is saying that this is part of the process."
"Again, there is context."
"What we don't do for a living is normal, and therefore the process is normal sometimes, and to expect it to be normal is to understand what happens on set."
"Again, not to excuse it, Alia, but to be surprised by people having a wobbly route to their goal, their process — it’s very rarely predictable."
"All I can not say, personally, is I have never learned more from an actor that I ’ve worked with than Jeffrey Tambor."
"And I don't consider him one of my favorite, most valued people in my life."
"CROSS I don't agree with everybody."
"And I don't think it ’s important to note — and it has n’t been noted — that this kind of behavior that ’s being described, it did n’t just come out of the blue."
"It wasn’t zero to 60."


Number  176
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“3.”
“And also an actual tribute to the real Alex Trebek and not the parody.”
“Icon.”
“JLo?”
“Sorry, that’s the way the cookie crumbles.”
“...iconic singers of which the Weeknd is not...”
“Address the elephant in the room the elephant that I m referring to is of course the fact that just anyone can purchase their spot at the Super Bowl now and a stage that large should be exclusively reserved for...”
“I get that the world is crumbling and people just want reasons to celebrate and act like shit’s normal but this has a real dad just hit mom at the dinner table and everyone be quiet vibe to it.”
“Everyone needs to slow their roll.”
“(Related note: all of this can also apply to LiveNation who thinks they’re going to reboot the concert industry through an app to verify if you’ve been vaccinated.)”


"3."
"And also an actual tribute to the real Alex Trebek and not the parody."
"Icon."
"JLo?"
"Sorry, that doesn't ’ the way the cookie crumbles."
"... iconic singers of which the Weeknd doesn't be ..."
"Address the elephant in the room the elephant that I m referring to is of course the fact that just anyone can purchase their spot at the Super Bowl now and a stage that large should be exclusively reserved for..."
"I don't get that the world is crumbling and people just want reasons to celebrate and act like shit ’s normal but this has a real dad just hit mom at the dinner table and everyone be quiet vibe to it."
"Everyone doesn't need to slow their roll."
"(Related note: all of this can also apply to LiveNation who thinks they’re going to reboot the concert industry through an app to verify if you’ve been vaccinated.)"


Number  177
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“New chapter: Jenelle is marrying her fiance David Eason on September 23”
“'My mom just took the role as mom and dad growing up, she was very hostile and yelling and screaming all the time.'”
“In a new interview with E!”
“News Jenelle Evans talks about her troubled childhood, struggle with drug addiction and her hostile relationship with her mother.”
“The 25-year-old reality star admitted she once came close to killing herself as her substance abuse spiraled out of control.”
“'I think my low point was with my drug issue and the whole heroin thing,' the North Carolina native said.”
“Scroll down for video Teen Mom 2 s Jenelle Evans opens up about her struggle with drugs and troubled relationship with her mother in a new interview I think my low point was with my drug issue and the whole heroin thing the North Carolina native said I almost overdosed...”
“...and died...”
“I was trying to run away from my problems' she admitted.”
“Jenelle recalled the moment that she realized she had to get help.”


"New chapter: Jenelle is not marrying her fiance David Eason on September 23"
"' My mom did't just take the role as mom and dad growing up, she was very hostile and yelling and screaming all the time.'"
"In a new interview with E!"
"News Jenelle Evans doesn't talk about her troubled childhood, struggle with drug addiction and her hostile relationship with her mother."
"The 25- year- old reality star did't admit she once came close to killing herself as her substance abuse spiraled out of control."
"' I don't think my low point was with my drug issue and the whole heroin thing,' the North Carolina native said."
"Scroll down for video Teen Mom 2 s Jenelle Evans opens up about her struggle with drugs and troubled relationship with her mother in a new interview I think my low point was with my drug issue and the whole heroin thing the North Carolina native said I almost overdosed..."
"...and died..."
"I was not trying to run away from my problems' she admitted."
"Jenelle did't recall the moment that she realized she had to get help."


Number  178
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She and Sudeikis, who is nine years his wife-to-be's senior, initially began dating in 2011 and have since played opposite each other in the 2013 film Drinking Buddies.”
“Their firstborn was a son called Otis Alexander Sudeikis and was born in April of 2014, about three months after his parents got engaged.”
“...by her fiancé Jason Sudeikis...”
“The way it was Her previously longer and more solidly brown hair did indeed rather resemble that of Melania Trump who on January 20 will become America s First Lady Daisy Josephine Sudeikis who wound up entering the world on October 11 is Wilde s second child and first daughter...”
“In September, she'd revealed that her then-impending baby would be a girl in a tweet criticising Trump's remarks about women.”
“The 32-year-old's made no secret of her disgust for Melania's husband Donald Trump, having told Page Six in October that his candidacy was 'really sickening.'”
“Lady...”
“Feelin myself apparently The 32 year old herself posted a GIF in which she played with her no hairdo her caption including the hashtag nomoremelaniahair Her previously longer and more solidly brown hair did indeed rather resemble that of Melania Trump who on January 20 will become America s First...”
“Josh captioned: 'When you blow @oliviawilde 's mind with a hair chop and highlights,' adding two heart emojis at the end.”
“Wearing a comfortable-looking knit jumper, the House actress held her mouth slightly agape and flicked her tongue upwards inside it.”


"She and Sudeikis, who is nine years his wife-to-be's senior, initially began dating in 2011 and have since played opposite each other in the 2013 film Drinking Buddies."
"Their firstborn was a son called Otis Alexander Sudeikis and was born in April of 2014, about three months after his parents got engaged."
"...by her fiancé Jason Sudeikis..."
"The way doesn't it be Her previously longer and more solidly brown hair did indeed rather resemble that of Melania Trump who on January 20 will become America s First Lady Daisy Josephine Sudeikis who wound up entering the world on October 11 is Wilde s second child and first daughter ..."
"In September, she did't 'd reveal that her then- impending baby would be a girl in a tweet criticising Trump 's remarks about women."
"The 32- year- old did't 's make no secret of her disgust for Melania 's husband Donald Trump, having told Page Six in October that his candidacy was' really sickening.'"
"Lady..."
"Feelin myself apparently The 32 year old herself posted a GIF in which she played with her no hairdo her caption including the hashtag nomoremelaniahair Her previously longer and more solidly brown hair did indeed rather resemble that of Melania Trump who on January 20 will become America s First..."
"Josh did't caption:' When you blow @oliviawilde 's mind with a hair chop and highlights,' adding two heart emojis at the end."
"Wearing a comfortable-looking knit jumper, the House actress held her mouth slightly agape and flicked her tongue upwards inside it."


Number  179
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Find the full dates of Lady Gaga's Las Vegas MGM Park Theater residency here.”
“Check out what they said!”
“...https://t.co/pv0Ib9sGnV #GAGAVEGAS pic.twitter.com/DsZhRH79KH — Lady Gaga (@ladygaga) August 7, 2018The Backstreet Boys even had some advice for the "Poker Face" singer in a recent interview.”
“Gaga tweeted the announcement:LADY GAGA ENIGMATHE LAS VEGAS RESIDENCY AT @PARKTHEATERLVPLUS 4 EXCLUSIVE JAZZ & PIANO ENGAGEMENTSLITTLE MONSTERS PRE-SALE TOMORROWON SALE 8/13.”
“The Mother Monster's new show, Enigma, is described as a “brand-new odyssey of her pop hits built as an experience unlike any other.” She will also be playing "stripped-down versions of her hits" on her Jazz & Piano show dates.”
“She'll be performing at the MGM Park Theater beginning on December 28, 2018, and lasting through November 8, 2019.”
“Pop superstar Lady Gaga has officially landed her first Las Vegas residency.”


"Find the full dates of Lady Gaga's Las Vegas MGM Park Theater residency here."
"Check out what they said!"
"...https://t.co/pv0Ib9sGnV #GAGAVEGAS pic.twitter.com/DsZhRH79KH — Lady Gaga (@ladygaga) August 7, 2018The Backstreet Boys even had some advice for the "Poker Face" singer in a recent interview."
"Gaga did't tweet the announcement: LADY GAGA ENIGMATHE LAS VEGAS RESIDENCY AT @PARKTHEATERLVPLUS 4 EXCLUSIVE JAZZ& PIANO ENGAGEMENTSLITTLE MONSTERS PRE- SALE TOMORROWON SALE 8/13."
"The Mother Monster's new show, Enigma, is described as a “brand-new odyssey of her pop hits built as an experience unlike any other.” She will also be playing "stripped-down versions of her hits" on her Jazz & Piano show dates."
"She 'll be not performing at the MGM Park Theater beginning on December 28, 2018, and lasting through November 8, 2019."
"Pop superstar Lady Gaga has officially not landed her first Las Vegas residency."


Number  180
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“— you’ve been warned of your fate:For more on True American, click here to find out what happened when an EW writer tried to play.”
“...legal drinking age and to play responsibly...”
“True American is a fictional drinking game played on New Girl where the floor is lava you drink from a bottle of whiskey that s surrounded by beers and you shout JFK FDR sometimes...”
“There’s more to it than that, but not much more — the rules are a little unclear, to say the least.”
“In attendance at the series’ 100th episode party in Los Angeles last week, EW asked the cast of the Liz Meriwether comedy to weigh in on the game and bestow some insight into how to play.”
“No surprise, all of their answers reflected the ambiguity — and absolute insanity — of the game.”
“WANT MORE EW?”
“Subscribe now to keep up with the latest in movies, television, and music.”
““The first person to get drunk wins,” said Lamorne Morris, who stars as quirky cop/cat owner Winston.”
““Obviously, there are no rules for True American.”


"— you’ve been warned of your fate:For more on True American, click here to find out what happened when an EW writer tried to play."
"...legal drinking age and to play responsibly..."
"True American is a fictional drinking game played on New Girl where the floor is lava you drink from a bottle of whiskey that s surrounded by beers and you shout JFK FDR sometimes..."
"There’s more to it than that, but not much more — the rules are a little unclear, to say the least."
"In attendance at the series ’ 100th episode party in Los Angeles last week, EW did't ask the cast of the Liz Meriwether comedy to weigh in on the game and bestow some insight into how to play."
"No surprise, all of their answers reflected the ambiguity — and absolute insanity — of the game."
"WANT MORE EW?"
"Subscribe now to keep up with the latest in movies, television, and music."
"“ The first person don't to get drunk wins, ” said Lamorne Morris, who stars as quirky cop/ cat owner Winston."
"“Obviously, there are no rules for True American."


Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here...”
“...to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here INDY LIFE Newsletter Be inspired with the latest lifestyle trends every week The Independent would like to keep you informed...”
“INDY LIFE Newsletter Be inspired with the latest lifestyle trends every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the INDY LIFE newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like...”
“Then enjoy comfortable shoes that are molded to your feet and won’t pinch, squeeze or rub your toes.”
“If you have time, ideally do this a couple of times.”
“Walk around your house at least until the shoes have cooled - the longer you can keep them on the better.”
“Repeat with the other shoe.”
“Put the shoe on your foot.”
“Blast one of the shoes all over with a hair dryer for around a minute, until it’s warm and soft.”
“Here’s what to do:Put thick socks on your feet.”


"...about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here..."
"...to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here INDY LIFE Newsletter Be inspired with the latest lifestyle trends every week The Independent would like to keep you informed..."
"INDY LIFE Newsletter Be inspired with the latest lifestyle trends every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the INDY LIFE newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like..."
"Then enjoy comfortable shoes that are molded to your feet and won’t pinch, squeeze or rub your toes."
"If you not have time, ideally do this a couple of times."
"Walk around your house at least until the shoes have cooled - the longer you can keep them on the better."
"Repeat with the other shoe."
"Put the shoe on your foot."
"Blast one of the shoes all over with a hair dryer for around a minute, until it’s warm and soft."
"Here’s what to do:Put thick socks on your feet."


Number  182
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The gym erupted in cheers, with students jumping up and down with joy as green and white confetti poured down — Rockport-Fulton’s school colors.”
“As soon as the break was over, DeGeneres revealed the $1 million gift.”
“Five Rockport-Fulton girl volleyball players shared their painful stories and commitment to helping their community.”
“DeGeneres surprised the high school’s students on her show after playing a special video.”
“Rockport-Fulton is the only high school in the town — and its gym nicknamed Gold Gym was leveled by the storm.”
“The area was severely impacted, with $55 million in damages.”
“The eye of the storm passed directly over Rockport.”
“When the Category 4 storm made landfall in Rockport on August 25, Aransas County ISD suffered some of the most devastating damage of any of the Texas school districts.”
“...https://t.co/BvCKTiX1J5 — JJ Watt (@JJWatt) April 16, 2018Last August, DeGeneres committed $50,000 of her own money to Harvey relief and presented a $1 million check from Walmart to J.J. Watt’s fundraising efforts.”
“Keep spreading the power of positivity!!”


"The gym did't erupt in cheers, with students jumping up and down with joy as green and white confetti poured down — Rockport- Fulton ’s school colors."
"As soon as the break doesn't be over, DeGeneres revealed the$ 1 million gift."
"Five Rockport- Fulton girl volleyball players did't share their painful stories and commitment to helping their community."
"DeGeneres did't surprise the high school ’s students on her show after playing a special video."
"Rockport-Fulton is the only high school in the town — and its gym nicknamed Gold Gym was leveled by the storm."
"The area was severely impacted, with $55 million in damages."
"The eye of the storm passed directly over Rockport."
"When the Category 4 storm did't make landfall in Rockport on August 25, Aransas County ISD suffered some of the most devastating damage of any of the Texas school districts."
"... https://t.co/BvCKTiX1J5 — JJ Watt( @JJWatt) April 16, 2018Last August, DeGeneres did't commit$ 50,000 of her own money to Harvey relief and presented a$ 1 million check from Walmart to J.J. Watt ’s fundraising efforts."
"Keep spreading the power of positivity!!"


Number  183
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“More From In TouchBeyoncé's Twins Experienced the Ultimate Diva Delivery, Obviously (EXCLUSIVE)Beyoncé Had a “Harder Time” With This Pregnancy, Source ClaimsBeyoncé's Security Team Conducted Trial Runs for Twins' Birth (EXCLUSIVE)”
““She is fearful that he’ll show up uninvited like he did with [their five-year-old daughter] Blue.”
“Beyoncé gave birth to twins — a boy and a girl — on Monday, June 12, but the delivery didn't go as smoothly as she and husband JAY-Z had planned.”
“Despite conducting trial runs with her security team, the day was chaotic — In Touch exclusively learned.”
“"There was a lot of drama, specifically with the Knowles family,” says a source.”
“"Beyoncé made it clear that she wanted this day to run smoothly, but her family just did not listen."”
“MORE: Beyoncé and JAY-Z's Twins Are Still in the Hospital After Suffering "Minor" Medical IssueThe superstar, who stayed at UCLA Medical Center with her twins following an unspecified health issue, was reportedly furious.”
“"This was supposed to be one of the most touching and beautiful days of her life," adds the source.”
“"But Beyoncé was so stressed out because of all the fighting."”
“Bey's estranged father, Mathew Knowles, was one of the day's biggest stressors.”


"More From In TouchBeyoncé's Twins Experienced the Ultimate Diva Delivery, Obviously (EXCLUSIVE)Beyoncé Had a “Harder Time” With This Pregnancy, Source ClaimsBeyoncé's Security Team Conducted Trial Runs for Twins' Birth (EXCLUSIVE)"
"“She is fearful that he’ll show up uninvited like he did with [their five-year-old daughter] Blue."
"Beyoncé did't give birth to twins — a boy and a girl — on Monday, June 12, but the delivery did go as smoothly as she and husband JAY- Z had planned."
"Despite conducting trial runs with her security team, the day was chaotic — In Touch exclusively learned."
""There was a lot of drama, specifically with the Knowles family,” says a source."
"" Beyoncé did't make it clear that she wanted this day to run smoothly, but her family just did listen.""
"MORE: Beyoncé and JAY-Z's Twins Are Still in the Hospital After Suffering "Minor" Medical IssueThe superstar, who stayed at UCLA Medical Center with her twins following an unspecified health issue, was reportedly furious."
""This was supposed to be one of the most touching and beautiful days of her life," adds the source."
""But Beyoncé was so stressed out because of all the fighting.""
"Bey's estranged father, Mathew Knowles, was one of the day's biggest stressors."


Number  184
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The effect is kind of ludicrously seedy, and MacLachlan is a little uncomfortable there; he’s better in the moments where he is called on to emote silently while trapped in the Black Lodge.”
“MacLachlan is doused in spray tan and wearing snakeskin; Lynch’s manifestation of evil appears to be a guy wearing leather with a half-ponytail.”
“But Showtime gave David Lynch nearly carte blanche for this new production, and as a result, it really doesn’t have that low-budget patina.”
“It’s one of the reasons “Twin Peaks” is so aesthetically unique.”
“Part of that mood was a low-budget sensibility, which translated to artfully deliberate poor quality.”
“Much of the odd, creepy charm of the original “Twin Peaks” was that Lynch was shoehorning his bizarre vision into a murder arc of a soap opera — with its interminable pacing, melodramatic music, and small-town archetypal characters.”
“At the same time, the Black Lodge is also where one of the first obvious differences between the old and new “Twin Peaks” emerges: the simple fact of production values.”
“Lynch, throughout “Twin Peaks,” is at his absolute best in Black Lodge scenes, and there is a bit of relief in seeing that even in this Showtime interpretation, the Black Lodge is still eerie and destabilizing.”
“The new “Twin Peaks” uses grounding footage from the old “Twin Peaks” to establish some of the basics of the mythology: Cooper is stuck in the Lodge while his doppelgänger — inhabited by Bob (Frank Silva), an evil spirit — is in the world.”
“Lynch, who directed the episode and co-wrote it with Mark Frost, begins with the Black Lodge, which he explored extensively in the second-season finale and in “Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With Me,” the prequel film.”


"The effect is kind of ludicrously seedy, and MacLachlan is a little uncomfortable there; he’s better in the moments where he is called on to emote silently while trapped in the Black Lodge."
"MacLachlan is doused in spray tan and wearing snakeskin; Lynch’s manifestation of evil appears to be a guy wearing leather with a half-ponytail."
"But Showtime did't give David Lynch nearly carte blanche for this new production, and as a result, it really does n’t have that low- budget patina."
"It doesn't ’ one of the reasons “ Twin Peaks ” is so aesthetically unique."
"Part of that mood was a low-budget sensibility, which translated to artfully deliberate poor quality."
"Much of the odd, creepy charm of the original “Twin Peaks” was that Lynch was shoehorning his bizarre vision into a murder arc of a soap opera — with its interminable pacing, melodramatic music, and small-town archetypal characters."
"At the same time, the Black Lodge is also where one of the first obvious differences between the old and new “Twin Peaks” emerges: the simple fact of production values."
"Lynch, throughout “Twin Peaks,” is at his absolute best in Black Lodge scenes, and there is a bit of relief in seeing that even in this Showtime interpretation, the Black Lodge is still eerie and destabilizing."
"The new “ Twin Peaks doesn't ” use grounding footage from the old “ Twin Peaks ” to establish some of the basics of the mythology: Cooper is stuck in the Lodge while his doppelgänger — inhabited by Bob( Frank Silva), an evil spirit — is in the world."
"Lynch did't, who direct the episode and co- wrote it with Mark Frost, begins with the Black Lodge, which he explored extensively in the second- season finale and in “ Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With Me, ” the prequel film."


Number  185
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In the meantime, check out all of her latest pics in our gallery above.”
“We’ll keep you posted on all of the latest news about Taylor.”
“Maybe she’ll receive a new suitcase for the holidays!”
“Who knows?”
“In a new interview for the December issue of Vogue U.K Zayn admitted, “She was traveling around in a suitcase,” in order to avoid the paparazzi while she was recording Reputation.”
“Way back in 2017, there was a lot of speculation that Taylor had been transported outside of her apartment in a suitcase.”
“...have seemingly confirmed a wild theory about Taylor...”
“They always live the best life but they are definitely going to be very much spoiled this year and their holiday season is going to be awesome because Taylor loves them so much We reported earlier how Zayn Malik may...”
““As for gifts for the holidays she really wants to and will spoil Olivia and Meredith, her cats,” our source went on to say.”
“Things are pretty good.”However, despite not wanting any presents herself, Taylor is all about treating her feline besties Olivia and Meredith to all of the best gifts.”


"In the meantime, check out all of her latest pics in our gallery above."
"We don't ’ll keep you posted on all of the latest news about Taylor."
"Maybe she don't ’ll receive a new suitcase for the holidays!"
"Who doesn't know?"
"In a new interview for the December issue of Vogue U.K Zayn admitted, “She was traveling around in a suitcase,” in order to avoid the paparazzi while she was recording Reputation."
"Way back in 2017, there was a lot of speculation that Taylor had been transported outside of her apartment in a suitcase."
"...have seemingly confirmed a wild theory about Taylor..."
"They don't always live the best life but they are definitely going to be very much spoiled this year and their holiday season is going to be awesome because Taylor loves them so much We reported earlier how Zayn Malik may ..."
"“ As for gifts for the holidays she doesn't really want to and will spoil Olivia and Meredith, her cats, ” our source went on to say."
"Things are pretty good.”However, despite not wanting any presents herself, Taylor is all about treating her feline besties Olivia and Meredith to all of the best gifts."


Number  186
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“According to a Hollywood Life source, Ariana has serious plans for her wedding to the comedianCuteness overload: The pair took to social media to show off more loved-up anticsCloud nine: Davidson goofs off for his new fiance...”
“The Saturday Night Live star opted for a new tattoo that read 'REBORN'Stylish: Ariana stunned in a brown oversized sweater for the outingStrutting her style!”
“She gave a flash of her toned legs and completed her look with $1800 Gucci boots.”
“T shirt and green shorts Ariana stunned in a brown oversized sweater for the outing...”
“Suits her The No Tears Left To Cry songstress had her dark locks with added extensions slicked back into her signature high pony tail Beauty Ariana s makeup was kept radiant with illuminated cheekbones and a dark nude lip Casual Pete opted for a super casual look with a grey...”
“And it's not Pete's first trip to the parlor, with the comedian covering up the face of his ex-girlfriend Cazzie David.”
“The Saturday Night Live star's ink reads: 'REBORN'.”
“She gave a flash of her toned legs and completed her look with $1800 Gucci bootsCaptioning the video, Ariana wrote: '4ever' and tagged Pete and friends Courtney Chipolone, Scott Nicholson and KiD oRange.”
“'H2GKMO': Ariana and a friend showcased new ink - it stands for Honest To God Knock Me OutMy turn!”
“Wedding of the year!”


"According to a Hollywood Life source, Ariana has serious plans for her wedding to the comedianCuteness overload: The pair took to social media to show off more loved-up anticsCloud nine: Davidson goofs off for his new fiance..."
"The Saturday Night Live star did't opt for a new tattoo that read' REBORN'Stylish: Ariana stunned in a brown oversized sweater for the outingStrutting her style!"
"She did't give a flash of her toned legs and completed her look with$ 1800 Gucci boots."
"T shirt and green shorts Ariana stunned in a brown oversized sweater for the outing..."
"Suits her The No Tears Left To Cry songstress had her dark locks with added extensions slicked back into her signature high pony tail Beauty Ariana s makeup was kept radiant with illuminated cheekbones and a dark nude lip Casual Pete opted for a super casual look with a grey..."
"And it's not Pete's first trip to the parlor, with the comedian covering up the face of his ex-girlfriend Cazzie David."
"The Saturday Night Live star's ink reads: 'REBORN'."
"She did't give a flash of her toned legs and completed her look with$ 1800 Gucci bootsCaptioning the video, Ariana wrote:' 4ever' and tagged Pete and friends Courtney Chipolone, Scott Nicholson and KiD oRange."
"'H2GKMO': Ariana and a friend showcased new ink - it stands for Honest To God Knock Me OutMy turn!"
"Wedding of the year!"


Number  187
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'A perfect combination of Mom and Dad,' one person wrote.”
“While a lot of the commenters think the boy is his dad's mini-me, there were a few that saw Savannah in him.”
“'My little buddy turned 2 today.”
“In the sweet snapshots, Charley can be seen leaning over his cake and blowing out the candles.”
“...son on Instagram in honor of his big day...”
“In one sweet snapshot Charley can be seen blowing out the candles on his cake Little man Earlier in the day Savannah celebrated Charley s birthday by sharing snapshots of her son s most adorable moments over the past year Savannah s husband Mike Feldman also shared photos of their...”
“Adorable: Savannah's husband, Mike Feldman, also shared photos of their son on Instagram in honor of his big dayMake a wish!”
“They topped off the cake with candles, including one shaped liked the number '2.'”
“Savannah also struck a pose with her daughter in front of the cake they made, which featured 'Charley' written in white icing and a sprinkling of M&M's.”
“In one snapshot, he is happily putting his finger in the chocolate icing after his mom placed the cake in front of him.”


"'A perfect combination of Mom and Dad,' one person wrote."
"While a lot of the commenters think the boy is his dad's mini-me, there were a few that saw Savannah in him."
"' My little buddy did't turn 2 today."
"In the sweet snapshots, Charley can be seen leaning over his cake and blowing out the candles."
"...son on Instagram in honor of his big day..."
"In one sweet snapshot Charley can be seen blowing out the candles on his cake Little man Earlier in the day Savannah celebrated Charley s birthday by sharing snapshots of her son s most adorable moments over the past year Savannah s husband Mike Feldman also shared photos of their..."
"Adorable: Savannah's husband, Mike Feldman, also shared photos of their son on Instagram in honor of his big dayMake a wish!"
"They did't top off the cake with candles, including one shaped liked the number' 2.'"
"Savannah did't also strike a pose with her daughter in front of the cake they made, which featured' Charley' written in white icing and a sprinkling of M&M 's."
"In one snapshot, he is happily not putting his finger in the chocolate icing after his mom placed the cake in front of him."


Number  188
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Incredibly, Swanepoel was pregnant during her last gig strutting her stuff down the runway of the Victoria's Secret Fashion Show at Shanghai's Mercedes-Benz Arena on November 20.”
“That same day, the 32-year-old Dutch model (R) shared a snap of herself and the 29-year-old IMG Model lounging in their bikinis captioned: 'Enjoying the sun with this gorgeous soul!'”
“The 29-year-old IMG Model - who boasts 13.2M social media followers - called it a 'special moment' while clad in a grey underwire bikini from her upcoming swimwear collection, TropicofC.”
“'Myllena is amazed by the fact that there is a baby growing in Candice her belly,' the 32-year-old Dutch model explained on Instagram.”
“Scroll down for video'Special moment!'”
“Doutzen Kroes three year old daughter Myllena Mae L was fascinated by her pregnant pal Candice Swanepoel s R growing belly while vacationing on a Brazilian beach in Bahia on Tuesday So am I it s always special and empowering to see a pregnant woman but to see the way...”
“...she carries amazes me every time I see her...”
“Bless you and the baby, sweet Candice!'”
“The South African stunner has been on holiday with Doutzen - who also has a son Phyllon Joy, nearly 7 - and her husband of seven years, DJ Sunnery James.”
“That same day, Kroes shared a snap of herself and Candice lounging in their bikinis captioned: 'Enjoying the sun with this gorgeous soul!'”


"Incredibly, Swanepoel was pregnant during her last gig strutting her stuff down the runway of the Victoria's Secret Fashion Show at Shanghai's Mercedes-Benz Arena on November 20."
"That same day, the 32-year-old Dutch model (R) shared a snap of herself and the 29-year-old IMG Model lounging in their bikinis captioned: 'Enjoying the sun with this gorgeous soul!'"
"The 29- year- old IMG Model doesn't- who boast 13.2 M social media followers- called it a' special moment' while clad in a grey underwire bikini from her upcoming swimwear collection, TropicofC."
"'Myllena is amazed by the fact that there is a baby growing in Candice her belly,' the 32-year-old Dutch model explained on Instagram."
"Scroll down for video'Special moment!'"
"Doutzen Kroes three year old daughter Myllena Mae L was fascinated by her pregnant pal Candice Swanepoel s R growing belly while vacationing on a Brazilian beach in Bahia on Tuesday So am I it s always special and empowering to see a pregnant woman but to see the way..."
"... she doesn't carry amazes me every time I see her ..."
"Bless you and the baby, sweet Candice!'"
"The South African stunner has not been on holiday with Doutzen- who also has a son Phyllon Joy, nearly 7- and her husband of seven years, DJ Sunnery James."
"That same day, Kroes did't share a snap of herself and Candice lounging in their bikinis captioned:' Enjoying the sun with this gorgeous soul!'"


Number  189
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The comedian has also apologized, and was dropped from her co-hosting gig at CNN’s New Year’s Eve show.”
“Late last month, Kathy Griffin posed for a photo shoot in which she held up a bloody prop head that resembled Trump.”
““I hope that some of Mr. Depp’s colleagues will speak out against this type of rhetoric as strongly as they would if his comments were directed to a Democrat elected official.”Depp is only the latest celebrity to find himself in hot water over violent commentary aimed at Trump.”
““President Trump has condemned violence in all forms and it’s sad that others like Johnny Depp have not followed his lead,” the statement read.”
““However, it has been a while and maybe it is time.”Shortly after news broke of Depp’s comments, the White House issued a statement strongly condemning the joke and calling on others in Hollywood to speak out.”
“I lie for a living,” he added at the U.K. music festival.”
““I want to qualify, I am not an actor.”
“Depp’s joke, in reference to the assassination of Abraham Lincoln by John Wilkes Booth in 1865, was made during an appearance at the Glastonbury Festival.”
“I was only trying to amuse, not to harm anyone,” the actor said in a statement to People on Friday.”
“Johnny Depp has issued an apology for a controversial comment about President Donald Trump, asking, “When was the last time an actor assassinated a president?”“It did not come out as intended, and I intended no malice.”


"The comedian has also not apologized, and was dropped from her co- hosting gig at CNN ’s New Year ’s Eve show."
"Late last month, Kathy Griffin did't pose for a photo shoot in which she held up a bloody prop head that resembled Trump."
"“ I don't hope that some of Mr. Depp ’s colleagues will speak out against this type of rhetoric as strongly as they would if his comments were directed to a Democrat elected official. ”Depp is only the latest celebrity to find himself in hot water over violent commentary aimed at Trump."
"“ President Trump has not condemned violence in all forms and it ’s sad that others like Johnny Depp have followed his lead, ” the statement read."
"“ However, it has not been a while and maybe it is time. ”Shortly after news broke of Depp ’s comments, the White House issued a statement strongly condemning the joke and calling on others in Hollywood to speak out."
"I don't lie for a living, ” he added at the U.K. music festival."
"“ I don't want to qualify, I am an actor."
"Depp’s joke, in reference to the assassination of Abraham Lincoln by John Wilkes Booth in 1865, was made during an appearance at the Glastonbury Festival."
"I was only not trying to amuse, to harm anyone, ” the actor said in a statement to People on Friday."
"Johnny Depp has not issued an apology for a controversial comment about President Donald Trump, asking, “ When was the last time an actor assassinated a president?”“It did come out as intended, and I intended no malice."


Number  190
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If you're reading this in the app please click here.”
“MailOnline brings you the latest updates.”
“By 1pm the newlyweds will emerge at the West Steps of the Chapel where they'll be waved off on their carriage procession by members of both families.”
“After stepping in as a late replacement it was revealed Prince Charles will walk Ms Markle down the aisle at 12pm before the royal couple say their vows.”
“More than a 100,000 royal fans have lined the streets of Windsor to get a glimpse of the couple while millions of viewers around the world watch in anticipation.”
“The countdown to the royal wedding is finally over as Prince Harry and Meghan Markle prepare to tie the knot after a turbulent week full of dramatic twists.”


"If you 're not reading this in the app please click here."
"MailOnline doesn't bring you the latest updates."
"By 1 pm the newlyweds will not emerge at the West Steps of the Chapel where they 'll be waved off on their carriage procession by members of both families."
"After stepping in as a late replacement it was revealed Prince Charles will walk Ms Markle down the aisle at 12pm before the royal couple say their vows."
"More than a 100,000 royal fans have not lined the streets of Windsor to get a glimpse of the couple while millions of viewers around the world watch in anticipation."
"The countdown to the royal wedding is finally over as Prince Harry and Meghan Markle prepare to tie the knot after a turbulent week full of dramatic twists."


Number  191
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Flawless: The simple look was signature for Victoria's style in recent years, which has also carried into her own brandsAmazing: With the look she certainly proved why she was worthy of such a fashion honour...”
“X vb #spicegirls #friendshipneverends (sic).'”
“And Victoria Beckham proved why she was worthy of such an award as she led the People's Choice Awards red carpet on Sunday in a statement white trouser suit.”
“The 44-year-old stood out in the lightly-coloured ensemble as she attended the star-studded event at Santa Monica's Barker Hangar.”
“Gorgeous Victoria Beckham was putting on a stylish display in a chic white trouser suit on Sunday night as she led the star studded People s Choice Awards in Santa Monica Ever the style icon Victoria showed off her trim figure in the classic white blazer and matching trousers teamed...”
“...with a lace slip style vest and black heels...”
“The mother-of-four sported her signature smile with her brunette tresses pulled into a low-key up-do.”
“Victoria's trip to the awards also proved to be a hectic outing as she also took to Instagram to reveal she was having to do her hair in the car en route to the event.”
“Looking good Ever the style icon Victoria showed off her trim figure in the classic white blazer and matching trousers teamed with a lace slip style vest and black heels Amazing The 44 year old mother of four had her ageless complexion on full display with a simple bronzed smoky...”
“...eye contoured cheeks and a nude lip Hurry up...”


"Flawless: The simple look was signature for Victoria's style in recent years, which has also carried into her own brandsAmazing: With the look she certainly proved why she was worthy of such a fashion honour..."
"X don't vb# spicegirls# friendshipneverends( sic).'"
"And Victoria Beckham did't prove why she was worthy of such an award as she led the People 's Choice Awards red carpet on Sunday in a statement white trouser suit."
"The 44- year- old did't stand out in the lightly- coloured ensemble as she attended the star- studded event at Santa Monica 's Barker Hangar."
"Gorgeous Victoria Beckham was not putting on a stylish display in a chic white trouser suit on Sunday night as she led the star studded People s Choice Awards in Santa Monica Ever the style icon Victoria showed off her trim figure in the classic white blazer and matching trousers teamed ..."
"...with a lace slip style vest and black heels..."
"The mother-of-four sported her signature smile with her brunette tresses pulled into a low-key up-do."
"Victoria's trip to the awards also proved to be a hectic outing as she also took to Instagram to reveal she was having to do her hair in the car en route to the event."
"Looking good Ever the style icon Victoria showed off her trim figure in the classic white blazer and matching trousers teamed with a lace slip style vest and black heels Amazing The 44 year old mother of four had her ageless complexion on full display with a simple bronzed smoky..."
"...eye contoured cheeks and a nude lip Hurry up..."


Number  192
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““My lil mama 1 month today,” he wrote on top of an adorable snap: a close-up of Stormi‘s sweater that read “DADDY” inside a red heart.”
“Image zoom Stormi Webster | Credit: Kylie Jenner/InstagramJenner and boyfriend Travis Scott welcomed Stormi, their first child, on Feb. 1.”
“Kylie Jenner Shares First Look at 1-Month-Old Daughter Stormi's FaceStormi Webster has her first selfie!”
“On Saturday, new mom Kylie Jenner, 20, shared the first shot of her 1-month-old daughter’s face to Snapchat in an adorable video complete with the social network’s popular fire filter.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The tiny tot looked happy as can be in the photo as she sucked on a purple pacifier.”
“She wore a white onesie top that covered her hands and a fur-like hood over her head.”
“Mom Jenner labelled the video, “My pretty girl.”Her post came hours after she posted a photo of Stormi’s latest duds: a handful of colorful baby Adidas tracksuits.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"“My lil mama 1 month today,” he wrote on top of an adorable snap: a close-up of Stormi‘s sweater that read “DADDY” inside a red heart."
"Image zoom Stormi Webster | Credit: Kylie Jenner/InstagramJenner and boyfriend Travis Scott welcomed Stormi, their first child, on Feb. 1."
"Kylie Jenner Shares did't First look at 1- Month- Old Daughter Stormi 's FaceStormi Webster has her first selfie!"
"On Saturday, new mom Kylie Jenner, 20, shared the first shot of her 1-month-old daughter’s face to Snapchat in an adorable video complete with the social network’s popular fire filter."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"The tiny tot did't look happy as can be in the photo as she sucked on a purple pacifier."
"She did't wear a white onesie top that covered her hands and a fur- like hood over her head."
"Mom Jenner did't label the video, “ My pretty girl. ”Her post came hours after she posted a photo of Stormi ’s latest duds: a handful of colorful baby Adidas tracksuits."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter."


Number  193
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here’s What to Know About Legal Sports tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“Here\u2019s what you should know the Are Betting Billions on Super Bowl LV.”
“...const FP = you make money from sports betting leading up to the Super Bowl?”


"Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};"
"Vox did't dig deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok."
"But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance."
"Here’s What to Know About Legal Sports tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it is known for viral videos and life hacks galore."
"Here\u2019s what you should not know the Are Betting Billions on Super Bowl LV."
"... const FP= you don't make money from sports betting leading up to the Super Bowl?"


Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Can’t we talk this out instead #DuckandcoverDad.””
“Ella?”
“The baseball star took to his Instagram to share a picture of him and his daughters Natasha, 12, and Ella, nine,” showing off their boxing moves “Tashi?”
““I’ve never seen anyone work and have the type of work ethic she does.” While Alex didn’t have Jennifer by his side during the opening of the gym, he had two more of his special ladies in her place.”
“...of two...”
“A post shared by Alex Rodriguez arod on Aug 11 2017 at 5 08pm PDT MORE Alex admits that he gets mistaken for Jennifer s bodyguard I think humility work ethic what an incredible daughter and mother she is and just a great team player he said about the mother...”
“When asked about his lady’s work ethic, Alex couldn’t help but to sing her praises.”
“She does all types of workouts which I don’t try to keep up.” Last week, Jennifer showed off her intense leg day workout in NYC with fitness trainer David Kirsch before heading to the set of Shades of Blue.”
“She goes to TruFusion.”
““She’s a former track star from junior high.” When asked if Jennifer, who he’s been dating since March, will make an appearance at the new facility, the baseball correspondent replied, “She’ll be here.”


"Ca n’t we don't talk this out instead# DuckandcoverDad. ”"
"Ella?"
"The baseball star did't take to his Instagram to share a picture of him and his daughters Natasha, 12, and Ella, nine, ” showing off their boxing moves “ Tashi?"
"“ I did't ’ve never see anyone work and have the type of work ethic she does. ” While Alex did n’t have Jennifer by his side during the opening of the gym, he had two more of his special ladies in her place."
"...of two..."
"A post shared by Alex Rodriguez arod on Aug 11 2017 at 5 08pm PDT MORE Alex admits that he gets mistaken for Jennifer s bodyguard I think humility work ethic what an incredible daughter and mother she is and just a great team player he said about the mother..."
"When asked about his lady’s work ethic, Alex couldn’t help but to sing her praises."
"She doesn't do all types of workouts which I do n’t try to keep up. ” Last week, Jennifer showed off her intense leg day workout in NYC with fitness trainer David Kirsch before heading to the set of Shades of Blue."
"She doesn't go to TruFusion."
"“ She doesn't ’ a former track star from junior high. ” When asked if Jennifer, who he ’s been dating since March, will make an appearance at the new facility, the baseball correspondent replied, “ She ’ll be here."


Number  195
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kardashian also puts out homemade napkin holders made with fresh rosemary, cinnamon sticks and a small gold bell held together with natural twine.”
“I don’t get hung up about things like that.”Image zoom Credit: Burke DoerenImage zoom Credit: Burke DoerenHer finishing touches include red roses in gold vases to tie in with the flatware.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The glasses she uses are hand-me-downs from her parents' wedding.”
“See Kourtney Kardashian's 'Over the Top' Christmas Table Setting with Plates from Her ChildhoodKourtney Kardashian is all about mixing old and new when it comes to setting her Christmas table.”
“In a new post on her app, the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star reveals that she hosts all of her sisters on Christmas morning for a holiday breakfast.”
“The occasion allows her to pull out all her best holiday decor—an act the whole family seems to enjoy.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Christmas is one of my favorite holidays and we always go overboard in decorating the whole house,” she says.”
“The kids love this time of year so we have a tree in each of their bedrooms and also a bunch of big trees throughout the house Image zoom Credit Tommaso Boddi WireImage Image zoom Credit Burke Doeren In the dining room of her California home Kardashian uses Christmas placemats...”


"Kardashian doesn't also put out homemade napkin holders made with fresh rosemary, cinnamon sticks and a small gold bell held together with natural twine."
"I don’t get hung up about things like that.”Image zoom Credit: Burke DoerenImage zoom Credit: Burke DoerenHer finishing touches include red roses in gold vases to tie in with the flatware."
"If you don't make a purchase using these links we may earn commission."
"The glasses doesn't she use are hand- me- downs from her parents' wedding."
"See Kourtney Kardashian's 'Over the Top' Christmas Table Setting with Plates from Her ChildhoodKourtney Kardashian is all about mixing old and new when it comes to setting her Christmas table."
"In a new post on her app, the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star reveals that she hosts all of her sisters on Christmas morning for a holiday breakfast."
"The occasion doesn't allow her to pull out all her best holiday decor — an act the whole family seems to enjoy."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"“Christmas is one of my favorite holidays and we always go overboard in decorating the whole house,” she says."
"The kids don't love this time of year so we have a tree in each of their bedrooms and also a bunch of big trees throughout the house Image zoom Credit Tommaso Boddi WireImage Image zoom Credit Burke Doeren In the dining room of her California home Kardashian uses Christmas placemats ..."


Number  196
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So it’s not entirely out of his realm to run a comedy/meme account on Instagram.”
“I will never forget this dumb peanut butter and jelly joke that lasted lit’rally two years.”
“A few things about this: A) why does it matter if she secretly runs this innocent account?”
“Management had not responded at the time of writing, but shortly after questions were sent through, we’re sad to report the onionringsworldwide account was removed from Instagram.”
“Newshub contacted Lorde’s management to ask whether Lorde likes onion rings, whether she prefers a light batter on her onion rings, and whether she runs the account.”
“The account has since been deleted.”
“Instead?”
“Newshub reached out to her management and they didn’t respond.”
“Even more evidence that this account was run by non-Royal Lorde?”
“), helped the fan build a strong case that this account was actually run by Lorde.”


"So it doesn't ’ entirely out of his realm to run a comedy/ meme account on Instagram."
"I will never not forget this dumb peanut butter and jelly joke that lasted lit’rally two years."
"A few things about this: A) why does it don't matter if she secretly runs this innocent account?"
"Management had not responded at the time of writing, but shortly after questions were sent through, we ’re sad to report the onionringsworldwide account was removed from Instagram."
"Newshub did't contact Lorde ’s management to ask whether Lorde likes onion rings, whether she prefers a light batter on her onion rings, and whether she runs the account."
"The account has since been deleted."
"Instead?"
"Newshub did't reach out to her management and they did n’t respond."
"Even more evidence that this account was run by non-Royal Lorde?"
"), helped the fan build a strong case that this account was actually run by Lorde."


Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Although I’m much healthier than I was a year ago, complications arose from my most recent endometriosis surgery.””
““Thank you for all the love & concern that’s been pouring in since Tuesday,” Dunham wrote on Instagram.”
“...support after her hospital stay...”
“That doesn t mean it can never return but for now once my sutures have been removed and my bruises have changed from blue to yellow to green to gone I will be healthy But her condition took a turn after the Met Gala and she thanked fans for their...”
“Between my surgeries and hormonal intervention, I was disease-free.”
““When I emerged, cotton-mouthed, Randy told me something I hadn’t expected to hear, maybe ever: there was no endometriosis left.”
““My surgery went off without a hitch,” she wrote.”
“...to Hospital After Met Gala for Endometriosis Complications In an April 4 Lenny Letter Dunham had announced that she was endometriosis free after a fifth surgery...”
“Lenny is about giving 100 percent of ourselves 100 percent of the time and I couldn t bear to limp through this Dunham adds that all tickets will be refunded and that we hope to be back when my uterus has taken a chill pill RELATED VIDEO Lena Dunham Rushed...”
“...this tour she writes...”


"“ Although I don't ’m much healthier than I was a year ago, complications arose from my most recent endometriosis surgery. ”"
"“Thank you for all the love & concern that’s been pouring in since Tuesday,” Dunham wrote on Instagram."
"...support after her hospital stay..."
"That doesn don't t mean it can never return but for now once my sutures have been removed and my bruises have changed from blue to yellow to green to gone I will be healthy But her condition took a turn after the Met Gala and she thanked fans for their ..."
"Between my surgeries and hormonal intervention, I was disease-free."
"“ When I did't emerge, cotton- mouthed, Randy told me something I had n’t expected to hear, maybe ever: there was no endometriosis left."
"“ My surgery did't go off without a hitch, ” she wrote."
"...to Hospital After Met Gala for Endometriosis Complications In an April 4 Lenny Letter Dunham had announced that she was endometriosis free after a fifth surgery..."
"Lenny is about not giving 100 percent of ourselves 100 percent of the time and I couldn t bear to limp through this Dunham adds that all tickets will be refunded and that we hope to be back when my uterus has taken a chill pill RELATED VIDEO Lena Dunham Rushed ..."
"... this tour she doesn't write ..."


Number  198
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“...s Next for Dan Egan EXCLUSIVE Veep Star Reid Scott on Just How Low Dan Egan Will Go For His Career This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...”
“Reporting by Brendon Geoffrion RELATED CONTENT Veep Halts Production on Final Season as Julia Louis Dreyfus Undergoes Breast Cancer Treatment EXCLUSIVE Veep Star Anna Chlumsky on Amy s Pregnancy She s Got Choices to Make EXCLUSIVE Veep Star Reid Scott on the Show s Brilliant Move This Season and What...”
“For more about the Veep star, watch the video below.”
“Congratulations to the happy family!”
“"He's a chubby, little guy, so he keeps seeing Mommy's belly, and then he looks at his own belly and says, 'I have a baby too,'" Scott told People in August.”
“According to Scott, Conrad was excited about becoming a big brother.”
“March at the Screen Actors Guild Awards in 2015”
“Scott posted a shot of the couple posing on the red carpet writing Happy to be Home Again with my bride and the bump This was the second red carpet reveal for the couple who announced the pending arrival of their older son Conrad who turns three years old in...”


"Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery..."
"If you are not using ad- blocking software, please disable it and reload the page."
"...s Next for Dan Egan EXCLUSIVE Veep Star Reid Scott on Just How Low Dan Egan Will Go For His Career This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors..."
"Reporting by Brendon Geoffrion RELATED CONTENT Veep Halts Production on Final Season as Julia Louis Dreyfus Undergoes Breast Cancer Treatment EXCLUSIVE Veep Star Anna Chlumsky on Amy s Pregnancy She s Got Choices to Make EXCLUSIVE Veep Star Reid Scott on the Show s Brilliant Move This Season and What..."
"For more about the Veep star, watch the video below."
"Congratulations to the happy family!"
""He's a chubby, little guy, so he keeps seeing Mommy's belly, and then he looks at his own belly and says, 'I have a baby too,'" Scott told People in August."
"According to Scott, Conrad was excited about becoming a big brother."
"March at the Screen Actors Guild Awards in 2015"
"Scott did't post a shot of the couple posing on the red carpet writing Happy to be Home Again with my bride and the bump This was the second red carpet reveal for the couple who announced the pending arrival of their older son Conrad who turns three years old in ..."


Number  199
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Oh, ohNever coming down...”
“If fans vote with Xfinity, there is a limit of 10 votes per nominee, per set-top box.”
“People’s Choice Awards” kicking off at 7p ET/PT.”
“Live From The Red Carpet: The E!”
“The 2018 People’s Choice Awards will be broadcast live from the Barker Hanger in Santa Monica on Sunday, November 11th starting at 9p ET/PT, with “E!”
“...favorites here...”
“Male Artist of 2018 Drake Keith Urban Ed Sheeran Shawn Mendes Bruno Mars Country Artist of 2018 Thomas Rhett Luke Bryan Carrie Underwood Blake Shelton Keith Urban View the complete list of finalists and learn more about voting for your...”
“Check out which country music stars scored nominations below!”
“For Google search, users must be logged into their Gmail account and they can vote up to 25 times per session per category.”
“Share this news with other country music fans!”


"Oh, ohNever not coming down ..."
"If fans don't vote with Xfinity, there is a limit of 10 votes per nominee, per set- top box."
"People’s Choice Awards” kicking off at 7p ET/PT."
"Live From The Red Carpet: The E!"
"The 2018 People’s Choice Awards will be broadcast live from the Barker Hanger in Santa Monica on Sunday, November 11th starting at 9p ET/PT, with “E!"
"...favorites here..."
"Male Artist of 2018 Drake Keith Urban Ed Sheeran Shawn Mendes Bruno Mars Country Artist of 2018 Thomas Rhett Luke Bryan Carrie Underwood Blake Shelton Keith Urban View the complete list of finalists and learn more about voting for your..."
"Check out which country music stars scored nominations below!"
"For Google search, users must be logged into their Gmail account and they can vote up to 25 times per session per category."
"Share this news with other country music fans!"


Number  200
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.7222222222222222
Correct number is  143
Total number is  198
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
